 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EXPONENTS AND CRITICS OF ABSOLUTISM the liberties of the Gallican church by Pierre and Jacques Dupuy in 1638, and in 1641 the De Concordia Sacerdotii et Imperii by the conseiller d'etat Pierre de Marca, which was condemned and placed on the Index in 1642. Thus the Curia and its theoreticians did not abate their claims. How- ever the kings found good arguments for rejecting the pope's supremacy in temporal affairs and often in spiritual affairs in varying degrees. There were no effective obstacles to absolutist doctrines here. The authority of the emperor might have provided another limitation on princely sovereignty, but only in the German part of the empire was this still a practical problem. The Italian states and princes, although they were nominally within the empire, claimed to be and effectively were sovereign states. But the emperor did not renounce any of his claims. They were defended by Reinking, a professor at the Lutheran University of Giessen, in the Tractatus de Regimine Saeculari et Ecclesiastico (1619). This insisted upon the continuity of the Roman and the Holy Roman Empires. The Lex Regia, restated in the Institutes of Justinian and re- maining the law of the Holy Roman Empire, stated quod principi placuit legis habet vigorem, since the people had transferred to the prince its imperium and potestas. Thus the emperor was the summus magistratus christiani orbis and a truly absolute monarch. As a disciple of Bodin, Reinking declared the emperor was legibus solutus, but bound to respect the commandments of God, natural law and the laws which he had sworn to observe. The emperor ought to have an unlimited supremacy and be able to abrogate or modify laws decreed by other princes. The book became the bible of the imperialists and Ferdinand II in 1630 said that he completely accepted it. The theologian Witzendorff restated its con- clusions in his Discursus de Status et Administrationis Imperii Romanii in 1641. But most people denied imperial absolutism, while the princes claimed to be absolute in their own estates. Jurists and politicians invoked the fundamental laws of the empire, the Golden Bull of 1356, the ordinances of the Diets, imperial capitulations, which were supposed to assure to each prince Landeshoheit, territorial superiority, equivalent to sovereignty. Bodin has already Republique, n, vi, described it as 'an aristocratic state where sovereignty resides in the seven electors and some three hundred princes'. Althusius elaborated a theory based upon an idealization of the political realities of the empire in his Politico, first published in 1603, greatly enlarged in 1610, and frequently reprinted until 1654. According to him the empire was a true state, formed by the drawing together of provinces. It was an organic union for the spiritual and bodily health of its members. Only this state could fulfil the vital needs of its citizens and so its sovereign magistrate, the emperor, had to have supreme spiritual and temporal powers. But he was only the steward of this supreme power which belonged to the community. He was elected in the name of the 109 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR community by the College of Electors who 'represented absolutely' the will of the empire. He subscribed to the fundamental laws of the com- munity and to any explanations added by the electors; he pledged himself to administer the state according to the laws prescribed by God which were the laws of reason and the state itself. Purely an executive agent, he was watched over by the Electoral College who kept him within the proper bounds and could resist him if he became a tyrant. The con- federated provinces retained their autonomy. Protestantism inspired many to go further. Theologians following Calvin, and still more Beza, had declared resistance to the emperor in the defence of religion lawful and thus denied the Roman Catholic affiliation of the Holy Roman Empire. In 1609 the Protestant princes told Rudolf II 'his majesty well knows that a great difference exists and ought to exist between the German Empire, its state, members and subjects and the former Roman Empire'. The Lex Regia did not apply to the empire, as the jurist Conring undertook to show. The law of Lothar was a fable, for Roman law had only been introduced into Germany in the thirteenth century. German law was customary law and the true Lex Regia was the emperor's capitulation at his election, while his coronation oath was an oath of allegiance to the empire. Thus the empire was above the emperor and if he broke his oath the state ought to protect the empire if necessary by force. This was the view of the rector of the University of Jena, Hort- leder, in 1608 and he imparted it to his pupil, Duke John Ernest of Saxe- Weimar and to his brother and successor, William, who both fought against the emperor. Moreover, the court of Saxe-Weimar also encouraged at the University of Jena, the school of Arumaeus, the great adversary of Reinking, a Calvinist and professor at Jena from 1602 to 1637. In his Discursus Acade- mid ad Auream Bullam (1617) and in his Commentarius de Comitiis Romano-Germanici imperii (1630), Arumaeus distinguished within the Empire a double sovereignty {majestas), the majestas realis, which was the highest and belonged to the stande and the majestas personalis, which belonged to the emperor and was subordinate to the majestas realis. The empire was a limited monarchy with aristocratic government. Limnaeus belonged to the school of Arumaeus and in Juris Publici Imperii Romano- germanici Libri IX (1629-32), maintained that the electoral capitulation was the juridical basis of imperial power, that the laws of the empire were not the work of the emperor alone, but of all the states of the empire, while the emperor was the steward of the empire which was an aristocracy. Limnaus was a counsellor of William, Duke of Saxe-Weimar, and in 1631 became a counsellor of the margrave of Ansbach and tutor to his son. But even more influential was the Dissertatio de Ratione Status in Imperio Romano Germanico (1640), written by the Swedish German 110 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EXPONENTS AND CRITICS OF ABSOLUTISM P. Chemnitz under the pseudonym of Hippolitus a Lapide. It showed that in the empire it was no longer a question de religione but de regione and called upon the states to fight for their liberties against the power of Austria. Sovereignty belonged to the empire and the estates grouped in the Diet, not to the emperor. The Diet had the summa et absoluta seu legibus soluta potestas, not the emperor. The empire was above the laws and the emperor and could modify the fundamental laws, change the emperor. If the emperor threatened sovereignty and liberty of the empire, it was a duty to fight the emperor as an enemy of the empire. The emperor had no right to make war or peace, to raise taxes or troops, without the consent of the electors. He did not possess supreme jurisdiction and was only the agent and executant to the empire's decisions. Each member of the empire had the right to raise troops and make alliances, even with foreigners, without the emperor's consent. The emperor's power ought to be no greater than that of a doge of Venice, while the House of Austria ought to be completely removed from the empire. Although the emperor had the book burnt its main points were incorporated, thanks to France, in the Treaties of Westphalia. The French insisted that the Diet should take part in the negotiations and its sovereignty was guaranteed in those treaties. Article eight of the Treaty of Osnabruck confirmed the electors, princes and states of the empire in their ancient rights, privileges and liberties, both in temporal and spiritual matters, including the right to make alliances among them- selves and with foreign powers. It thus recognized the sovereignty of the members of the empire and provided for their free assembly to conduct all imperial affairs, to make laws, to make war or peace or alliances and to raise taxes and soldiers. The Treaty of Miinster contained the same provi- sions and the Diet which met for the execution of these treaties became permanent, presiding over the division of the empire into a multitude of petty sovereign states. The emperor's pretensions to absolutism had been finally defeated. The existence of an international community of states which observed certain rules in their relationships might imply some limitation upon the absolute prince's sovereign power. Suarez maintained that mankind was everywhere bound together by the natural precepts of love and mutual pity. It consisted of an association of states bound together by the need which they had for each other. Relationships between states ought to be regulated by obligations accepted by common agreement, the law of nations. While Suarez suggested principles for public international law, Grotius developed and applied them in the De Jure Belli ac Pads (1625). He recognized the existence of a human society whose members had common interests, notably in enjoying free and peaceful relationships. This society consists of sovereign states: the law of nations is 'that which has gained the force of law by the will of all nations, or of several of them in Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR in relationship to each other', demonstrated by 'the constant usage and witness of those having knowledge thereof. Thus the law of nations arose from the free consent of states, legally equal, to laws inspired by God's will and by natural law, the product of reason. Some of these rules were open to dispute; Grotius, as a good Dutchman, defended the freedom of the seas and was opposed by the Englishman Selden, who argued that the sea could be appropriated and occupied and that British dominion over it extended to the opposite coast {Mare Clausum, 1635). But whatever rules were allowed, such as the right to make war in self- defence, or to preserve the necessities of life, or rights to free passage of persons and goods, or to free intercourse with distant nations, etc., such rules arose from a consensus and did not limit sovereignty or princely absolutism. Absolutism seemed the answer to a deeply felt want in most European states. Theologians of the post-Tridentine Thomist revival had to try to assimilate absolutism and the principles of Bodin and Machiavelli. Suarez founded his work upon Thomist philosophical realism and on the decrees of the Council of Trent, in accordance with which he interpreted the political circumstances of his own time. From realism he took the fundamental idea of unchanging natural essences persisting beneath changing appearances. Society, the family, the city and the state corres- pond to unchanging necessities of human nature.' Man is a social animal whose true nature inclines to a communal life.' The family alone is in- sufficient to satisfy all man's needs, hence families are joined together in cities and cities in principalities and monarchies, since the state is the necessary condition for man's full development. Suarez, like Aristotle, saw the state as a moral organism, corpus politicum mysticum, uniting wills, not by a contract, but by a consensus among men who freely decide to found a society. Although men are free to decide to found this society, they cannot change either its ends or its structure, for society has an unalterable nature, willed by God. And since man, according to the Council of Trent, is free to choose between good and evil, but needs guidance in order to strive for greater virtue and glory, society is charac- terized by a subordination of each to superior authority. Public power derives from natural law and is sovereign and so has power to make laws. Men are born free and sovereignty in the first instance is in the whole body of men forming a society. But after their voluntary agreement to adhere to the political structure ordained by God as the author of nature, public authority is embodied in a supreme magistrate who may be a popular assembly, a college of aristocrats, or a monarch. Monarchy is the best form, since it most nearly resembles the order of the universe. But men's choice, their agreement on the first principles, fixes irrevocably the form of government. The people have no further rights over the state, since it is only a state when it possesses full sovereign power. Public authority is 112 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EXPONENTS AND CRITICS OF ABSOLUTISM of divine origin: the king as a sovereign rules as the viceregent of God so that obedience is due to him according to natural law, as the quasi- proprietor of public power, he is absolute. But he becomes a tyrant if he uses his power against the common good which is the end of the state. This powerful theological construct was propagated by the Jesuits, but was excluded from the Protestant states where philosophical nominalism and belief in predestination triumphed. Even in Catholic states it was accepted, to a greater or lesser extent, according to circumstances, as the pages which follow will show. But Muscovy is an exception to the rest of Europe, though the Musco- vites regarded themselves as Europeans because they were Christians. They even claimed to be the only truly orthodox Christians. Moscow was the third and last Rome; the czar, the only Christian emperor. He recog- nized no superior and was an autocrat. The patriarchs of Moscow taught that the Holy Ghost was in him to govern man and the Czar Alexis said 'God has blest us, the Czar, and has given us to govern and judge faith- fully our people in the East, West, South and North'. This notion of the sovereign as the direct agent of God is a principle common to absolutism throughout Europe. But Russian absolutism had another basis; Muscovy was the private property of the Kalita family. The state was the hereditary property of a dynasty, but after the death of Feydor Ivanovitch in 1598 the Kalita family became extinct. The problem of the time of troubles from 1598 to 1613 was to discover a czar by birth. When the Zemsky Sobor of 1613 declared Mikhail Romanof, czar, it was because he was the nephew of the last Kalita and was said to be 'elected by God before his birth'. But the fact remained that the state had survived without a czar during the time of troubles. Thus the state began to be distinguished from the person of the sovereign. There was also some temporary weakening of the old ideas of autocracy, but they ended by reasserting themselves. The word absolutism was also to be found in Polish documents. The Kings Sigismund III and Ladislas IV, were accused of claiming absolute power when they asked the Diet to provide permanent taxes for the crown and a standing army in order to preserve the state. Although the Polish Diet had greatly reduced the king's powers, Poland was not a Standestaat, for although the Diet comprised three estates—the King, the Senate and Chamber of Deputies—only nobles were represented. Poland was a republic of nobles, with an elective king of very limited powers. The con- stitution was based on the unbridled individualism of the nobles, guaran- teed by the 'fundamental laws'. The rights of the individual noble were respected to such an extent that all nobles were regarded as equal, thus excluding the use of distinguishing titles; all decisions had to be unani- mous, while each deputy in the Diet had a limited and specific mandate. "3 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR In Poland absolutism only existed in the power that each noble had over the inhabitants of his domain. Over-mighty subjects were kings and the state was a mirage. The rule of unanimity paralysed the Diets and even endangered the country's defence. In March 1606 Sigismund III convoked a Diet in order to reform the constitution by establishing majority rule, a per- manent tax and a standing army. The bishops and some of the laymen supported majority rule, which would have removed sovereignty from the individual nobles and restored it to the Diet. But the opposition accused the king of aspiring to absolutum dominium. Some of the nobles, led by Zebrodowsky, claimed that the king had broken the fundamental law, and rebelled. They were defeated, but the Diet of 1609 guaranteed the inviolability of the constitution. Subsequent attempts at reform were equally unsuccessful. State sovereignty was not only shattered by the principle of unanimity, but individual sovereignty was still further rein- forced and guaranteed by the progressive establishment of the liberum veto which was permanently established by the Diet of 1652. At the end of the statutory six weeks the Diet had not reached agreement and the king demanded a prolongation; the deputy Ladislas Sicinski announced his veto and left. As it seemed impossible to constrain individual members, the Diet was declared dissolved. Henceforward such interrupted Diets became more frequent. Attempts to abolish the liberum veto and to adopt majority rule failed. Neither the king nor the Diet possessed full sover- eignty; Poland's unreformed and irreformable constitution brought its defeats, loss of territories and ultimate extinction. In the Holy Roman Empire the Standestaat prevailed. Such a state was based upon the sacred rights of corporations, communities and indivi- duals, guaranteed by fundamental laws. There was also a dualism between the prince and 'the estates', the nobility, the clergy and towns, whose deputies met in Diets. These had to be consulted about everything con- cerning the country's welfare. They had to give their consent to war, peace, and alliances, and to levying taxes which were often collected under the supervision of their own officials. Their committees and officials might also supervise the whole administration of the state. Althusius was the theorist of this kind of state; man is a social animal who needs society in order to live a truly human life. In every society authority is needed to allocate common resources, organize work, and arrange co-operation. The family, the village, the province and the state, has each an organic form, the grouping together of whose successive units produces a larger organism. The province was the natural unit of the Standestaat. There each order, the church, the nobles, the craftsmen and peasants had its own deputies to consider its own affairs and to join with the other orders in considering more general matters. The head of the province, whether count, duke or prince, had the attributes of sovereignty, but on important 114 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EXPONENTS AND CRITICS OF ABSOLUTISM matters convoked the Estates and gave their decisions the force of law by agreeing to execute them. The Diets generally controlled the princes because they controlled finance, but there were often conflicts. In East Friesland, for example, both the count and the Estates claimed to be sovereign so that there were two financial administrations, two armies and two sets of diplomats. The Estates, led by the town of Emden, negotiated with the Dutch, and the count with the English. Elsewhere there were even more extreme ideas; about 1610 Von Tschernembl told the Estates of Upper Austria that the people, i.e. the nobility, were really sovereign: 'the people choose their prince and can also reject him . . . the territory decides for itself whether its ruler shall be hereditary . . .'. This type of state persisted most strongly in the early seventeenth century in small countries. In the larger ones, such as Bohemia, Bavaria, or France, transformation into absolute monarchy had begun. The principal political cause of this was the Thirty Years War which showed that the Standestaat was incapable of the rapid and energetic actions necessary for defence and so facilitated the growth of military despotism. In Brandenburg after 1631 the Swedish army provided the example of raising taxes by requisitioning without the consent of the Estates which was later followed by the Elector George William. The development of absolutism in Brandenburg-Prussia had special characteristics, owing to economic and social circumstances: the decline of the towns and the growth of demesne fanning dependent upon serf labour. This resulted in the preponderance of the landed nobility, Junkers, who eventually recognized the prince's absolutism, while obtaining their own monopoly of social privileges. Such developments owed much to theories which justified the claims of princes while undermining those of their opponents. Suarez and Bellarmine greatly helped Maximilian of Bavaria and the Emperors Ferdinand II and Ferdinand III. Lutheranism always extolled the omnipotence of princes; while Calvinism did so when the prince was a Calvinist. The electors of Brandenburg found Calvinist councillors their best helpers in promoting absolutism. This can be seen in the religiosity of the Confessio Sigismundi (1614)—which was perhaps not written by the Elector John Sigismund but by his spiritual adviser—and also in the Great Elector's political testament, where the king owes homage to God who protects him and will bless his enterprises, if he does not suffer his household to be polluted with mistresses, operas, comedies, masques, etc.; such pietistic attitudes went very well with ideas of sovereignty and raison d'etat. For these political theorists, jurists and statesmen, whether Protestant or Catholic, were strongly influenced by Bodin's conception of sovereignty and by Machiavelli's of raison d'etat. According to Hippolitus a Lapide, raison d'itat was 'a certain political consideration towards which all 115 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR councils and all actions in the state are directed . . . so that by it was attained more speedily and successfully the supreme end, the safety and growth of the state'. Sovereignty and raison d'etat were the active prin- ciples which enabled the modern state to break the resistance of provincial estates, of privileged orders, corporations and individuals. Through them princes were able to develop new ideas of law in the course of their quest for absolutism. The salus publica allowed the over-riding of old ideas of sacrosanct rights and constant changes of laws and customs so that the law was a perpetually fluctuating response to the maxim salus publica, suprema lex. The literature of raison d'etat flourished in the Holy Roman Empire and was profoundly influenced by the Italians, Botero and Am- mirato, who were much admired at Ferdinand II's court. Raison d'etat was expounded in the books of Christopher Besold, professor of law at Tubingen {Politicorum libri duo, 1618), in those of Reinking, Coming, Hippolitus a Lapide and in the Manuale Politicum de Ratione Status, seu Idole Principum by the imperial councillor Von Efferen (1630). Conring produced a dissertation on ratio status under the name of Heinrich Voss- ging and dedicated it to the Great Elector in 1651. By then raison d'etat was a common subject of conversation and jurists had made it into a special category of law. Clapmarius' De arcanis rerum publicarum libri sex (1605, reprinted 1644), identified arcana dominationis and reason of state, understanding it as jus dominationis which gave the sovereign the right to over-ride common law, jus commune seu ordinarium, in the name of bonum publicum. J. A. Struve {Syntagma Juris Civilis, 1658) wrote: 'Law is a disposition, a rule prescribed according to some principle by a superior, according to which men's actions are guided in such a way that they may be just.' Thus the prince's will and the state's power become the foundation of positive law. Such conceptions encouraged princes to act and influenced their actions. This can be seen when Ferdinand II altered the constitution and privileges of the towns and estates of Bohemia in the ordinance of 10 May 1627, or still more clearly in the execution of Wallenstein (1634) where the necessity of the state over-rode positive law and customary forms of trial. Italy, apart from Venice and Savoy, was a province of Spain, dominated by the thought of Suarez and Bellarmine. Bodin and Machiavelli were also influential there and the humanist notion of the hero persisted, while Tacitus, the historian of the empire, became more popular than Livy, the historian of the republic. Political writers were associated with the courts of Italian princes, themselves seeking absolute power, though often clients of Spain. Ideas such as those of Botero were current: the mainspring of any state is the obedience of its subjects, this depends upon the prince's virtue; he is a hero of superhuman intelligence who leads a perfect life and deserves absolute power. Thus quicquid principi placuit legis habet vigorem, the prince is legibus solutus, superiorem non recognoscens. 116 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EXPONENTS AND CRITICS OF ABSOLUTISM Gamberti developed the same theme in his Idea di un Principe et Eroe Christiano (1659). The Italians also claimed that the prince was the vicar of God. G. Gucci in // Principe Christiano Politico (1630) held that his omnipotence came immediately from God, while the majority held it came indirectly through the consent of man, as did Canonieri in L'lntro- ductione alia Politico (1640), but by this transfer the subjects renounced all their power. The Lex Regia was considered the foundation of princely absolutism. The prince himself possessed all sovereign power and, although Bodin was officially proscribed, he influenced Zuccolo (// Secolo delVOro, 1629), and R. Delia Torre (Astrolobio di Stato, 1647), etc. Every sovereign prince had the same power within his state as that possessed by the Roman emperors. They all agreed that the prince ought to respect natural law, the law of nations and, in ordinary circumstances, any just and reasonable laws. Italians inclined to limit the prince's absolute power to a greater extent than Bodin. Naturally the adaptations of Machiavelli to the Council of Trent by distinctions between bad raison d'etat and good raison d'etat, serving Christian ends, made by the Jesuit Botero (Ragion di Stato, 1589) and Ammirato {Discorsi supra Cornelio Tacito, 1598) were influential. According to Zuccolo (La Ragion di Stato, 1621): 'Not only councillors in the courts and doctors in the schools, but barbers and the most humble craftsmen in the shops . . . discussed and disputed about raison d'etat and persuaded themselves that they knew what things are done by raison d'etat and what not.' Many others admitted that raison d'etat justified depar- tures from equity when the state's existence was at stake. Although Paolo Sarpi, as a convinced anti-Jesuit, was opposed to Botero, he believed that the state's integrity and sovereignty should be preserved at any price. In his letter to the Doge Antonio Priuli of 26 November 1628, he de- scribes a conversation with the Prince of Conde in which he maintained that Christ's Kingdom was not of this world, and that religion was con- cerned with heavenly things, while government was of this world and that therefore religion and government could neither meet nor conflict. This amounted to making the safety or preservation of the state the only moral imperative of government. Even an anti-Machiavellian like Cam- panella was obliged to acknowledge that the Jews had been defeated when they refused to fight on the Sabbath so that the Maccabees had held that 'in times of necessity, men must always fight', thus showing there was a raison d'etat. That kingdom which he nominated to realize his City of the Sun (1602) (first Spain, Monarchia Hispanica, 1620, then France, Monarchie de He Nationi, 1635) was to be allowed raison d'etat. In Spain Suarez' and Bellarmine's ideas triumphed with the crown's approval. They were adapted to the particular circumstances of Spain by some fifty political writers, including Jesuits, lawyers, judges, councillors, soldiers and ambassadors. They wrote mostly in Spanish, but a still 117 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR wider audience could be reached by translating political maxims into visual emblems. Thus the clock became the symbol of the king keeping the various wheels in unison, while a river divided into many branches illustrated the maxim that division of forces weakens. Besides books of emblems such as F. D. Saavedra's Political Idea of a Christian Prince Expressed in a Hundred and One Symbols (Paris, 1660), there were pro- cessions with tableaux and epigrams of political import at all the chief festivals in Spain and the Spanish possessions. Their significance was further expounded by books such as Martinez de Herrera's The Wise Prince followed by an explanation of the epigrams produced at Naples for the feast of St John (1631). Nearly all Spanish writers used Bodin's idea of sovereignty, especially D. Tovar Valderrama (Instituciones Politicas, 1645). Nearly all allowed the king full authority over the lives and goods of his subjects, to break laws and customs, to dispense with them and to change them according to the necessities of government. Nearly all agreed that the king was the vicar of God, a god on earth, that he ought to be an example to his subjects and govern according to God's will for the glory of God and the common weal, respecting natural laws and the law of nations and ordinarily acting according to the laws which he had made. A royal officer ought not to execute a king's orders if they were against conscience, against God's commands and the teachings of the church. But they did not conceive of organs for limiting princely power, since sovereignty could not be limited. The limits came from the very structure of princely power and the natural order in which it was exercised; 'the crown's circumference was drawn with justice as its centre' (Saavedra Fajardo, Idea of a Politic Christian Prince, 1640). Thus the prince's education was a major political matter. He should be instructed always to make use of his council. If he was inadequate to the crushing tasks demanded of an absolute prince so that he had to make use of a favourite as his deputy, at least he should guard against favouritism. His subjects owed him obe- dience and love, whatever his personal merit, for he was the mystical symbol through whom the citizens had communion and through whom the individual thought and wills of society were harmonized. The Spaniards sought in Tacitus natural rules for the governments of states and interpreted them in the light of Thomism. They distinguished between Machiavelli's false raison d'e~tat and the true one, agreeable to divine law. By prayers and virtuous actions the king protected himself from political evil as from sin, but raison d'etat allowed him to crush revolts without recourse to judicial process, since all means were justified in order to preserve order and authority. If the king became a tyrant he must be endured, as God's punishment for the people's sins, and not resisted: 'to kill the King is an execrable crime' (Quevedo, Politica de Dios, 1626). On these points all the authors agreed. Spanish political 118 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EXPONENTS AND CRITICS OF ABSOLUTISM books were commonly read in France; many were printed at Rouen, or Paris, either in Spanish, or in Latin and French translations. France was the kingdom where the king was most absolute and the doctrine of absolutism reached its height, while neothomist influence was more circumspect. Men of the robe, counsellors in the Conseil du Roi, like Cardin le Bret (De la Souverainete du Roi, 1632), courtiers like the royal historiographer Andre du Chesne (Les antiquites et recherches de la grandeur et majeste des Rois de France, 1610), royal or seigneurial officers like Charles Loyseau (Oeuvres, 1610), agreed with Suarez and Bellarmine in seeing the state as a moral organism, a mystical body, part of the order and hierarchy of the universe, created by God. They were all disciples of Bodin and emphasized sovereignty more strongly than authors from other countries: Sovereignty cannot be separated from the state; should this happen, there would no longer be a state. Sovereignty is the form which gives being to the state, the state and sovereignty, taken in concrete are synonyms and the state is so called, because sovereignty is the fulfilment and expression of that power whereby the state is necessarily ordained and established... [Sovereignty] consists of absolute power... perfect, complete in every respect... and just as the crown cannot exist unless it is an unbroken circle, so sovereignty would not exist, if it lacks anything. Thus the state and the sovereign who personifies it has absolute power. The king alone has power to legislate, to give privileges, to create offices, render justice, coin moneys,' levy taxes without the consent of the Estates', since the prince's authority covers goods as well as persons and he can use them for the 'rightful service and needs of the people'. Thus wrote Loyseau in his Traite des Seigneuries and le Bret repeated it in different terms. These writers also insisted upon the divine and sacerdotal character of the king of France, especially at moments of crisis, such as the Day of Dupes, or the Fronde. The Kings of France are Kings, elected and chosen by God, Kings after His own heart, who, thanks to the divinity that His finger has printed on their face, have the honour of being at the head of the kings of all Christendom. Kings are the living images of God ... like earthly divinities . . . our great kings have never been con- sidered simply as laymen, but as endowed both with priesthood and royalty (du Chesne). They recalled the episcopal function at the coronation with 'the heavenly liquid brought by an Angel in the Sainte-Ampoule at the baptism of Clovis' as well as the French kings' power to perform miracles, or to heal scrofula by their touch. Their healing powers brought thousands of sick from all over France as well as from all parts of Europe, to the jealousy of other kings. On 13 November 1625 the bishop of Chartres in the name of the assembly of the clergy declared 'That kings are ordained by God and that furthermore they themselves are gods'. No hand should be laid on the king and he must not even be criticized. Moreover raison d'etat .. "9 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR allowed them to demand an almost passive obedience in most cases. As le Bret put it: To know whether obedience is due to commands which, although they seem unjust, have the welfare of the state as their constant object, as if the prince should com- mand the killing of someone who was notoriously rebellious, factious and seditious. My opinion is that on such occasions one should obey without reservation . . . all such orders should be judged just, or unjust, according to the advantage or disadvan- tage that the state might receive from their execution... Is a man, whose conscience tells him that what the king orders him to do is unjust bound to obey ? . . . He ought to follow the king's will not his o w n . . . If it is an occasion when urgent assistance is required for the common weal, resistance . . . would be pure disobedience. Neces- sitas omnem legem frangit. .. Thus the French went much further in the direction of absolutism than the Spaniards. However, these Frenchmen distinguished between absolutism and despotism and considered themselves free men protected by guarantees. There were the fundamental laws, of which the first was the Salic law 'written upon the hearts of Frenchmen . . . born with us . . . arising from nature itself (Bignon). This ensured hereditary succession by male primo- geniture, prevented elections, or the nomination of his successor by the king, and so avoided murders, vengeance and civil wars. This law bound the king who could not change it; without it there would have been no king. Next the king ought to respect natural law, especially property rights, personal liberty and the sacredness of contracts. But imprisonment by royal lettres de cachet did not seem to them to violate individual liberty, since the king was the supreme judge. Finally the king ought to respect God's commandments and to treat his subjects with the goodness and justice of God on pain of calamities in this world and of punishment in the next. Most, but not all, Frenchmen accepted these views. In 1611 Turquet de Mayerne, a Protestant from a family of merchants and doctors who had become landowners and been ennobled, published the Monarchic Aristo- Democratique, dedicated to the States General of the United Netherlands. He advocated the disappearance of the ancient military nobility and that merchants and members of the liberal professions, agripossesseurs, should have the first place in the state, provide its officials and have sovereign powers. They would make a contract with the king who would swear to maintain each in his rank and possessions. Estates General, whose mem- bers were agripossesseurs, indirectly elected, would meet regularly, legis- late, vote taxes and control their expenditure, make war, peace and alliances, appoint commissioners to supervise the administration, control the membership of the king's council, which would be reduced to a purely executive role, and finally would control the militia of armed bourgeois. The state would thus be the agent of the bourgeois class. The 120 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EXPONENTS AND CRITICS OF ABSOLUTISM book was well received by Parisian bourgeoisie, but was suppressed by the king's council, though it was remembered again on the eve of the Fronde. Other anti-absolutist views, stressing the fundamental laws, reappeared periodically during the minorities of Louis XIII and Louis XIV, especially during the Fronde (1648-53). The princes of the blood were prepared to accept sovereignty and raison d'etat, provided they shared power with the king. They invoked 'the ancient constitution' and demanded a council composed of princes of the blood, the other princes and of the great officers of state, instead of one freely chosen by the king. Above all, they wanted the subordination of the robe and the exclusion of favourites, such as Richelieu or Mazarin, men devoted to the king and apt instru- ments of absolutism. During minorities they demanded that a council of magnates should exercise absolute power to the exclusion of women (Marie de Medici, Anne of Austria) and foreigners (Concini, Mazarin). The nobility as a whole was opposed to any conception of sovereignty and raison d'etat and only demanded the summoning of the Estates General according to their petition of 28 February 1651, in order to preserve' the franchises, honours, rights and immunities of our order and to re-establish ourselves in our former lustre'. They wanted to preserve feudal relics and to prevent the fulfilment of the state. The Parlement of Paris, although merely a court of justice, in its decree of 21 May 1615, in the Arret d'Union of 13 May 1648, and in pamphlets during the Fronde, declared itself the king's true council, his 'throne', as heir of the old curia regis and of the Frankish assemblies. Thus the king needed its assent for all important acts of government; it claimed legis- lative power, the right to consider, amend, reject, and vote freely upon royal edicts and ordinances, without having their registration enforced by /// de justice. The Parlement even wished to have immediate knowledge of all state affairs, to summon at will the princes of the blood, the lay and ecclesiastical peers, the great officers of state, and the councillors of state to form the curia regis and a substitute for the Estates General. In 1652, during the civil war, the Parlement, as a substitute for the Estates General and as heir of the general assembly of the Franks which had conferred sovereignty on Pharamond (!), went so far as to claim the right to entrust the royal authority to whomsoever it wished and to make final decisions on all matters, since it was 'the depository and as it were the perpetual guardian of sovereign authority'. The Parlement aimed at judicial absolutism with the courts exercising sovereign power. Others dreamed of transforming the kingdom into a Standestaat. Claude Joly was the most celebrated of these. He was a canon of Notre Dame who had seen the German states for himself when attending the Congress of Munster. He used history and the fundamental laws to argue that the monarchy was contractual in his Recueil de Maximes veritables et importants in 1652. The peoples had set up kings, had made contracts 121 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR with them and had granted them full power on condition that kings pro- tected them and gave them justice. God ratified this contract and the prince's authority derived immediately from this. But it follows that royal power was 'limited and restricted', while the form of government should be aristocratic. The Estates General watched over the maintenance of the 'ancient customs, laws and ordinances' thus guaranteeing each man's intangible rights. The Estates would vote taxes and appoint commis- sioners and receivers to raise them, exclude evil councillors, and together with the king they would decide on war and peace. They would meet at regular intervals and between sessions their deputies would supervise the carrying out of their decisions. Judicial officers would no longer be royal nominees; existing officers would choose three candidates for each vacant place from whom the king would select one. Joly seems to have foreseen that the other royal officials would be accountable for their actions to the courts. Finally the Parlement would still verify all royal acts and with the other sovereign courts would form a commission to judge any breaches of the Estates General's acts by royal officials. Thus the executive power would be under the control of the judiciary. The king must govern without favourites and be his own first minister. He should do nothing without a council of wise men from which cardinals, bishops, and foreigners would be excluded; while foreigners would be excluded from all employment and benefices. The realization of these ideas was pre- vented by the anarchy of the Fronde, which emphasized the need for order and security and so assisted the triumph of absolutism. Absolutism was also a problem in Sweden, where the Charter of 1612 had consolidated the Stiindestaat, but Gustavus Adolphus was deeply influenced by the Lutheran conception of princely power. He also learnt the neo-Stoic ideas of Justus Lipsius from Daniel Heinsius, a professor at Leiden, who in 1618 became his councillor and historiographer, and from Johann Skytte. Lipsius was a Deist and does not mention Christ; for him religion consists of acting according to the will of God. Man functions in a community devised for the common good, the state. Monarchy is the most natural and reasonable form of state. The prince is above the people and ought to have an absolute power which should be patriarchal, having the welfare and prosperity of his subjects as its object. The prince should observe the law, and Lipsius protested against Bodin's formula rex legibus solutus. The prince ought always to listen to the advice of his council, but should make decisions himself. Lipsius agreed with Seneca that necessitas omnem legem frangit. Such prudent and moderate views suited Gustavus Adolphus. He respected constitu- tional forms and was ready to share sovereignty with the Estates, but also knew how to impose his policy on the four Estates of the Riksdag by presenting himself as the champion of Lutheranism and the fatherland against Poland and the emperor, and so achieved a patriarchal absolutism. 122 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EXPONENTS AND CRITICS OF ABSOLUTISM After 1625 he was much influenced by Grotius, who maintained that sovereignty belonged to the prince and that the people had no right to check or punish him, if he misused his authority (De Jure Belli ac Pads, i,3). Queen Christina also surrounded herself with Netherlanders and Ger- mans and was deeply influenced by neo-Stoicism, but she adopted the French theory of absolutism and tried to introduce it in practice. She was always convinced that an absolute sovereign was responsible to God alone, while the example of Richelieu and Mazarin convinced her that royal sovereign power needed to be joined with absolute spiritual authority to function effectively. In her act of abdication she reserved absolute sovereignty to herself over all the members of her court. She used this power when she herself accused and tried Monaldeschi and had him executed. But like Descartes, Corneille, Retz, and Louis XIV, she under- stood that to claim such sovereignty implied taking the ideal hero as a model. His freedom came from strict control of passions; acting on clear and distinct ideas he takes decisions from which he never retreats, what- ever their consequences. The conquest of power by being perfect mistress of herself and an unswerving pursuit of her goal was her ideal. Probably she thought of her abdication as a means to this end, since freedom and victory over self provided authority of a higher order than did possession of a crown. In the northern Netherlands problems of absolutism occurred in each province, for the provincial Estates were not truly sovereign in view of the conflicting privileges of towns and nobles. The union between the pro- vinces was only a loose federation; any decision of the Estates General implied unanimity from deputies of the provincial Estates who were bound by strict mandate. In practice, any decision seemed to require a referendum involving some 1,200 persons. Many thought that the pro- vincial Estates ought to be sovereign and such people, usually members of the urban oligarchies, found the theories of Althusius satisfactory. Many wanted a centralized sovereignty. The stadtholder, whose office was hereditary in the House of Orange, retained some of the attributes of sovereignty; Maurice of Nassau hoped to increase his power and so was led to ally with the Gomarists, who were strict Calvinists, against the Arminians, supporters of free will and toleration. Strict Calvinism favoured absolutism in a prince who was a good Calvinist and the existence of a sovereign power above the provincial estates in order to impose religious uniformity. The Arminians such as Oldenbarnevelt, the Grand Pensionary of Holland, asserted the sovereignty of the provincial Estates, since in practice this ensured Holland's preponderance in the States General. After the triumph of the Gomarists at the Synod of Dordrecht (1619), the execution of Oldenbarnevelt and the flight of Grotius, Maurice of Nassau named regents and chose the pensionary 123 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR from a list of three candidates. His power was much greater, but he was very far from being an absolute prince. The problems of sovereignty and absolutism remained continuing issues within this federative republic. In the southern Netherlands neo-Stoic and neo-Thomist views were dominant, despite Jansenism, thanks to the University of Louvain. In England between 1600 and 1640 the predominant notion was still that of a body of rights, possessed by corporations and individuals, according to their social function. The king possessed rights, guaranteed by 'fundamental laws' which were part of the common law. The king's power appeared to be primarily judicial, as did that of Parliament, the supreme court of the kingdom, whose role was to declare and apply already existing law rather than to make laws. Everyone spoke of these fundamental laws and took them for granted without explaining precisely what they were. James I recognized their existence and told Parliament in 1610 that the law had placed the crown on his head and that he was king by the common law of the realm. In The Trew Law of Free Monar- chies he had written that the first and most fundamental law was the coronation oath which obliged the king to maintain the established religion, cherish good laws, preserve each man's privileges and liberties, and to seek the common weal. This he said yi 1609 was primarily con- cerned with private property, meum ac tuum. Seneca's phrase, ad reges potestas omnium pertinet, ad singulos proprietas, was often cited. Sir Dudley Digges said at a conference of the Lords and Commons in 1628 concerning resistance to forced loans: It is an undoubted and fundamental point of this so ancient a Law of England, that the subjects have a true property in their goods, lands and possessions. The law preserves as sacred this Meum and Tuum which is the Nurse of Industry and Mother of Courage; for, if no Property, no Care of defence. Without this Meum and Tuum, there can be neither Law nor Justice in a Kingdom; for this is the proper object of both. This individual right of property extends to a man's own body and so produces personal freedom. Thus, 'Every free subject of this realm hath a fundamental propriety in his goods and a fundamental liberty of his per- son. ' The fundamental laws naturally included those rights which were necessary to enable the king to govern: his absolute power, his preroga- tive, in certain matters. These were matters of state, cases of urgency or involving the being, welfare, or property of the state, thus including everything essentially concerned with foreign policy, war and peace, the army and navy, coinage, regulation of industry and supplies necessary for defence, public order and in case of necessity, any matter. Parliament had a duty to watch over the fundamental laws. It consisted of three Estates; traditionally these were the Lords spiritual and temporal and the Com- mons, though some already held the view, preponderant after 1642, that they were King, Lords and Commons. Parliament could not infringe 124 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EXPONENTS AND CRITICS OF ABSOLUTISM the king's rights guaranteed by fundamental law for 'no Act of Parliament can bar a King of his Regality' (Sir John Finch). Neither James I nor Charles I directly challenged these fundamental laws. In levying ship money Charles I claimed to be driven by necessity and thus had not violated the ordinary sacred rights of property. But they did seek to extend the scope of their absolute power and stressed funda- mental principles of monarchy. James I said that 'Kings are justly called gods, they are God's lieutenants sitting upon his throne on earth'. In the sphere of their prerogative their powers are unlimited; as Samuel told the Jews, 'the king could take their sons as soldiers or servants and give away their fields and vineyards'. The people should obey the king's demands in all things, except directly against God, as the commands of God's Minister, acknowledging him a Judge set by God over them, having power to judge them, but to be judged only by God to whom only he must give account of his judgement... praying to him as their protector, for his continuance if he be good; for his amendment if he be wicked; following and obeying his lawful commands, eschewing and flying his fury in his unlawful commands, without resistance, but by sobs and tears to God . . . The Anglican clergy, including many Puritans, preached that monarchy was the best form of government, that the king's power came immediately from God, that the king was responsible for the safety of his kingdoms and was furnished with a discretionary power to this end which was absolute. Down to 1640, nearly everyone accepted such views, including leaders of the Parliamentary opposition: Pym in 1621 and Coryton in 1628 said, 'the King hath the power of God'. But men resisted any extension of absolute power, whether inspired by social changes in England, or by continental examples, or by any ideas of the school of natural law, or those of Bodin who was much read in England, or by those invoking raison d'etat. The boundaries between the king's rights and those of the subject were extremely vague. The opposition leaders could find nothing in the common law in 1610 which clearly forbade the king to take the property of his subjects by means of impositions on trade and nothing in 1628 which forbade him to imprison their persons. The law could be adapted to suit any case. Opposition became embittered in so far as the individual's rights no longer came to be considered as privileges arising from a parti- cular situation, but as absolute rights, derived from general principles. On the king's side some of the clergy brought out the plenitude of the king's sovereign power, as did Dickinson in his sermon The King's Right (1619), Manwaring in two sermons in July 1627 told Charles I his sovereign will gave binding legal force to 'Royal Edicts concluded out of Reasons of State' and in 1614 W. Goodwin had declared that the king was Ipse solutus legibus. Some royal judges (Sir Thomas Fleming in Bate's Case, 1606; Sir John Da vies in his treatise on impositions; Sir Robert 125 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR Heath in Darnel's Case, 1627; Sir John Banks, the Case of Ship Money, 1637) tried to extend the royal prerogative, especially in the direction of giving the king autonomous power to impose taxes. They wished to show that the common law was equivalent to divine law, to natural law and to the law of reason, which laid down the principles of monarchical rule, so that according to the common law 'Rex is Lex', and that the king could rule like an emperor, since salus populi suprema lex. Davies even argued that by natural law all things were common and that the king, by limiting the absolute power given him by the law of nations, had as an act of grace created private property, which remained fundamental, but was under positive law and subject to raison d'etat. The theorists and lawyers of the opposition followed the same proce- dure in an opposite direction, identifying the fundamental laws with natural law and the law of reason. Sir Edward Coke, in Bonham's Case, said: '. . . in many cases the common law will control acts of parliament and sometimes adjudge them to be utterly void: for when an act of parlia- ment is against common right and reason, or repugnant, or impossible to be performed, the common law will control it and adjudge such an act to be void'. Natural law, reason and the common law agree that a man cannot be judge in his own case. Thus the College of Physicians was not competent to condemn Bonham. Chief Justice Hobart (Day v. Savadge) and Sir John Davies {Le premier report des cases et matters en ley, 1615) argued that the laws of nature are immutable and sacred, the touchstone of laws, identical with reason and the foundation of the common law, so that any Act of Parliament, or still more of the king alone, contrary to them, is void. For Coke the essence of the common law, as of all law, was reason, showing itself constantly in the life of a nation. The judges declared the law according to the dictates of reason. Coke also created a historical myth that the pure law of the Saxons, corrupted by the Norman Conquest, had begun to revive with Magna Carta and was now to be made the basis of the state by Parliament. Coke had been dismissed from the chief justiceship by James I in 1616, but became a member of the parliaments of the 1620s and a principal author of the Petition of Right. He wrote the Institutes of the Laws of England of which the first part appeared in 1628, the rest only being published in June 1642 by Parliament. The opponents of Charles I constantly invoked fundamental law in this wide sense to show that property and liberty were absolute and inviolable rights. The difficulty was that the rival theorists pitted one set of absolute rights against another. Their impeachments accused Strafford, Laud, and Sir Robert Berkeley of having 'endeavoured to subvert the fundamental laws and established government of the realm of England'. In 1641 the Grand Remonstrance claimed all mischiefs were due to a ' . . . pernicious design of subverting the fundamental laws and principles of government 126 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EXPONENTS AND CRITICS OF ABSOLUTISM upon which the religion and justice of this kingdom are firmly established'. Charles I was condemned to death in 1649 for his 'wicked design to subvert the ancient and fundamental laws and liberties of this nation and in their place to introduce an arbitrary and tyrannical government'. Puritanism played a large part in resistance to the crown, although until 1640 Puritan preachers expressed no very distinctive political views. But to many Puritans the king was not a hero, a living god, exalted above the subject masses. He was depraved, like all men, and might be inferior to those roused directly by God's grace to struggle against sin. God's elect were not necessarily the great of this world; the sign of election was experience of spiritual conflict, not worldly learning. They were saints, made kings and priests by justification, whose characteristic was to follow their consciences whatever the cost. A king who was not one of the saints was in a weak position. Some Puritans while maintaining the supremacy of faith and revelation gave great weight to reason and nature, claiming that the principles of the common law supported the doctrine of predestination (J. Preston, The New Covenant, 1629; Life Eternal, 1631); they insisted that obedience was due to God rather than the king, that God was the true king of England. As they were not free to follow then- ideas of church order within the Anglican church, they were opposed to the bishops and so to the king. Puritan feeling helped to rouse opposition and was the motive force in the Long Parliament, when preaching was freed and many public fasts, accompanied by sermons, were ordained. The preachers applied to Charles I what the Bible said of wicked kings, repeated that human laws did not bind conscience and told members of Parliament that they were agents of God, replacing the king as his lieutenant. They recalled that government according to divine and natural law rested on a compact made by the people for satisfaction of their natural needs and was to be obeyed only as long as it observed that com- pact and God's commands. After 1640 Parliament exercised an arbitrary, absolute and truly sovereign power of which the kings had only dreamed, helped by ideas of using sovereignty and raison d'etat in the name of the people. Unable to condemn Strafford by due process of law, Parliament had invoked necessity and public safety. Similarly, in justifying their ordinance taking control of the militia from the king, they declared that Parliament was not only a court of judicature, but also ' a counsel to provide for the necessities, prevent the imminent dangers and preserve the public peace and safety of the kingdom and to declare the king's pleasure in those things that are requisite thereunto'. Parliament ruled absolutely, but refused to proclaim its sovereignty; though Henry Parker, secretary to the Parliamentary army, in his Animadversions (1642) asserted 'the sovereign power resides in both houses of Parliament, the king having no negative voice'; while William Prynne in The Sovereign Power of Parliaments and 127 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR Kingdoms (1643) saw kings as 'but servants to, not absolute lords over their kingdoms in whom the legislative power and authority resides'. An anonymous pamphleteer {Touching the Fundamental Laws) found the court of Parliament'... fundamental and paramount, comprehending law and equity, and being entrusted by the whole for the whole, is not therefore to be circumscribed by any other laws which have their being from it, nor it from them, but only by that law which at first gave it its being . . . salus populV. Charles, in answering the declaration of 19 May 1642, was justi- fied in complaining that the will of the majority at Westminster had dis- placed the law and was asserting an absolute and arbitrary power. Puritans saw the history of the world as a struggle between Christ and anti-Christ for men's souls and identified the victory of Parliament with that of Christ. In setting up a presbyterian system of church government (1646), Parliament found its sovereignty challenged by Puritan dissidents. Puritan preachers had appealed to the claims of the individual conscience; some now held that any man could be saved if he would accept God's grace; others that as long as a man believed in God and the Bible, errors must be tolerated. The dissidents claimed liberty for tender consciences to group themselves freely in congregations and under ministers outside the presbyterian system. They were numerous in the New Model Army, where there were groups denying predestination, believing in the immedi- ate and absolute effects of grace, in the religion of the Holy Spirit, rejecting the laws of all former dispensations, or expecting the second coming. The most extreme denied the magistrate any power in religion and demanded complete freedom of preaching and printing. All the dis- sidents feared that Parliament would impose religious uniformity and were ready to resist its claims to absolute authority. From 1646 a group whose revolutionary demands led their enemies to call them Levellers formed round Lilburne, Walwyn and Overton in London. Lilburne rebuked Parliament for refusing the people freedom in religion, the press and trade and so tyrannically violating the natural rights of Englishmen. He appealed once more to the fundamental laws, identified with the laws of God, nature and reason. Overton in 1646 declared all men equal. Nature revealed to each man's reason what was necessary for his good. Each had a natural right to property and liberty and was king, priest and prophet according to the order of nature. Members of Parliament were deputies of the people and could not violate individual rights, the just prerogatives of all mankind. Walwyn equated king and parliament, saying that for the Levellers 'it is all one to them who oppressed them'. Their political programme {The Agreement of the People) included biennial parliaments, equality before the law, the vote for all who were not paupers or servants, redistribution of seats in proportion to density of population, freedom to meet, speak, publish, and to petition Parliament upon any subject. 128 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EXPONENTS AND CRITICS OF ABSOLUTISM When Parliament attempted to rid itself of the New Model Army, the agitators elected by the troops adopted the Leveller programme, although Cromwell and Ireton considered that it threatened property rights. At the Putney Debates in 1647 Ireton said that if all men had the vote by 'the right of nature', then' you must deny all property too'; for if' a man hath an equal right with another to the choosing him that shall govern him— by the same right of nature he hath the same right in any goods he sees . . . ' 'Here is the most fundamental part of the constitution of the kingdom, which if you take away, you take away all.' Ireton wished to limit the parliamentary franchise to those with 'a local, a permanent interest in the kingdom', freeholders, freemen of towns and gentry. Ireton and Cromwell did not believe that complete toleration, if this meant denying the magistrate any authority in religion, was possible. They found Lilburne's democratic method of defending natural rights unacceptable. Cromwell preferred some- thing nearer to the traditional constitution and re-established discipline in the army. At the end of 1648 after some hesitation they broke finally with the Levellers and chose to accept the purged Parliament, the Rump, as the instrument of the godly. On 4 January 1649 the Rump resolved that the People are, under God the Original of all just Power... that the Commons of England in Parliament assembled being chosen by, and representing, the People have the supreme Power in this Nation.. . That whatsoever is enacted, or declared for Law by the Commons, in Parliament assembled hath the Force of Law; and all the People of this Nation are concluded thereby, although the Consent... of King, or House of Peers be not had thereunto. Ideas of sovereignty and raison d'etat had triumphed. Some supporters of the king turned arguments from fundamental laws against Parliament. Sir Robert Filmer in Patriarcha or the Natural Power of Kings (written before 1642) used natural law as revealed by scripture and history to justify royal absolutism as of patriarchal origin. The first government was Adam's over his family, followed by Noah's over his sons. Patriarchs had an absolute power which came from God, not from the votes of their children. Kings had the same absolute patriar- chal power over their subjects that Noah had over his sons. But the most formidable defender of absolutism was Hobbes. Before 1637 he had begun a general treatise on nature and man, founded on materialist and mechanistic principles. As a known defender of absolutism, he took refuge in France in 1640, where his De Cive was published in 1642. His masterpiece Leviathan was written in Paris, but published in 1651 in London, whither Hobbes returned, submitting to the Common- wealth. Hobbes did not believe that man was naturally a social animal. His natural state was war of 'everyone against everyone'. Men are approximately equal in ability and in hopes of attaining their ends. If one is stronger, the weaker can defeat him by ruses or by joining with others. In pursuit of 'their End (which is principally their own conservation . . . ) 129 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR [they] endeavour to destroy or subdue one another'. In this state of war, nothing can be unjust, because there is no law, which needs a common power to keep all in awe; 'everything is his which getteth it and keepeth it by force; which is neither Propriety, nor Community; but Uncertainty'. Men wish to escape from this miserable state. Their reason, given them by God, shows them laws of nature, 'Justice, Equity, Modesty, Mercy and (in summe) doing to others as we would be done to', which would ensure peace. But men will only keep these laws when they can do so safely. 'Covenants without the Sword are but Words', so they must erect a common power to enforce obedience, reduce all their wills to one. This is more than consent, it is a covenant whereby each 'gives up my Right of governing myself, to this Man, or to this Assembly of men, on this condi- tion, that thou give up thy Right to him and Authorise all his Actions in like manner'. This creates the state, 'that great Leviathan . . . to which we owe . . . our peace and defence', the essence of which is the exercise of sovereign power 'as great as possibly men can be imagined to make it'. The sovereign, whether a man or an assembly, has the right to raise troops, administer justice, make war and peace, legislate, appoint judges and officials and to forbid opinions and doctrines considered dangerous. Division of sovereign power, or belief in absolute individual rights, such as property rights, will destroy the state. Once conferred and established, sovereignty cannot be denied, limited, or repudiated. It can be exercised in three types of state: democracy, aristocracy, and monarchy, whose difference is not one of power, but of aptitude' to produce the Peace and Security of the people'. The aptest is monarchy, provided it is absolute. Hobbes had transformed the theory of contract and so influenced Locke and Rousseau. His work also had an immediate success. In France, Mersenne and Gassendi recommended De Cive,' this rare work... of the in- comparable M. Hobbes', to Sorbiere. The first edition was soon exhausted, as was the second, published by Sorbiere at the Hague in 1647. Sorbiere published a French translation in 1649 which went through three editions that year. He also translated De Corpore Politico, publishing it in 1652. Thus absolutism made considerable progress from 1610 to 1651, thanks to the influence of various embodiments of ideas of sovereignty and raison d'etat. But there was a striking change in methods of argument. Suarez, Bellarmine, the neo-Thomists and their disciples, had mainly used the scholastic procedure of deduction starting from axioms pro- vided by metaphysics and theology. Their politics was a science, because it was purely rational, a knowledge founded on essences and real causes. They used history simply to verify and confirm these results by experience. But there were others more in tune with the new philosophy, like Turquet de Mayerne and Loyseau in France, Alamos in Spain, or Hobbes in England, who used induction. From a knowledge of particular instances they devised categories including them and general laws governing them. 130 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EXPONENTS AND CRITICS OF ABSOLUTISM Many facts were obtained by historical studies, but many also by observ- ing their own societies, as Turquet de Mayerne and Hobbes so strikingly did. They were also remarkable for being deeply concerned in the scientific movement of their time. Turquet de Mayerne, like the neo-Pythagoreans and the disciples of Archimedes of the sixteenth century and Galileo and the mechanists in the seventeenth, believed that mathematics was the key to nature. Hobbes held similar views; he had been a familiar of Bacon, was an admirer of Copernicus, Galileo and Harvey and was himself a mechanist. From 1634 to 1636 he associated with the leading mechanists, Mersenne, Descartes, Gassendi at Paris, and visited Galileo in Italy. He published a little treatise in 1637 in which he explained sensations as variations in movement and in 1646 a treatise on optics. For such men political science had a character different from that recognized by the neo-Thomists. It was a practical science which provided knowledge of how things happened and interacted and how they might be controlled; they were not concerned with the essence and formal causes of things. The word cause changed its meaning, the final causes which had dominated the constructions of Suarez and Bellarmine were eliminated, while efficient causes became simply varying arrangements of facts. Political science was transformed by the substitution of mechanistic for Aristotelian methods. Suarez, Bellarmine and the neo-Thomists, as heirs of the biologist Aristotle, saw the state as an organism whose general character they grasped at first sight; men who by nature were social animals were forced to choose a body politic and were bound by the laws of its functioning. Thus the choice of a particular kind of body politic arose from con- sensus, not contract. But Turquet de Mayerne, and Hobbes were accus- tomed through application of mathematics to the natural sciences to abstracting simple material elements, to seeking their connections, prefer- ably materially verifiable, measurable ones. Men were individuals whose egoistic concerns forced them to associate with each other, while making free use of the full scope of natural laws to form contracts. In the last resort everything in social and international relations depended upon contracts and conventions. Everything was a matter of convention, of adjusting mechanisms which might differ in themselves, yet produce the same results. The neo-Thomists' practice produced a limited and finite number of political forms and categories which corresponded with the Aristotelian conception of a finite and limited cosmos with a fixed number of kinds and species. Although Hobbes retained the old classifications into mon- archy, aristocracy and democracy, his approach in principle opened up unlimited possibilities of creating new political and social forms. This fitted in with the conception of the universe as heliocentric and infinite, held together solely by the uniformity of its laws. Political ideas were not merely linked to political, social and economic situations, but were a function of the whole of European civilization. 131 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHAPTER IV THE SCIENTIFIC MOVEMENT AND ITS INFLUENCE 1610-50 EARLY all Galileo Galilei's (1564-1642) intellectual contem- poraries would have agreed with his dramatic declaration that in order to introduce a new philosophy 'it will be first necessary to new-mold the brains of men, and make them apt to distinguish truth from falsehood'. 1 They called for a revolution in thinking about nature that would still be far in advance of results at the mid-century, but no previous generation had had so much reason to believe that it had at last acquired a method which, by correcting its own errors, offered the certainty of discovering the one actual structure of the physical world. Older habits of erudition and speculation in natural philosophy were losing their appeal and were being replaced by the practice of systematic research. The promise and achievements of the enterprise gave fresh confidence to appeals for conditions making such research possible, for more adequate provision for natural science in the universities and in new institutions, and for money to be spent on science in the public interest. To a large extent the new science was establishing itself on the margins of official learning and recognized professional activities. This is reflected in the diversity of the occupations and social origins of the men engaged in science and the conditions in which they carried out their scientific work. Central to the traditional profession of learning were those holding academic posts in the faculties of arts or of medicine in universities or in newer institutions such as the College de France in Paris and Gresham College in London. If we include the minor figures this remained the largest single group. Yet the list of scientists who had no full-time aca- demic post is equally impressive. Some of these, for example Simon Stevin (1548-1620) and Johann Kepler (1571-1630), and Galileo in later life, were employed by governments or great patrons specifically for scientific work. A much larger number earned their living wholly or in part in professions related to science. Many of these were practising physicians like William Harvey (1578-1657), J. B. van Helmont (C.1580-C.1644) and Jean Rey (C.1582-C.1645). Some engaged in other 'learned' practical professions as engineers, architects, or surveyors, like Stevin, Cornelis Drebbel (1572-1634) and Gerard Desargues (1593-1662). Others, lower down in the hierarchy of learning, practised as surgeons or as apothe- N 1 Galileo, Dialogo sopra i due massimi sistemi del mondo I (1632), in Opere, ed. naz. Vol. 7 (Florence, 1897), p. 82; Thomas Salusbury, Mathematical collections and translations (London, 1661), p. 43. 132 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SCIENTIFIC MOVEMENT AND ITS INFLUENCE caries like the chemist Rudolf Glauber (1604-70), as lens-grinders or as instrument makers like Joost Burgi (1552-1632), or as teachers of 'practi- cal mathematics' and other practical subjects outside the universities. But a great many of the scientists of the period owed their principal livelihood to wholly non-scientific sources. These included officials like Pierre Fermat (1601-65), conseilleur du Parlement de Toulouse, and Otto von Guericke (1602-68), mayor of Magdeburg; gentlemen of private means such as Rene Descartes (1596-1650), John Napier (1550-1617), Blaise Pascal (1623-62) and Nicolas Claude Fabri de Peiresc (1580-1637); and many clerics: regulars like the JesuatBonaventuraCavalieri (1598-1647) and the Jesuit Christoph Scheiner (1575-1650), and Marin Mersenne (1588-1648), a Minim friar; beneficed seculars like Pierre Gassendi (1592-1655); and Anglican country parsons like William Oughtred (157 5-1660) and Jeremiah Horrox (1617-41). Critics of the state of scientific learning in the early seventeenth century were largely in agreement in their diagnoses of its alleged ailments and their causes. The most systematic critic was Francis Bacon. In The advance- ment of learning (1695) and later in the Novum organum (1620) and in the preface to the Instauratio magna (1620-3), Bacon presented his diagnosis of present ills through an interpretation of the history of learning. He found only three societies in which, for short periods, the sciences had progressed: among the Greeks and the Romans in antiquity, and among the modern nations of western Europe. But even in those relatively favourable periods progress had faltered. In present times practitioners of the mechanical arts had fared best because of their close contact with practical experience, but they took no account of larger theoretical issues; by contrast, philosophers spinning out theoretical systems without reference to experimental facts had discovered nothing new. Bacon pointed out that each side lost by remaining ignorant of the other's problems; his own proposal for an experimental 'inquisition of nature' 1 was offered as a method of discovery that would provide both explanations of nature and a rational basis for technology. The failure of the theoretical sciences to search for new knowledge he traced back to the failure of the contemporary university system. Contemporary scientists such as Descartes and Evangelista Torricelli (1608-47) likewise urged the extension of scientific studies in universities and the endowment of research. Criticism of the conservatism and pedantry of formal courses in the sciences became a commonplace of intellectual autobiographies of the period. Yet in spite of the criticisms of university education in science and in spite of the diversity in origins, training and occupations of the men engaged in scientific work, the leaders of the scientific movement who made the great original contribu- tions of this period were without exception university graduates. However justified the complaints against academic conservatism, it was in fact the 1 Francis Bacon, Instauratio magna, preface. 133 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR universities that produced the body of men educated to think at the abstract theoretical level where these contributions could be made. From the staple compulsory Aristotelian logic and natural philosophy of the arts course they learnt the elements of a theoretical scientific system, even though an outmoded one; those with the enterprise to go beyond this would introduce new theories making the common assumption with the old, that nature was explicable as a rational, discoverable, abstract system. Against such a background scientific innovation was intelligible, and intelligible at the most abstract theoretical level, even when not encouraged; the new philosophy made its appeal by offering a far more effective means of theoretical explanation. The other main form of scientific education available, a purely technical training in one of the skills for 'practitioners', provided no such preparation for thinking at this abstract level where the main scientific debates were taking place. The contributions made possible by such an untheoretical technical training might be indispensable for experimentation, but something more was needed to appreciate the critical bearing of an experiment on a scientific argument. It is significant that the critics of the universities were all them- selves their products, and that it was the university 'philosophers' and not the practical 'mechanics' who pointed out the scientific interest of the empirical information, instruments and problems provided by contempor- ary technology. If graduates went outside the universities to 'practi- tioners' for experimental and practical skills, it was from their university education that they learnt the meaning of creating not merely a scientific technology but a 'new experimental philosophy'. The innovators attempting to reform scientific education had to con- tend with an academic structure established in the medieval foundations and persisting generally in European universities, in spite of some con- cessions already made to new studies in literature and history. Non- experimental science had its traditional place in the mathematical quadri- vium (arithmetic, music, geometry, astronomy, with some additions such as optics) and natural philosophy of the arts course, and in the course for a professional degree in the higher faculty of medicine. Formal instruction consisted traditionally of the exposition by 'lecture' and commentary of standard texts of Euclid, Ptolemy, Aristotle, Galen and in favourable circumstances more recent authors, together with disputations in which the student defended 'theses' provided by these texts. This system weighted even medical education overwhelmingly with book-learning; in all the years of the Cambridge course only three days were given to dis- section and even so these had to be enforced under penalty. For the most part, the innovators were on common ground with the conservatives in assuming that the primary function of a university was 'the virtuous education of youth' 1 in arts and the provision of good professional train- 1 M. H. Curtis, Oxford and Cambridge in transition, 1558-1642 (Oxford, 1959), p. 83. 134 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SCIENTIFIC MOVEMENT AND ITS INFLUENCE ing in the higher faculties. The place of research in universities was to be a subject of the reforms of the nineteenth century: what the scientific reformers of the seventeenth century wanted was that universities should provide teaching for the new mathematical and experimental sciences that recognized their radical difference in content, aims and methods from the older studies and was appropriate to this different character. By 1650, indeed for long afterwards, no university had yet made statu- tory changes on a scale that came near meeting the wishes of the reformers, but opportunities for the new scientific studies had been provided both publicly and privately in many universities and in some these exerted an increasing influence. Public provision for such studies had been and con- tinued to be made through the establishment of new chairs, and through collections of mathematical, astronomical and physical instruments, chemical laboratories, and the anatomy theatres and botanical gardens which most of the larger universities possessed by 1650. The faculties of medicine were especially active in providing for their professional interest in anatomy, botany and chemistry. The new chairs in these subjects and in mathematics and natural philosophy helped to establish the sciences as independent disciplines and at the same time provided a livelihood for individuals whose researches contributed to the general advance of know- ledge and made them famous in the republic of letters at large. In addition to these public provisions, private advantage was taken in teaching of the opportunity to introduce new content into the old form of the statutory curricula. Conditions varied characteristically in different countries. Until the middle of the century the Italian universities retained their lead in offering the most professional scientific training. More than elsewhere the Italian cities provided in princely academies, the entourages of dukes and cardinals, religious houses, and the universities themselves an active scientific body of mathematicians, astronomers, experimenters, medical men and philosophers from which all could gain. The richer universities like Padua and Bologna could afford well-paid chairs in all the main scientific subjects—mathematics, astronomy, physics, anatomy, botany, surgery, medicine—and more than one specialized chair in some fields. The great medical school at Padua had brought the study of anatomy by dissection to a high degree of perfection and the distinguished succession of professors since Vesalius continued with the pupils of Hieronymo Fabrizio of Aquapendente (c.1553-1619), the great anatomical teacher of his day. Other pupils of Fabrizio had carried Paduan methods beyond the Alps to Basel, Leiden and Copenhagen; Harvey, greatest of them all, brought them to London. Also with a chair at Padua was Santorio San- torio (1561-1636), a pioneer of experimental medicine. As well as at Padua, teaching of anatomy by dissection was prescribed by statute and carried out systematically at Bologna, Pisa, the Sapienza in Rome, and 135 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR Pavia where Gasparo Aselli (i 581-1626), discoverer of the lacteal vessels, held a chair. At Bologna worked the Jesuits Giovanni Battista Riccioli (1598-1671) and Francesco Maria Grimaldi (1618-63), both skilful experimenters in physics. Pisa especially cultivated the mathematical sciences and offered courses in applied mathematics and engineering; there also the mathematician Giovanni Alfonso Borelli (1608-79), coming to a chair at the same time as Marcello Malpighi (1628-94), developed his interest in physiology. Galileo's friend Benedetto Castelli (c. 1577-1643) taught at Pisa and Rome; his most brilliant pupil, Torri- celli, succeeded Galileo at Florence. Outside Italy the universities in which the new sciences were most actively cultivated were those in the Netherlands. Courses in the mathe- matical sciences at Leiden were up to date, a good collection of 'mathe- matical instruments' was available and the mathematical professors in- cluded Willebrord Snell (1591-1626), but it was in the medical faculty that the university came to establish its reputation for scientific learning. Leiden and in less degree Utrecht came to rival the universities of north Italy in attracting foreign students. In spite of initial opposition it was in the Netherlands that the Cartesian system first took root, and from there it spread to the rest of Europe. The German universities, both Protestant and Catholic, although predominantly conservative, also took some steps to introduce the new science before the wars of religion put a temporary stop to progress. Marburg in 1609 established what was apparently the first European chair of chemistry. At Giessen there was a laboratorium chymicum in 1612 and the botanist Joachim Jung (1587-1657) held a chair of medicine. At Wiirzburg, under Jesuit control, new ideas on pathology were taught. Further anatomy theatres were built, for example at Freiburg (1620), Jena (1629) and Altdorf (1637). In neighbouring northern countries Caspar Bauhin (1550-1624), a graduate of Padua, had established the study of botany and anatomy through his double chair at Basel, and Thomas Bartholinus (1616-80) brought fame to the chair of anatomy at Copenhagen. At the other end of Europe the great university of Salamanca, which had taken a lead in the teaching of anatomy and of Copernican astronomy in the sixteenth century, seems to have lost its interest in science, but at the Casa de Contratacion, the school of naviga- tion in Seville, a good training in 'practical mathematics' could still be found. Apart from Montpellier with its tradition of teaching in botany, anatomy, and medicine, in no great European country did the universities offer so little encouragement to the new philosophy as in France. Domi- nated by Paris, still by far the largest university in Europe, the French universities reacted conservatively on all sensitive issues whether in rela- tion to philosophy, theology or respect for ancient authorities. The impor- tance of the University of Paris in political and ecclesiastical affairs 136 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SCIENTIFIC MOVEMENT AND ITS INFLUENCE exposed it to strong outside pressure; its energies became absorbed in a double controversy over Jansenism and over Jesuit control. Philosophy remained strictly Aristotelian, and the university exercised its function as censor of books to condemn the new mechanistic philosophies of both Gassendi and Descartes as theologically subversive. No provision was made for teaching the new science in the arts faculty. Gassendi persuaded the Sorbonne not to condemn the Copernican hypothesis in 1631, but the medical faculty led by Guy Patin (1602-72) and the distinguished anato- mist Jean Riolan (1580-1657) rejected Harvey's theory of the circulation of the blood and were to earn the satires of Moliere and Boileau. Mean- while the physicians of the faculty of medicine rigidly maintained the exclusion of the surgeons from a university education and kept tight control of all aspects of the medical profession. With the one exception of Montpellier the new science was given a place in French education almost entirely apart from the universities. Some courses were available at the College de France on anatomy and on mathematics, in which Gassendi and Gilles Personne de Roberval (1602-75) successively held the chair. Botany, and from 1648 chemistry, were taught at the new Jardin du Roi founded in 1636 with chairs of botany, anatomy and surgery. And among the Jesuit colleges physical science figured prominently in the teaching: thus at La Fleche Descartes gratefully records that he was not only intro- duced to ancient and modern mathematics and astronomy but learnt also of Galileo's newly invented telescope and its startling discoveries. Besides Italy and the Netherlands, it was England whose universities gave most encouragement to the new science. In spite of the conservatism of their statutes some public provision had been made available through the regius chairs of medicine at Oxford and Cambridge, and Oxford acquired chairs of geometry and astronomy founded by Sir Henry Savile in 1619, a chair of natural philosophy founded by William Sedley in 1621, a 'Physick Garden' in 1622 and a readership in anatomy in 1624. Other foundations at both universities followed later in the century. Savile required his professor of geometry to read Archimedes and Apol- lonius as well as Euclid and to teach applied mathematics, including practical instruction in surveying, and his professor of astronomy to teach the Copernican theory and practical applications of astronomy, especially in geography and 'those parts of navigation depending on mathematics'. 1 Elected into the chair of geometry in 1649, John Wallis (1616-1707) introduced Descartes' analytical geometry and Cavalieri's method of indivisibles into his teaching. At Cambridge Francis Glisson (1597-1677) had by 1637 introduced Harvey's theory into his teaching as regius professor of physic. But it was through the tutorial system in the colleges that best advantage was taken of opportunities to introduce new scientific knowledge into the old statutory curricula. For a new class of 1 6 Curtis, Oxford and Cambridge in transition, p. 117. I37 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008 MHPDECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR gentry entering the universities the desirability of learning was tested by utility and virtil. There were fellowships for medicine and for the mathe- matical sciences in various colleges. At Oxford a tutor in arts at Corpus Christi College, one Brian Twyne, left full notes showing that between 1605 and 1623 he was teaching his pupils 'practical' mathematical sub- jects, based on recent English works, similar to those laid down by Savile for his professors, and was expounding the astronomical theories of Copernicus, Kepler and Galileo as against Ptolemy. There is evidence of similar mathematical teaching in other colleges both at Oxford and at Cambridge, where distinguished men such as Oughtred, Henry Briggs (1561-1630) and Lawrence Rooke (1623-62) held fellowships and where the new astronomy was also expounded in comparison with the old. Yet even accepting Sprat's claim that it was in the universities that natural philosophy in England 'has been principally cherish'd, and reviv'd', 1 the best professional scientific training in England was available not at Oxford or Cambridge but in London. Lectures open to the general public were given at Greshatn College in geometry, astronomy and 'physic'. The geometry and astronomy were strongly related to practical problems, especially in navigation, and the professors, several of whom had previously taught in Oxford or Cambridge, were in close contact over many years with the Royal Navy and with instrument-makers and other mathematical practitioners. It was at Gresham College or nearby that there met from about 1645 the group which was to form the nucleus of the Royal Society. For the study of medicine many Englishmen still went to Italy or Holland, but in London serious training was provided by the Royal College of Physicians and, in surgery, at the College of Barber Surgeons. At the former Harvey as Lumleian Lecturer had from 1616 pioneered morbid and comparative anatomy and prepared for his demonstration of the circulation of the blood, 2 and at the latter Sir Charles Scarborough (1616-94) 'was the first who introduced Geometrical and Mechanical Speculations into Anatomy', s when lecturing on muscles. Christopher Wren had at one time acted as his demonstrator. The main case of the scientific critics against the universities as teaching institutions was that even when in the most favourable circumstances they allowed new knowledge to be fitted somehow into old curricula and methods of instruction, they would adapt neither in such a way as to make a really congenial home for the new scientific enquiries. Too often 1 Thomas Sprat, The history of the Royal Society of London (London, 1667), p. 328; critical ed. by J. I. Cope and H. W. Jones (London, 1959). 2 Sir G. Keynes, The life of William Harvey (Oxford, 1966), pp. 8 4 - m ; cf. Sir G. N. Clark, A history of the Royal College of Physicians, Vol. I (Oxford, 1964). * Charles Goodall, The Royal College of Physicians of London...: and An Historical Account of the College's Proceedings against Empiricks..., Epistle Dedicatory to latter (London, 1684); P.Allen, 'Medical education in seventeenth-century England', Journal of the history of medicine,.Vol. 1 (1946), pp. 139-40. 138 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SCIENTIFIC MOVEMENT AND ITS INFLUENCE the new disciplines had to be acquired outside the universities altogether. The result was that while the practitioner, whether 'learned' like the physician, the surveyor or the engineer, or 'unlearned' like the surgeon, the apothecary, the instrument-maker or the assayer, could learn his skill professionally by clinical experience or practical apprenticeship, the theoretician, the university-educated natural philosopher who was pri- marily responsible for the development of original scientific thought, usually had to bring himself abreast of new knowledge by private reading or tuition. Many Oxford and Cambridge men, including the future Savilian professors Seth Ward (1617-89), Wallis and Wren, learnt modern mathematics from Oughtred after he had left Cambridge for a country living, and the biographies of other leading scientists of this period show that throughout Europe a high proportion of them acquired an up-to- date mastery of science by similar means outside their formal university studies. The concentration of universities on teaching, leaving research as a private activity, left curricula out of contact with advancing knowledge and the spirit of enquiry, even where no theologically or otherwise sensitive issues were involved. Where such issues did arise a positive stand was taken against the new. Thus whereas new methods in mathematics and experimentation as such encountered no external opposition, criticism of Aristotle's physics or Galen's anatomy and physiology ran foul of a strong residue of academic humanist conservatism. Opposition to Copernican astronomy was largely academic until De revolutionibus was prohibited donee corrigatur by the Roman Congregation of the Index in 1616, 1 when the issue became an ecclesiastical one. After Galileo's condemnation in 1633 administrative measures in Catholic countries against Copernicanism became even more determined. Descartes' inno- vations in mathematics and optics were welcomed but his mechanistic physics and physiology were at first opposed, in Protestant Utrecht and Leiden as in Catholic Louvain and in Paris, because his doctrines were held to lead to atheism and to have theologically dangerous implications for the nature of the soul and for the eucharist. The pursuit of original enquiry sprang from a wide variety of motives, ranging from the religious to the wholly utilitarian, that had only a limited place in the conception of their functions normally accepted in the seventeenth-century universities. The habit of research was cultivated almost entirely apart from teaching and when it came to receive organized recognition this was in institutions of a new kind, the scientific societies. Beginning as associations of men of similar interests either in universities, under great patrons or round some private figure, these societies aimed in the first place to meet the need for a means of communicating and discussing new knowledge more direct than was possible through the 1 Galileo, Opere, ed. naz. Vol. 19 (1907), p. 323. 139 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008 6-2DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR publication of books and through correspondence. They also met to perform experiments, but the need for endowment and apparatus for research, though expressed, was not provided for on any adequate scale before the end of the century. Like their literary predecessors on which they were modelled, the scientific societies cultivated a new kind of learn- ing still neglected in the universities and placed the highest value on original skill. A common pattern was for associations beginning informally to set down their customs later in formal rules governing activities and member- ship; later still some of these associations gave rise to officially recognized national academies. Beginning in Italy, a number of such societies passed through a transitory if active existence there during the sixteenth century. In 1603 a new society, the Accademia dei Lincei (the lynx being endowed with specially keen sight according to bestiary lore), was formed at Rome by Duke Federigo Cesi (1585-1630), a young man of eighteen, with three friends. Conceived on grandiose lines as a research institute on the model of a religious order or order of chivalry, it was reorganized in 1609 with an enlarged membership rising to over thirty and including Giambattista della Porta (c.1534-1615) and Galileo. For two decades it had an active life, supported by Cesi and meeting at his palace where there was a botanical garden, a cabinet of natural history and a library. Members studied botany and entomology; an ambitious description of plants and animals of Mexico was published; and it was in the academy that the term microscopium was coined for an instrument made for it by Galileo and first used for zoological investigations by another member, Francesco Stelluti (1577-1653). The academy also published Scheiner's and Galileo's letters on the sun-spots (1613) and Galileo's // Saggiatore (1623). It survived a bitter quarrel that arose among the members over its continued support, encouraged especially by Galileo, of Copernican cosmology after its condemnation of 1616, but, as Cesi's death in 1630 was followed by Galileo's condemnation in 1633, the academy's activities became more and more difficult, and they ceased altogether in 1657. In the same year a new society, the Accademia del Cimento, began its short but successful life of one decade in Florence (see Vol. v in this series). Following those in Italy, associations for scientific work were formed most actively in France, where Italian influence was most immediate. The earliest French associations grew up informally round private indi- viduals and were kept in touch by correspondence as well as meetings. A good example of such an individual is Peiresc; Counsellor to the Parle- ment of Provence and in science an intelligent and well-informed dilettante, he became with Mersenne the chief link between French scientists and with others outside France in the early years of the century. The centrali- zation of France gave prominence to Paris in intellectual as in other aspects of life and among Peiresc's correspondents were the principal 140 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SCIENTIFIC MOVEMENT AND ITS INFLUENCE men round whom the scientific life of the capital came to revolve. Intellec- tual circles in Paris were composed largely of men of independent means or of high professional position as lawyers, judges or counsellors of state, or doctors or clerics, who met in each others' houses to share common interests. The earliest of the private Parisian associations with scientific interests was the famous Cabinet, called first du President de Thou, and later des freres Dupuy after the two sons of a counsellor to the Parlement of Paris who effectively organized its meetings in the Hotel de Thou. More specifically scientific in character were the meetings held by Des- cartes in his lodgings about 1626. Other meetings with a rather different tone were organized by Theophraste Renaudot (1586-1653), a graduate in medicine at Montpellier, who between 1633 and 1642 arranged lectures and discussions on an inconsequential variety of topics ranging from medicine to popular morality at his Bureau d'Adresse, an organiza- tion offering an equally wide assortment of services including those of a free clinic and dispensary and an advertising agency. Renaudot's con- ferences are said to have attracted large crowds to the Maison du Grand Coq in the He de la Cite where they were held on Monday afternoons. But the most important of the early scientific associations in Paris was undoubtedly that formed by Mersenne about 1635. Educated by the Jesuits at La Fleche, Mersenne became a Minim friar and made his cell in the convent near Place Royale (now Place des Vosges) both a meeting- place for scientific discussions and experiments and, from 1620 to 1648, the centre of a vast and systematic scientific correspondence by which he maintained a flow of news of scientific discoveries and ideas between most of the leading scientists of the day. 1 His correspondents included Torricelli, Cavalieri, Descartes, Fermat, Gassendi, Desargues, Roberval, Pascal, Thomas Hobbes (1588-1679), Theodore Haak (1605-90), and many others from as far apart as Sweden, Poland, and the Levant. For Mersenne, the methods of the new science were of supreme value because they freed men's minds from error. A skilful experimenter himself, especially in acoustics, and a capable mathematician, he chose his group with discrimination to discuss problems and to perform experiments. The observations associated with Pascal concerning the void, including the famous experiment made in 1648 with a barometer on Puy-de-D6me, arose out of the discussions in this group, at which visitors from abroad were welcomed. Descartes in Holland kept in touch with scientific news through Mersenne. In 1634, the year after Galileo's trial, Mersenne translated into French and published an early work by Galileo under the title Les mecaniques de Galilee and gave a summary account of his Dialogo and trial in Les questions theologiques, physiques, morales et mathematiques. After Mersenne's death in 1648 meetings of the same group 1 Correspondence du P. Marin Mersenne, ed. C. de Waard, Vol. 1 (Paris, 1932), pp. xix-lv; edition continued from Vol. 7 (1962) by B. Rochot. 141 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR were carried on by others; but all such private associations were eclipsed by Colbert's foundation of a national Academie royale des Sciences in 1666. Some sense of a scientific community not only in Paris but in France as a whole was created by contacts maintained between the capital and provinces. Du Thou's and Mersenne's groups especially kept in touch not only with Peiresc but also, for example, with local groups at Bor- deaux and P6rigord. Mersenne also kept in touch with scientific activity outside France, his relations with Italian and English scientists being especially close. One result of the exchanges of scientific correspondence that took place between Paris and London was to aid the flow of know- ledge of English science and of Bacon's experimental philosophy into France, and of French mathematics and of Cartesian philosophy into England. Another was to bring English scientists into contact with the habit of forming associations, so that the group that met at Gresham College on 28 November 1660 to take the first formal step towards the founding of the Royal Society could describe their action as being 'according to the Manner in other Countryes, where there were voluntary associations of men into Academies for the advancement of various parts of learning'. 1 The extent to which speculative proposals for a scientific institute such as those made in Bacon's New Atlantis (1627) or Abraham Cowley's suggestion for a philosophical college (1661) influenced the founders of the Royal Society is problematical. The event of material significance is that some of the persons present in 1660 had begun a few years before the mid-century to meet for scientific discussions and to make experiments. According to the only reports available from an eye-witness, in two accounts written long afterwards by John Wallis, a group including him- self, John Wilkins (1614-72), Glisson and others began during the Civil War 'about the year 1645' 2 to hold informal weekly meetings at Gresham College or near by. In his second account Wallis suggested that the idea of the meetings may have been first proposed by Theodore Haak, a German resident in London who had some connection through Samuel Hartlib (d.1662) with Comenius' pansophic movement. But the activities at the meetings had no connection with this or any other such general scheme for human enlightenment. According to Wallis they met weekly at a certain day and hour, under a certain Penalty, and a weekly Contribution for Charge of Experiments, with certain Rules agreed amongst us. Where (to avoid diversion to other discourses, and for some other reasons) we debarred all Discourses of Divinity, of State Affairs, and of News, (other than what concern'd our business of Philosophy) confining our selves to Philosophical Inquiries, and such as related 1 D. McKie, 'The origins and foundation of the Royal Society of London', in The Royal Society; its origins and founders, ed. Sir H. Hartley (London, i960), p. 1; cf. C. Webster, 'The origins of the Royal Society', in History of Science, ed. A. C. Crombie and M. A. Hoskin, Vol. 6 (Cambridge, 1967), pp. 106-28. 2 John Wallis, A defence of the Royal Society (London, 1678), p. 7. 142 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SCIENTIFIC MOVEMENT AND ITS INFLUENCE thereunto; as Physick, Anatomy, Geometry, Astronomy, Navigation, Staticks, Mechanicks, and Natural Experiments. 1 Haak himself in a letter written to Mersenne in 1648 mentions repeating an experiment with a tube of mercury (TorriceJJi's experiment) of which Mersenne had sent him news; it seems unlikely that he was referring to any other than Wallis's group. Thus it seems that from these early meetings a characteristic policy, to be continued later by the Royal Society, was adopted: to concentrate on natural science, exclude all other subjects, and perform experiments. This is not surprising when it is remem- bered that the meeting-place of this group was the most professional scientific institution in the country, and that professors at Gresham College were among its leading members (see Vol. v in this series). The supreme achievement of the generation that first firmly established this new scientific philosophy, the generation of Galileo, Kepler, Bacon, Harvey and Descartes, was that instead of merely skirmishing like their predecessors within recognized conceptual frontiers or proposing pro- grammes without precise enough specifications for their realization, they found an opening into the intelligibility of nature through which they successfully deployed a whole, systematic campaign. In essence the new 'physico-mathematical experimental learning', 2 'the real, the mechanical, the experimental philosophy', 3 comprised three interconnected elements: a new conception of scientific research, a new conception of nature itself and hence of scientific explanation, and a new conception of the utility and power of scientific enquiry. Although considerably diversified by the content of the different sciences, in these elements the 'new philosophy' provided a common form shared widely enough to be seen as charac- terizing the whole scientific movement. The distinctive new move made in scientific research was to look for the intelligibility of nature not in immediate observation but in an underlying mathematical and mechanical structure, and to seek by systematic and quantitative theoretical analysis and experimentation to discover the one actual structure of this real world. For Galileo and his contemporaries the basically Aristotelian physics still dominant at the beginning of the century was not only inaccurate but fundamentally misconceived. Their main criticisms of it were that it was explicitly qualitative and that its generalizations were too hastily formulated from immediate observation: essentially it was a classification of the immediately observed behaviour of different things, presented as manifestations of their qualitatively, irreducibly distinct' natures' or principles of behaviour, and as such it 1 Ibid. Cf. 'Dr. Wallis's Account of some Passages in his own Life', in Peter Langtofi's Chronicle, transcribed.. .by Thomas Hearne, Vol. I (Oxford, 1725), pp. clxi-clxii. 2 M. Ornstein, The role of scientific societies in the seventeenth century (3rd ed. Chicago, 1938), p. 101. 1 Robert Hooke, Micrographia (London, 1665), preface. 143 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR was incapable of becoming more than a mere classification. They saw in this system of explanations only an accidental provision for measurement, calculation and quantitative prediction, but these, by contrast, became the essential procedures by which nature as they conceived it must be investigated. For them, in Galileo's famous words: Philosophy is written in this greatest book that is continuously open in front of our eyes (I mean the universe), but it cannot be understood unless one first learns to understand the language and to know the characters in which it is written. It is written in mathematical language and the characters are triangles, circles, and other geometrical figures, without which means it is impossible to understand humanly a word of it; without these, one is wandering hopelessly in a dark labyrinth . . - 1 Once this was accepted the new physics came clearly into the light as a physics of what Galileo distinguished as the mathematical and mechanical 'primary and real properties', in contrast with Aristotle's physics of the immediately experienced 'secondary qualities'. As he concluded his discussion of what 'we call heat', the locus classicus of this distinction in modern literature: I do not believe that for exciting in us tastes, smells, and sounds there are required in external bodies anything but sizes, shapes, numbers, and slow or fast movements; and I think that if ears, tongues and noses were taken away, shapes and numbers and motions would remain but not smells or tastes or sounds. These, I believe, are nothing but names, apart from the living animal, just as tickling and titillation are nothing but names if the armpits and the skin round the nose were removed. 8 In thus establishing the methodological programme for the new physics explicitly as the search for the laws of nature as the laws of the primary properties and the processes lying behind the appearances they produced, the new scientific philosophy introduced a systematic change in the questions asked about nature and in the criteria for accepting the con- clusions reached. Simply as an epistomological doctrine the mechanistic philosophy was of course not new, as Galileo and Kepler acknowledged in their different claims to be 'Platonists' and Gassendi recognized in setting out to restore the atomism of Democritus and Epicurus. The novelty of the 'new Philosophy' lay in the attempt made to use the success of quantitative mathematical and experimental analysis as the only criterion for accepting conclusions about the nature of things. In conse- quence much that was essential in the Aristotelian science of physics was not so much refuted as laid aside as answers to questions no longer thought relevant. In its place the mechanistic conception of natural laws as the stage machinery behind the spectacle of appearances implied that the discovery of a true science of nature depended upon the manipulative 1 II Saggiatore, question 6 (1623), in Opere, ed. naz. Vol. 6 (1896), p. 252. Ibid, question 48, p. 350; cf. A. C. Crombie, 'The primary properties and secondary qualities in Galileo Galilei's natural philosophy', in Saggi su Galileo Galilei (Florence, in press), Galileo's natural philosophy: theories of science and the senses (in press). 2 144 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SCIENTIFIC MOVEMENT AND ITS INFLUENCE mathematical and experimental skills traditionally classified as mere techne, ars. These then became the essential methods of the new philo- sophy, which inevitably changed the model adopted for the whole uni- verse as well as for its parts. In place of the organic model of the Aris- totelian cosmos, with parts teleologically related to the whole, the uni- verse became likened to a vast automaton. 'My aim in this', wrote Kepler (in cautiously abandoning one peculiar organic model of his own), 'is to show that the celestial machine is to be likened not to a kind of divine living being but rather to a clockwork . . . , in so far as nearly all the manifold movements are carried out by means of a single simple magnetic corporeal force, just as in a clockwork all motions come from a simple weight. Moreover I show how this physical conception is to be presented through calculation and geometry'. 1 Actual scientific enquiry is a different activity from that of formulating scientific philosophy and method, and their influences on the course of history may differ widely, but the whole notion developed in the seven- teenth century of science as a new philosophy, and not just a new techno- logy, linked them closely together. With the exception of Bacon the chief writers on method also made important contributions to science, whether to the natural sciences like Galileo, Kepler, Descartes and Gassendi or to the social sciences and psychology like Hobbes. The logical and practical methods used for this new art of scientific enquiry were developed within inherited forms which set the initial problems both of how to proceed and of what to accept as a satisfactory conclusion. The ideal made explicit in cleanly mathematical sciences such as mechanics and astronomy and also in more experimental sciences such as optics was the 'Euclidean' form with which the Greeks had scored their greatest successes with these sciences. Kepler's Dioptrice (1611), Galileo's Discorsi e dimostrazione matematiche intorno a due nuove scienze (1638), as later Huygens' Horo- logium oscillatorium (1673) and Newton's Principia mathematica (1687), are only outstanding examples of scientific treatises presented (in Galileo's case within a dialogue) in this 'geometrical' form beginning with a set of 'first principles'—axioms, definitions, postulates and hypotheses—from which the experimental conclusions demonstrated are shown to follow. The problem was how to discover such principles, expressing the real causal relations between the primary properties, as satisfied the criterion that these speculations a priori must not conflict with experimental evidence'. 2 As the great optimist of the scientific movement, Descartes habitually wrote as if he had so far succeeded in discovering the true principles that the whole scientific programme was within sight of com- 1 Kepler to Herwart von Hohenburg, 10 February 1605, Gesammelte Werke, Vol. 15, ed. M. Caspar (Munich, 1951), p. 146. 2 Kepler to Herwart von Hohenburg, 12 July 1600, Ces. Werke, Vol. 14, ed. Caspar (1949), p. 130. 145 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR pletion; then, in Seth Ward's neat epitome, 'when the operations of nature shall be followed up to their staticall (and mechanicall) causes, the use of induction will cease, and syllogisme succeed in place of it'. 1 But Ward continued: 'in the interim we are to desire that men have patience not to lay aside induction before they have reason'. Contemporary writers saw in this process of enquiry, whereby the observed world was first anatomized and then rationally reconstructed as a consequence of the principles so discovered, a definite logical sequence and structure to which Galileo and Castelli applied the name metodo resolutivo e compositivo, derived from sixteenth-century Pisan and Paduan logic, and Descartes (in whose method, despite his over-optimism, experi- ment played an essential part) applied the corresponding terms 'analysis and synthesis'. Even with subject matter not immediately open to a simple mathematical approach or to straight reduction to mechanisms, the leading sciences of the seventeenth century aimed at a similar form to this: idealized postulates or hypotheses with some mathematical or logical means of operating with them, whether that being postulated was the principle of inertia or Descartes' mechanistic models for optics or physio- logy or Harvey's hypothesis of the circulation of the blood. For contem- poraries the novelty given to this form by the 'experimental philosophy' lay in the effectiveness of its clear procedures beginning with an intellectual dissection of a problem before one approached it experimentally. In the light of this antecedent theoretical dissection experimental situations could be devised, with essential factors varied one by one, in which nature could be compelled to answer questions not readily answered simply by observation. Bacon was only making a current view explicit when he declared that 'the secrets of nature reveal themselves more readily when tormented by art than when they go their own way'. 2 In normal experience a science grows largely because one question leads to another, that is, through its content, rather than because some particular form of enquiry is put into operation. Nevertheless both the form and the conception of nature assumed in an enquiry establish general objectives that are effective especially in determining the criteria accepted for a satisfactory conclusion to the enquiry and for satisfactory scientific explanation. The common objective of those who explicitly dis- cussed scientific method in the early seventeenth century, notably Bacon, Galileo and Descartes, was to show how to establish undeniable causal relationships between phenomena, the causes themselves being assumed to lie in the underlying abstract structure of the primary properties. Bacon made an original and very important contribution to the logic of such an enquiry by his systematic exposition of his method of 'exclusion' by negative instances in the Novum organum (1620), a name given to the 1 a Seth Ward, Vindiciae acadetniarum (Oxford, 1654), p. 25. Novum organum, 1.98. 146 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SCIENTIFIC MOVEMENT AND ITS INFLUENCE work as an explicit challenge to Aristotle. Bacon's 'true and legitimate' induction began by collecting instances of a phenomenon (in his example heat) and classifying them into three tables which he called respectively tables of 'Essence and Presence', of 'Deviation or Absence in Proximity', and of 'Degrees or Comparison'. Induction consisted in the inspection of the tables and the rejection of a causal connection between phenomena which were not always present or absent together and did not vary con- comitantly. In his example Bacon went on to show that motion ' is as the genus of which heat is the species', meaning that 'heat itself, or the essence of heat, is motion and nothing else', 1 a conclusion in keeping with the mechanical philosophy but which Bacon did not know how to develop scientifically. In the more mathematically tractable sciences the aim com- ing into focus, that correlations between phenomena should be expressed quantitatively as relations of functional dependence between cause and effect, at once made the discovery of concomitant variations—the subject of Bacon's third table—the essential criterion of a causal relation- ship. Thus, Galileo wrote, 'whenever a fixed and constant alteration is seen in the effect, there must be a fixed and constant alteration in the cause'. 2 These criteria for establishing causal connections brought into play all the characteristic practices that came to be part of experimental enquiry, especially the use of controls to isolate factors and, where the subject permitted, the measurement of concomitant changes in isolated factors varied one by one. The contribution made by Descartes to the forms of enquiry and ex- planation used in seventeenth-century science was something different from that of either Bacon or Galileo. Descartes made his impact upon his contemporaries and established his lasting influence by publishing in the Principia philosophiae (1644) and other works something never attempted before or afterwards, a complete reduction (enriched by some genuine discoveries) of all forms of physical change to a single form, that of matter in motion. The basis of Descartes' reduction was his division of the created world into two mutually exclusive and collectively exhaustive essences or 'simple natures', extension and thought, and his conviction that his arguments to this conclusion were guaranteed by the perfection of God who would not deceive true reason. Since the whole world of matter was nothing but extension, with motion as its mode, existing in various stages of complexity, the laws of nature became for Descartes nothing more than the laws of motion. 'I have described', he wrote, 'the whole visible world as if it were simply a machine in which there was nothing to consider but the shape and movements [of its parts]'. 3 1 Novum organum, 11. 20. * Dialogo, iv, in Opere, ed. naz. Vol. 7, p. 471. * Principia philosophiae, iv. 188, in Oeuvres, ed. C.Adam and P. Tannery, Vol.8 (1) (Paris, 1905), p. 315 (Latin); Vol. 9 (2) (1904), p. 310 (French): the passage in square brackets occurs only in the French version (1647). 147 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR Descartes criticized Harvey as well as Galileo for not making this reduc- tion and so for failing to show why things happened as well as how. It was a programme that led him into his worst mistakes, but also into reversing a normal Greek attitude to nature inherited in Aristotelian thought and so into making his most original contributions to methods of scientific discovery. In Aristotelian thought an absolute ontological distinction was made between artificial and natural bodies, whether naturally generated substances or living organisms, so that in principle no humanly constructed model could throw any real light on the nature of natural things. But Descartes' universal mechanism put him into a position to declare that there was no difference between machines and natural bodies except in the size of their parts. And certainly there are no rules in mechanics that do not hold also in physics, of which mechanics forms a part or species, [so that all artificial things are at the same time natural]: for it is not less natural for a clock, made of these or those wheels, to indicate the hours, than for a tree which has sprung from this or that seed to produce a particular fruit. Accordingly, just as those who apply themselves to the consideration of automata, when they know the use of some machine and see some of its parts, easily infer from these the manner in which others which they have not seen are made, so, from the perceptible effects and parts of natural bodies, I have endeavoured to find out what are their imperceptible causes and parts. 1 By his innovation of asserting the identity of the synthesized artificial construction with the natural product and of making this identification an instrument of scientific research, Descartes made himself the first great modern master of the hypothetical model. Models and analogies had been commonly used in science since Greek times. Descartes' reduc- tion enabled him to make the fundamentally new move of making the principles of the mechanistic model the only principles operating in nature, thus bringing the objectives of the engineer into the search for the nature of things and throwing the entire world of matter open to the same form of scientific inquiry and explanation. The value of the Cartesian model, like that of any other theory advanced in anticipation of factual knowledge, was to raise questions of which otherwise no one would have thought, and the main issue, in any historical judgement of Descartes' role in the scientific movement, is not whether his conclusions were true but whether his questions were fruitful. In some sciences, especially in optics and physiology, they undoubtedly were. The 'new philosophy' of Galileo and Kepler, Bacon and Descartes liberated the science of nature from old bonds, from the ontology of the qualitatively irreducible Aristotelian 'natures' and the perfection of circular motion, and brought about a submission to fact, however untidy, 1 Ibid. iv. 203, in Oeuvres, Vol. 8(1), p. 326; Vol. 9 (2), pp. 321-2: the passage in square brackets occurs only in the French version. 148 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SCIENTIFIC MOVEMENT AND ITS INFLUENCE and eventually a greater scruple over actual, observational as distinct from theoretical, mathematical accuracy. In consequence it brought about an increasing emphasis on precision, both in calculation and in closer observation and measurement, in the last augmenting the senses by 'a supplying of their infirmities with Instruments, and, as it were, the adding of artificial Organs to the natural'. 1 Indeed, if the conceptual organization of the new philosophy was to be made effective in scientific enquiry, adequate tools, both mathematical and observational, were an absolute necessity. In this the task of the first half of the century was to reveal the power latent in such tools rather than to apply the tools to specific problems. Only after 1650 were the traditional scientific instruments and apparatus supplanted by inventions of the first half of the century. Especially where mass production was required it took time for the instrument makers to adapt themselves to the new techniques; and where the instruments were for practical use, in navigation, cartography, or chemistry, it took time for the practitioners to learn their use. Meanwhile aids to the senses in piercing the veil of nature had to be not only invented but also con- structed by the scientists themselves, and their immediate impact was lessened by their rarity and by imperfections in their design. A form of compound microscope was in use about 1610 and Stelluti published a fine illustration of the structure of the bee in 1625, but it was not until Hooke's Micrographia (1665) that the new worlds to be discovered with this instru- ment were appreciated. Meanwhile the simple microscope in fact remained the more precise scientific tool, as Leeuwenhoek was to show. An air thermometer was devised by Galileo by 1603, and its use in medicine described by Santorio in 1612, but variations in air pressure combined with loss from evaporation to make these instruments unreliable, and it was many years before the thermometer became a serious scientific tool. The barometer, simplest to construct of all the tools, was significant for its part in the development of the theory of atmospheric pressure in the 1640s rather than as a source of observations. The isochronism of the pendulum had been established by Galileo. By early 1634 Mersenne demonstrated that its frequency was inversely proportional to the square root of its length, 2 and he and Riccioli used it to measure time in their experiments, but it was first incorporated into a mechanical clock by Christiaan Huygens (1629-95) about 1656. The telescope, similarly, became a serious scientific tool only with the 1 Hooke, Micrographia, preface. Mersenne, Correspondance, ed. de Waard, Vol. 4 (1955), pp. 81-2, 444-55; Harmoni- corum libri, n, props, XXVI-XXIX(Paris, 1636),Harmonieuniverselle..., 'Traitd desinstru- mens', 1, prop, xx (Paris, 1636-7); A. C. Crombie, 'Mathematics, music and medical science', Proceedings of the Twelfth International Congress of the History of Science; Paris, 1968 (Paris, in press) and forthcoming studies of Galileo and Mersenne; A. Koyr6, Meta- 2 physics and measurement (London, 1968), pp. 89-117. 149 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR work of John Flamsteed and others in the last decades of the century. But the brilliance with which Galileo exploited his early observations made the telescope the symbol of this movement towards 'artificial organs'. ' The present observations strip the decrees of former writers of authority,' he wrote, 'who if they had seen them, would have decided differently. n It had been in 1609 that word had reached him from Holland that combinations of lenses had been used to make distant Objects seem near, and he had needed only ten months to devise and construct his own telescopes, apply them to the stars, and announce his dramatic discoveries to a startled world. The Moon, he claimed in Sidereus nuncius 2 , was not 'robed in a smooth and polished surface' but had mountains whose height he was actually able to measure; the Milky Way was composed of innumerable tiny stars; so-called 'nebulous' stars were similarly formed; and, most striking of all, the planet Jupiter, like the Earth on the Coper- nican view, had satellite moons, four in all. Similar observations were made in England during 1609 and 1610 by Thomas Harriot (1560-1621). 3 At first these discoveries, and Galileo's announcement of spots on the surface of the Sun and of the Moon-like phases of Venus which followed in 1612, were widely doubted. How could mere combinations of lenses lead to truths unknown since the world began, especially as curved glass had been since Antiquity the means of producing illusions? But Galileo's claims aroused immediate and widespread interest and as they were con- firmed by other astronomers it was realized how much new tools might do towards enlarging man's horizons, even though it was to be many years before telescopes were manufactured in quantity. Galileo himself hoped that eclipses of the satellites of Jupiter, being frequent, could be used to solve the problem of the determination of longitude at sea: tables would supply the times of these eclipses for a standard longitude. For this purpose a table for the first satellite was published annually from 1690 onwards, but even at this late date telescopes could be not adapted for use at sea, the long refraGtors proving unsteady and the specula of reflectors tarnishing rapidly. New mathematical tools likewise proved their power only in the second half of the century, above all in Newton's Prlncipia (1687). Only then was there developed a physics of broad application and mathe- matical in fact, not merely in intention as had been the case with Des- cartes' cosmology. Descartes himself, even when claiming to have reduced science to mathematics, had practised mathematics mainly for its intrinsic interest, and the same was true of his leading contemporaries. The great 1 Third letter about the sun-spots (1612), in Opere, ed. naz. Vol. 5 (1895), p. 201. In ibid. Vol. 3 (1892), p. 59. D S. P. Rigaud, Supplement to Dr. Bradley's miscellaneous works: with an account of Harriot's astronomical papers (Oxford, 1833), pp. 17-70; see the two papers by R. C. H. Tanner and J. V. Pepper, 'The study of Thomas Harriot's manuscripts', History of science, ed. A. C. Crombie and M. A. Hoskin, Vol. 6 (1967), pp. i-40. 4 150 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SCIENTIFIC MOVEMENT AND ITS INFLUENCE sixteenth-century printed editions of Archimedes, Apollonius, Hero and Pappus suggested problems and techniques some of which had originated in the context of physics and were later to prove of immense value in that field, but in the early seventeenth century these were studied for their own sake and with little reference to the development of science and still less to that of technology. Logarithms provided the main exception. Here the stimulus came from the need to handle long computations in theoretical astronomy, and logarithms were frequently discussed in the context of trigonometry and spherical geometry. Their invention, by Biirgi and by Napier, 1 who published the first tables in 1614, was equivalent to the addition of many years to the life of an astronomer. Among those who published tables soon afterwards were Briggs and Edmund Gunter (1581-1626) of Gresham College, and Kepler; the popularity of these tables greatly accelerated the acceptance of Arabic numerals. The slide-rule, which is based on the same principle as logarithms, was developed gradually during the century from instruments devised by Gunter and Oughtred, and the nautical interests of the Gresham circle also led to the invention of mathematical instruments for use in navigation, although observations at sea were still too crude to warrant the use of sophisticated mathe- matical techniques. It was some time before either logarithms or the slide-rule came into general use, but meanwhile the tedium of long calcu- lations led to the invention of various other devices, ranging from the elementary 'bones' of Napier to the cumbersome calculating machines of Pascal and Leibniz. Logarithms aside, mathematicians worked at problems suggested by the Greek works or by the more arithmetical and algebraic tradition inherited from Arabic authors. Infinitesimals were studied in the context of area and centre-of-gravity problems first of all in Italy, notably by Cavalieri and Torricelli, and later in northern Europe by Fermat and Roberval and by the Belgian Jesuit mathematician Gregoire de Saint Vincent (1584-1667). The study of moving bodies also required the use of infinitesimals, for example in Kepler's derivation of his first two laws of planetary motion and in Galileo's treatment of concepts such as instan- taneous velocity ultimately based on theoretical treatises written in four- teenth-century Oxford. Analytical geometry was created by Fermat, who was stimulated by Pappus' account of a lost work of Apollonius, and by Descartes, whom a correspondent interested in a famous problem discussed by Pappus. Both men developed methods of determining tangents to curves, although it was not until the time of Newton that the close link between this problem and that of areas was appreciated. Fermat's work, often done at odd moments, was known to his contemporaries chiefly by report. Descartes 1 Mirifici logarithmorum cartonis descriptio (Edinburgh, 1614). 151 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR published his Geometrie in 1637 as the third essay illustrating his method of discovery, but his presentation was intentionally obscure and the originality of his thought in both algebra and geometry was revealed only through the efforts of later commentators. Less fortunate was the Lyon- naise architect and engineer Gerard Desargues. His projective geometry, although extended further by the precocious Blaise Pascal, went un- noticed in his controversy with Parisian artists and architects. Apart from Descartes, the principal contributors to algebra were Harriot and Oughtred, although an influential legacy from the sixteenth century was contained in the 1646 edition of the works of Francois Viete (1540-1603). The 'new philosophy' found expression and justification in specific scientific achievements. The unshakable confidence of its adherents stemmed from its success in reorganizing three large areas of natural enquiry, each of which yielded a developed system of thought. The first of these areas was that of cosmology and the science of motion. Tradi- tionally, the detailed study of the heavens concentrated on mathematical descriptions of the planetary motions rather than on their causes. Ter- restrial physics, on the other hand, was concerned with the causes of movement; and since the world formed a cosmos analogous to a living body, particular motions were referred to this general pattern: natural motion brought an object closer to its place in the scheme of things, while violent motion imposed from without had the reverse effect. The destruction of this outlook and its replacement by a new view of nature was mainly the work of three men, Galileo, Kepler and Descartes. Galileo laid the foundations of his contributions to physics early in his career, when he was professor of mathematics first at Pisa and then at Padua, but his main publications date from 1610, when he became chief philosopher and mathematician to the grand duke of Tuscany. His best- known work, which led to his condemnation and house arrest, bears the misleading title of Dialogue on the two great world systems, the Ptolemaic and Copernican (1632). While a young man, Galileo had been converted to the Copernican view that the Earth moves round the Sun, and he realized that the need was for a new physics that would explain why such a motion was imperceptible to us. It must be change of motion, rather than motion itself, that required a cause; for then a passenger on the moving Earth would be as unconscious of its steady motion as was a sailor on a calm day. But to transform the traditional view of motion demanded the creation of a new world system to replace the cosmos, and Galileo appreciated that such a fundamental change in outlook could not be forced on readers by particular experiments or observations. The Dialogue, therefore, was mainly an informal initiation into a new philo- sophy of nature in which motions no longer required a continuously acting cause. It is significant that for Galileo the world was still finite, so 152 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SCIENTIFIC MOVEMENT AND ITS INFLUENCE that indefinitely extended straight-line motion—the inertial motion of Newtonian physics—was automatically excluded. In conformity with this view of the world the motions that persisted (under ideal conditions) were circular: a spinning top, or a ball rolling on a smooth surface curving with the curvature of the Earth. Galileo failed to go one stage further and explain the movement of the ball as the result of a force restraining it from moving away from the Earth along a tangent line: for him heaviness remained an intrinsic property of matter, leading him to retain privileged places in the world, such as the centre of the Earth, about which bodies turned. Against this Descartes in Le Monde (pub- lished posthumously in 1664) and Principia philosophiae explained heaviness as a mere consequence of the motion of matter. Arguing that it followed from God's immutability that a body would persist in the state in which it was at any instant of time unless acted on by an external cause, and that only motion in a straight line existed at an instant, he concluded that it was this motion that would persist. This conception of motion was intimately associated with and led naturally to Descartes' view of space as infinite and without privileged places or directions, representing the final and complete break with the cosmos and its replacement by the universe of classical geometry. But Galileo's conception of large-scale inertial motion as curved did not affect the discussion of free fall and the path of projectiles which he published in 1638. His ideas on this subject had been maturing for some forty years, and his law of free fall had already been announced in the Dialogue; published when its author had become blind, the Discourses on two new sciences was to be his last and greatest work. 'The suprahuman Archimedes', as Galileo described him, 1 had shown how to idealize statical problems in such a way that they were mathematically tractable while still relevant to the real world, and his methods had recently been applied to other questions in statics by Stevin, particularly to the equili- brium conditions of bodies on an inclined plane. A theory of moving bodies, on the other hand, had been developed by fourteenth-century writers, but although Galileo was to draw on their analyses and concepts, they had not succeeded in relating their results to the real world. It was Galileo who extended the Archimedean technique to the study of how projectiles move. Basing himself in the Discourses on the belief that nature acted in simple ways, he first demonstrated that under ideal conditions velocity in free fall was proportional to the time elapsed. This relation he transformed by mathematical argument into one between distance, which he could measure, and time; then by viewing free fall as a special case of rolling motion down an inclined plane, he arrived at a relationship between distance and relatively large intervals of time, which he could also measure. Finally he confirmed this relationship by experiments, 1 De motu, in Opere, ed. naz. Vol. I (1890), p. 300. 153 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR although his account of their perfect success does not carry complete conviction. For Galileo motions were no longer processes, as with Aristotle, that could interfere with each other. They might therefore be combined mathe- matically, and Galileo showed how uniform motion in a horizontal direction combined with accelerated motion in the vertical to give a parabolic path for projectiles, and proved many other similar theorems. The elementary character of his results is no index to the great importance of his book. He wrote himself :'what I think is more important, a passage and entrance will be opened to a most ample and excellent science, of which these our labours will be elements; into the more hidden recesses of which science more perspicacious minds than mine will penetrate'. 1 By implying in the Dialogue that only two world systems deserved consideration, Galileo had deliberately closed his eyes to the existence of a third system which two decades before had replaced the Ptolemaic as the rallying point for those who believed the Earth to be at the centre. This was the one developed after 1584 by the great Danish observer Tycho Brahe. In it the relative motions of the planets were basically the same as for Copernicus; but it was the Earth that was absolutely at rest. This system retained many of the advantages of the Copernican while avoiding the scandal of a moving Earth. Tycho was only one of a number of astronomers who independently adopted similar systems, some allowing the Earth to spin daily and others having it wholly at rest; as late as 1625 the Oxford geographer Nathanael Carpenter (1589-1628) 2 was claiming the invention for himself. Unfortunately Galileo's strongest anti-Ptolemaic arguments, in particular the Moon-like phases of Venus, could be interpreted as support either for Copernicus or for Tycho. So, as he could not disprove Tycho, he sought to discredit him by presenting his system as a compromise unworthy of serious consideration, although after the condemnation of Copernicanism in 1616 Jesuit astronomers had adopted the Tychonic system to a man, and it was to command a considerable body of outside support until well into the second half of the century. The most powerful arguments in favour of the heliocentric view were contained in Kepler's Astronomia nova [New astronomy studied through causes, or celestial physics, 1609]. In this epoch-making work Kepler finally broke with the age-old approach to planetary motions in terms of circles, by stating that the planets in fact moved in ellipses with the Sun at one focus—one single curve sufficing for each planet. His work was widely discussed among mathematical astronomers, including in England Harriot and Horrox and their respective friends, although it was ignored 1 Discorsi..., in, in ibid. Vol. 8 (1898), p. 190. See the important critical edition of the Discorsi with extensive historical notes by A. Carugo and L. Geymonat (Turin, 1958). 1 Geography (Oxford, 1625), p. i n . 154 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SCIENTIFIC MOVEMENT AND ITS INFLUENCE by men like Galileo and Descartes who had no patience for the intricate calculations which Kepler delighted to inflict on his readers. But even more important than his results were the physical considerations that had guided him. The causes traditionally studied in terrestrial physics were now applied to the planets; and the world was to be thought of not as an organism, a cosmos, but as a machine actuated by a force residing in the Sun. As so often with the products of a period of transition, the Astronomia nova was antiquated as well as prophetic. It taught that the Sun's force was required continually to maintain the planets in motion, for without it they would, in Aristotelian fashion, come to a halt. With Kepler's physics quickly superseded in this important particular, and with general uncertainty as to whether his laws of planetary motion were exact or mere approximations, planetary astronomy entered on a period of indecision which was resolved only in 1687 when Newton showed that all three Keplerian laws were consequences of his gravitational attraction. If Descartes was unequal to the detailed study of planetary motion, he did give in his Principia philosophiae magisterial expression to the mathe- matical and mechanical vision of the world. The distribution of motion and the transference of motion, under laws 'derived not from the pre- judices of the senses, but from the light of reason', 1 were to provide a complete account of the physical world, at least in so far as this did not depend upon the particular way in which God had chosen to distribute motion at the moment of Creation. Irrespective of this choice one could assert, by analogy with disturbances in pools of water, that in time matter must arrange itself in whirlpools or vortices, of which the solar system was an example; and one could plausibly explain many detailed properties of bodies such as the Earth which were carried round in these whirlpools. But for a discussion of the properties of an individual whirlpool it was necessary to abandon the deductive method and instead make hypotheses and test them by experiment. The Cartesian synthesis was doomed to eventual failure because although mathematical in principle, in practice it had to be developed by verbal, non-mathematical discussion which could too easily be accommodated to almost any facts. The deductive approach, so powerful a tool when used in suitable circumstances and with discretion as in the hands of Galileo, was now employed without discrimination: even Descartes' laws of motion proved to be not merely false but mutually contradictory. And within his own lifetime his disciples had begun to gloss over the meta- physical basis to his physics which for him was fundamental. Yet his work with its serenely confident exposition of the mechanical philosophy marks the watershed between the anti-Aristotelian polemics of Galileo's writings and the positive application of the new approach characteristic 1 Prittc.philos., in. I. 155 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR of science in the second half of the century. To the educated layman especially he offered for a wide range of phenomena explanations at last shorn of all mystery: gone for ever were the 'occult' forms and qualities of the Aristotelians. Other writers gave expression to the power of explanations through matter in motion: in particular Gassendi's Chris- tianized version of Epicurean atomism provided for many a refreshing alternative to the cramping rigidity of Cartesianism. But it was Descartes who both systematized the mechanical philosophy and applied it plausibly on a massive scale to detailed problems taken from fields as far apart as cosmology and physiology. The second large area of natural enquiry to be reorganized by the new philosophy was the experimental investigation of the mode of production of a series of inanimate physical phenomena within this range of contem- porary interests. Although the new philosophy was mechanical in con- ception, paradoxically the actual science of mechanics depended too heavily on theoretical rather than experimental developments to be the exemplar for the mathematical and experimental method that exploited the power of the conception. This role was played rather by optics, which since Greek times had been the most advanced of the terrestrial sciences in combining experiment with mathematics. A new impetus came from Galileo's challenge to accepted ideas on the basis of evidence derived from a combination of lenses. Even Kepler, who had done so much to clarify the ancient confusion between the physics, physiology and psychology of vision (see below), seems to have hesitated before accepting the existence of satellites of Jupiter, but it was not long before the triumph of Galileo's primitive telescopes brought urgency to the study of lenses and in parti- cular the law of refraction. Within a matter of months Kepler in his Dioptrice (1611) described an experimental study of refraction, and in spite of only partial success he was able to go on to explain many of the phenomena associated with lenses. He proposed an important improvement in the construction of the telescope which was quickly adopted. The correct law, that the sines of the angles of incidence and of refrac- tion are in a constant ratio depending on the media concerned, had been discovered about 1601 by Harriott in the course of a fundamental mathema- tical and experimental study of refraction carried out between 1597 and 1605. 1 Equipped with this law he made the first major advance since the 1 J. Lohne, "Thomas Harriott (1560-1621): the Tycho Brahe of optics', Centaurus, Vol. 6 (1959). PP- 113-21, 'The fair fame of Thomas Harriott', ibid. Vol. 8 (1963), pp. 69-84, 'Zur Geschichte des Brechungsgesetzes', Sudhoffs Archivfiir Geschichte der Medizin undder Naturwissenschaften, Vol. 47 (1963), pp. 152-72, 'Regenbogen und BrechzahF, ibid. Vol. 49 O965), pp. 401-15; cf. J. W. Shirley, 'An early experimental determination of Snell's law', American Journal of Physics, Vol. 19 (1951), pp. 507-8; Rigaud, Supplement to Dr. Bradley's .. .works, p. 41. 156 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SCIENTIFIC MOVEMENT AND ITS INFLUENCE fourteenth century by determining mathematically the behaviour of rays of sunlight in passing through globes of water to form a rainbow, and by measuring the dispersion into different colours of sunlight passed through a glass prism, and in water and other liquids. Neither Harriot nor Snell, who also arrived at the sine law of refraction probably not long before his death in 1626, published their results. Whether Descartes knew of their work is uncertain, although the physical derivation he gave in La Diop- trique, published in 1637 in illustration of his Discours de la methode, is not very convincing. Fermat, in fact, while accepting Descartes' formu- lation of the law, later gave quite another physical derivation of it. In Les Meteores, another essay appended to the Discours, Descartes like Harriot used the law to give a quantitative analysis of the formation of a rainbow and of the dispersion of colours, but he added an important physical explanation relating colour to a periodic speed, that of rotation of the corpuscles assumed in his theory of light. Some years later Johann Marcus Marci of Kronland (1595-1667), already the author of an original work on motion and the pendulum, published in Prague (1648) the further discovery that the colours formed by a prism passed unaltered through a second prism. Another field of physics in which experiment combined with conceptual developments to open up vast new possibilities was pneumatics. In the Discourses on two new sciences Galileo mentioned what must have been common knowledge to those whose task it was to pump water out of mines, that there is a limit to the height through which water can be raised by suction. Isaac Beeckman (1588-1637) and Giovanni Battista Baliani (1582-1660) had attributed this phenomenon to the weight of the atmosphere, but it was Torricelli who hit upon the idea of experimenting with the heavier and more compact fluid mercury. In a letter written in 1644 Torricelli described what was to become a famous experiment, in which he filled a long tube with mercury, placed a finger over the open end and inverted the tube so that its mouth was submerged in a dish of mercury. When he removed his finger the level of mercury in the tube fell to about thirty inches, leaving what became known as the Torricellian vacuum. Torricelli explained his results by saying 'We live submerged at the bottom of an ocean of the element air, which by unquestioned experi- ments is known to have weight', 1 and he drew the conclusion that varia- tions in the height of the mercury reflected variations in the air pressure. To Pascal, who learned of Torricelli's work from Mersenne, this sug- gested a simple but striking test for the hypothesis: the air pressure, and therefore the height of the mercury, should be less at the peak of a moun- tain than at its foot. In 1648 the experiment was successfully carried out 1 Evangelista Torricelli, Opere, ed. G. Loria and G. Vassura, Vol. 3 (Faenza, 1919), p. 187; see Galileo, Discorsi, ed. Carugo and Geymonat, pp. 616-22; C. de Waard, L'exper- ience barometrique (Thouars, 1936) and W. E. K. Middleton, The history of the barometer (Baltimore, 1964). 157 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR on the Puy-de-D6me by Florin Peiier. Meanwhile von Guericke was developing at Magdeburg apparatus for withdrawing the air imprisoned between two tightly fitting hemispheres, and in 1654 he publicly demon- strated the powerful force which then united the two hemispheres: teams of horses could not separate them. These striking experiments drew attention to the unexpected opportunities for studying physical and physiological behaviour in the absence of air. The air pump became the first complex machine in laboratory use, it accustomed scientists to working with controlled and wholly artificial conditions, and the wealth of new infor- mation that resulted was proof again of the value of apparatus and in- struments in extending the range of available evidence. A number of problems in acoustics also began to give way when attacked by a combination of mathematics and experiment. Following the six- teenth-century work of Girolamo Fracastoro, Giovanni Battista Bene- detti and Galileo's father Vincenzo Galilei, between 1614 and 1634 Beeckman, Descartes and Mersenne finally established the fundamental proposition that pitch is proportional to frequency of vibration and the laws relating pitch to the length, tension and specific gravity of vibrating strings and to similar quantities in pipes and percussion instruments, and so were able to give physical explanations of resonance, consonance and dissonance. 1 Mersenne published these results as well as further original work, including the law relating the frequency to the length of a pendulum and its application to the measurement of time, in his systematic treatises Harmonicorum libri (1636) and Harmonie universelle, contenant la theorie et la pratique de la musique (1636-7). In these and later works he also pioneered the scientific study of overtones, the measurement of the speed of sound which he showed to be independent of pitch and loudness, and the investigation of the medium of sound. He established that the inten- sity of sound varied, like that of light, inversely with the square of the distance from the source. Galileo published some similar results relating to vibrating strings and the pendulum in the Discourses on two new sciences (1638), and it was his discussion in this work of the vacuum in a suction pump that stimulated the experiments begun by Gasparo Berti probably shortly before 1642, and completed by Guericke and Robert Boyle, demonstrating conclusively that the medium of sound in the atmosphere is air. In these fields of physical science, application of the mathematical and experimental method to problems interpreted through the mechanical philosophy proved immediately successful; elsewhere results were less fortunate. Magnetism, for example, had been the subject of an intensive investigation by William Gilbert (1540-1603), whose De magnete was 1 C. V. Palisca,' Scientific empiricism in musical thought', in Seventeenth century science and the arts, ed. H. H. Rhys (Princeton, 1961); Crombie,' Mathematics, music and medical science' and forthcoming studies of Galileo and Mersenne. 158 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SCIENTIFIC MOVEMENT AND ITS INFLUENCE published in 1600, and this was followed by other notable works such as the Philosophica magnetica (1629) of the Jesuit Niccolo Cabeo (1586-1650) and the monumental Magnes (1641) of another Jesuit Athanasius Kircher (1601-80). But although magnetic phenomena were becoming familiar, the nature of magnetism remained a profound mystery. It was Descartes 1 who removed much of the wonder surrounding it by giving a purely mechanical account of its action, but his explanation failed to achieve quantitative predictive power. The study of electricity, meanwhile, made little progress because methods of generating electricity were lacking and so there was limited evidence on which to theorize. Chemistry, on the other hand, was embarrassed for the opposite reason. Thousands of years of metallurgical practice and alchemical theory and experiment had amassed a great variety of empirical knowledge, and to the normal human urge to understand were added the pressing require- ments of the physician, the druggist, the dyeworker, and many others. It was a daunting prospect, in the face of which many took refuge in hope- lessly inadequate theories which they made little attempt to support by experiment except by way of brief illustration. Interest still centred on reactions on heating. Apparatus was crude and fragile, and it was difficult both to maintain an adequate temperature and to prevent the heated vessels from shattering. Substances were seldom unadulterated, and those chiefly studied were organic and therefore complex. Under such condi- tions the interplay of mathematics and experiment would clearly have been impossible even if there had been an agreed interpretative scheme such as the mechanical philosophy, and the developments of lasting value that occurred were mainly at the levels of technique and natural history. Thus the German iatrochemist Glauber devised a method of preparing 'Glauber's salt', and obtained sal ammoniac from urine, common salt, soot and bulls' blood. Chemical and alchemical theory meanwhile was divided between various schools, with the Aristotelian four elements and the three prin- ciples of Paracelsus predominant. At this level the most original con- tribution came from van Helmont, who taught that water was the basis of all substances. Air was for him chemically inert, but he obtained various gases which he regarded as air with impurities. By contrast some chemists, notably Daniel Sennert (1572-1637) and Joachim Jung, were already beginning to explain chemical reactions in terms of the motions of atoms, and in this they foreshadowed the work of Robert Boyle (1627-91) who was to bring chemical theory within the mechanical philosophy and so make chemistry a respected part of physics. The third large field of natural philosophy in which the programmes of experimental and of mechanistic analysis combined to produce a radically 1 Princ.philos., iv. 144 ff. 159 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR new system of thought in this period was that defined by Galileo's phrase 'the animate and sensitive body'. 1 The philosophical assumption that the whole physical world, including living bodies, operated as a system of mechanics defined the problem as that of discovering the particular mechanisms concerned. Achievement was limited by the tools of research available: macroscopic anatomy, elementary knowledge of mechanics, geometrical optics and some other physical sciences, some elementary chemistry, simple instruments such as the scalpel and ligature, the lens, and the balance. In addition, the comparative method was revealed as a powerful instrument of research, both into the mechanisms of the body and into the rational ordering of living nature as a whole. The outstanding physiological achievement of the period was the demonstration of the circulation of the blood by Harvey. Educated in medicine at Padua, Harvey used its methods. He has studied there for five years under the great comparative anatomist and embryologist Fabrizio, Galileo's colleague and personal physician and author of the first clear description of valves in the veins. Another of Galileo's colleagues, San- torio, systematically introduced quantitative methods into medicine, designing instruments to measure temperature and pulse-rate; in his De medicina statica (1614) he described a famous experiment in which he spent several days on a large balance weighing food and excrement in order to determine the material exchanges of the body. But it was Harvey who succeeded in using these methods to bring about a revolution in theory, first in the specific theory of the motion of the blood and then, because of the role of the blood in existing physiological systems, in physiological theory as a whole. The Galenic physiology with which Harvey had to contend was based on the division of the body into three great independent systems: those of the veins, the arteries, and the (hollow) nerves. Venous blood carrying 'natural spirit' was supposed to be manufactured in the liver and to flow out in the veins from that organ, carrying nutriment to the whole body. Some of this blood entered the right side of the heart, whence, as it was shown in the sixteenth century, it went to the lungs and so to the left side of the heart. In the left ventricle this venous blood was endowed by the 'air' from the lungs with 'vital spirit' (the principle of life manifested as innate heat) and converted into arterial blood, which the arteries then distributed throughout the body. Some of this again was converted in the brain into 'animal spirit', the principle of sensation and voluntary move- ment which operated through the hollow nerves. According to his own statement and the evidence of his manuscript notes for his lectures at the Royal College of Physicians, Harvey's doubts about the Galenic system for the blood and realization of its circulation developed in stages from over nine years before writing his De motu 1 // Saggiatore, question 48, in Opere, ed. naz. Vol. 6, pp. 348, 351. 160 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SCIENTIFIC MOVEMENT AND ITS INFLUENCE cordis (1628). 1 In this work he set out the full argument, an elegant essay in fact if not in name in the Paduan logic of 'resolution and composition', establishing the essential propositions of his new theory. Galen had had an accurate knowledge of the anatomy of the heart and of the course of the blood through it as determined by its valves. But he thought that it was when the heart expanded that the arterial blood entered the aorta and the pulse occurred. Harvey showed that the heart pushed the blood out into the arteries when its muscle contracted, its structure allowing a flow through it in only one direction; later he compared it to a kind of force-pump. He showed by means of ligatures, puncturing of appropriate vessels, and observations on a variety of animals and embryos, that the blood could flow through the body also in only one direction, to the heart through the veins, whose valves prevented any return flow, and then out through the arteries. He calculated that the heart pumped through itself in an hour an amount of blood weighing more than the whole body. This amount could not be continuously manufactured in the liver, as the Galenic theory would have to suppose, and this led to the conclusion that the veins and arteries formed a single system through which the blood was propelled in a circle by the beat of the heart's muscle. Apart from a lens with which he observed the flow of blood through a transparent shrimp and other small animals, Harvey used techniques that were familiar to Galen. His triumph was a triumph of thought and above all of the comparative as well as the quantitative methods. Thus he likened the practice of anatomists who based general conclusions on the examination only of the dead human body to 'those who, seeing the manner of Government in one Commonwealth, frame Politicks, or they who, knowing the nature of one piece of land, believe that they under- stand agriculture' 2 . By his comparative studies he was able to see the human (and mammalian) blood system as a special case within a general theory that included within its scope all the particular circulatory systems of different animals, with and without lungs and with and without red blood, and of embryos as well as adults. Gradually accepted by the younger generation in spite of opposition from the professional establishment, especially in the medical faculty in Paris, his new system put an end to Galen's general physiology and immediately raised a whole new range of physiological questions about the functions of the blood and of the lungs, liver and other organs. But perhaps his greatest contribution to future 1 The anatomical lectures: Prelectiones anatomie universalis, de musculis, ed., with an intro., trans, and notes, by G. Whitteridge (Edinburgh and London, 1964), pp. xxv-xxix, xxxvii-li; cf. W. Pagel, William Harvey's biological ideas (Basel and N.Y., 1967); C. Webster,' William Harvey's conception of the heart as a pump', Bull. Hist. Med., Vol. 39 (1965), pp. 508-17. 2 Harvey, De motu cordis, Chapter 6; earliest English translation, London, 1653. Des- cartes in his Traite de Vhomme (1633; published posthumously in Latin, 1662, French, 1664) was one of the first to accept Harvey's theory of the circulation, but he held that the heart propelled the blood not by its muscular contraction but by heating it to vaporization so that it expanded. Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR biological thought was the example he gave of comparative experimental physiology. As a study in intellectual behaviour, De motu cordis is a model of the intelligent control of ideas by experimental analysis, its author refusing to go beyond the organic structures he could see. Some of his contem- poraries, viewing the operations of living things in the light of far more speculative schemes than his restrained Aristotelianism with its emphasis on the primacy of the heart, left their mark on the programme of enquiry by aiming to discover the more fundamental processes behind the visible. Each alternative scheme tried to extend a limited success into a universal principle of explanation. Van Helmont established one influential view by treating the living body as a system of chemical processes brought about by 'ferments' under the control of an immaterial principle, the 'archaeus'. Although hazardously speculative, van Helmont was a good experi- menter; in addition to practising medicine he spent much of his time working in the laboratory which a wealthy marriage had allowed him to construct in his house in Louvain. To test his belief that the principle of all matter was water, he carried out a quantitative experiment similar to one described by Nicholas of Cusa, growing a tree in a pot for five years merely by watering it, and finding that at the end of that period the weight of the earth in the pot had scarcely altered. 1 The starting-point of his animal physiology was his study of digestions, where he demonstrated the acid 'fermentation' in the stomach and its neutralization by the bile. His view of the disease as an alien entity or 'archaeus' entering the body led him to become a pioneer in aetiology and morbid anatomy. The chemi- cal view of physiology and medicine achieved a further success with Francois de la Boe (Sylvius, 1624-73), whose most valuable contribution was his explanation of digestion by the successive 'fermentations' of the food by the saliva, the pancreatic juice and the bile. In the field of therapy these chemical ideas came to dominate medical discussions for a time because of a furious debate, involving the French court itself, between the Galenists favouring vegetable drugs, the Paracelsists promoting the uses of inorganic drugs such as antimony and mercury, and other schools of thought. The main alternative view, that the living body could be explained as a system not of chemical but of mechanical processes, originated principally from the successes of the mathematical and mechanical sciences in explaining sensory mechanisms and behaviour. 2 In his Ad Vitellionem paralipomena (1604) Kepler had made the first great discovery in modern physiology by showing how the eye, treated simply as an optical instru- 1 Van Helmont's manuscripts were published posthumously with some additions by his son as Ortus medicinae (Amsterdam, i648);seepp. 53, 109. An English translation appeared under the title Oriatrike or, Physick Refined (London, 1662). 8 A. C. Crombie, "The mechanistic hypothesis and the scientific study of vision', Pro- ceedings of the Royal Microscopical Society, Vol. 2 (1967), pp. 3-112. 162 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SCIENTIFIC MOVEMENT AND ITS INFLUENCE ment, focused the image of an object on to the retina. The immediate effect of this discovery was to allow further problems to be formulated for exact analysis, even if not immediately solved. Kepler himself in the Dioptrice (1611), Scheiner in his Oculus (1619) and Rosa Ursina (1630), Descartes in La Dioptrique (1637), and Mersenne in his Universae . . . geometriae synopsis (1644) and Voptique et la catoptrique (1651) brought current physiological optics to an advanced scientific stage by their exact, quantitative and frequently experimental investigations of long and short sight and the design of appropriate compensating lenses, visual acuity, accommodation, the formation of a single visual field with two eyes, the relation between direct and indirect vision, and numerous other phenomena. Mersenne, first in his Harmonie universelle and later in his Cogitata physico-mathematica (1644) and Novarum observationum physico-mathematicarum tomus tres (1647), embarked on a similar analysis of hearing. In the whole problem clear distinctions between the physiological and psychological aspects of sensation, and between con- jecture and established fact, became possible and were often clearly made. Yet the enquiry was committed from the start to giving an account of the mechanisms mediating not only each special sense but also the corre- lation of the stimuli from them into a consistent view of the external world and consistent behaviour in relation to it. This question was broached in different ways by Mersenne, Gassendi and Hobbes, but it was Descartes who carried it through to the point of producing a general mechanistic model for living things. 'I want you to consider', he wrote in his TraM de Vhomme, 'that all these functions follow naturally in this machine simply from the arrangement of its parts, no more or less than do the movements of a clock, or other automata, from that of its weights and its wheels'. 1 By rigorously asking the same mechanistic question and allowing no others, by asking only what physical motions followed each preceding motion, beginning with the physical impressions of light and other material influences on the appropriate sense organs and carrying through to the consequential movements of the animal's muscles, he reduced the 'animate and sensitive body' to a system of built-in responses designed to preserve and propagate itself by pursuing the beneficial and avoiding the harmful aspects of the environment acting on it. The rela- tions between the immaterial human soul and this bodily machine Descartes made the subject of his very interesting psychological essay, Les passions de fame (1649); all other living things were simply machines. The influence of these speculations on actual discovery was probably very small; discoveries were made rather by attacking limited problems as in the work of Harvey, in that on the sensory mechanisms, and later in that which G. A. Borelli published in his De motu animalium (1680). The significance of philosophical mechanism is rather that it made explicit the 1 Oeuvres, Vol. 11 (1909), p. 202. 163 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR assumptions with which mathematicians and experimenters had already been working, providing a philosophical cosmology extending as far beyond physical science as psychology and the model for society de- scribed in Hobbes' De cive (1642), Leviathan (1651), De corpore (1655) and De homine (1657). Beyond these investigations with a clear theoretical bearing, the steady accumulation of observations continued during this whole period to throw increasing light on the diversity of natural history. Collections of hitherto unknown plants were brought back from the Americas, Africa, India, and as far afield as China and the Philippines. In Europe itself experience with breeding plants under different conditions was developed through horticulture and agriculture and the establishment of botanical gardens, mainly with a medical interest. Publications on descriptive botany grew in number and with them the number of known species, which increased from about 500 recognized by Leonard Fuchs in 1542, to about 6,000 recognized by Caspar Bauhin in his Prodromus theatri botanici (1620), and then to about 18,000 recognized by John Ray in 1682. Bauhin, Jung and other botanists tried to keep up with this accumulation by devising ever more precise and diagnostic descriptions and comprehen- sive systems of classification. The continued study of anatomy, especially in Italy and England, brought about a similar increase in knowledge of animals, and in 1645 appeared the earliest comprehensive treatise on comparative anatomy, the Zootomia Democritaea (1645) of Marc Antonio Severino (1580-1656) of Naples. A remarkable feature of this work is Severino's recognition of unity of type based on man as the 'archetype', an idea which he tried to extend to the whole animal kingdom and even to plants. Further advances were made in comparative embryo- logy, notably by Harvey in his Exercitationes de generatione animalium (1651), where the assertion, 'all animals whatever, even Viviparous also, nay man himself to be made of an Egge . . . just as the first conceptions of all Plants are certain seeds, n was to lay down a fundamental principle to be established later by experiment. Knowledge of the earth's surface likewise accumulated. A theory of ocean currents was published by a French Jesuit explorer, George Fournier, in his Hydrographie (1643), and Descartes' brilliant conjectures, attempting to account for the geological history of the earth within the general mechanistic theory of the Principia philosophiae, projected this whole subject into the evolutionary discus- sions of a later period. As in science, so in technology the application of mathematics was expected to usher in an age whose achievements would know no bounds; yet the technology of this period is related to that of the previous genera- tion rather as the sculpture of the baroque is to that of the age of Michel- 1 Exercitatio 1; cf. Exer. 62; earliest English translation, London, 1653. I64 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SCIENTIFIC MOVEMENT AND ITS INFLUENCE angelo. The picture presented to us is of a somewhat overblown style: a growing ambition linked to an achievement that falls below even that of the sixteenth century. Mathematics applied to the arts and especially to machinery could, it was thought, compel Nature to deliver to the man who knew her secrets a Faustian capacity to achieve all his desires: his carriages would require no horses, his house would never lack light, the Moon itself was not beyond his reach. Most tempting of all was the promise of perpetual motion, that will-o'-the-wisp which obsessed so many of the imaginations of our period with the dream of infinite power, a chimera which enraptured them as much as Eldorado or the Philo- sopher's Stone. As Galileo observed: I have seen the general run of mechanicians deceived in trying to apply machines to many operations impossible by their nature, of the success of which they have remained in error, while others have similarly been defrauded of the hope conceived from their promises. These deceptions seem to me to have their chief cause in the belief these craftsmen have had, and continually have, of being able to raise very great weights with a little force, as it were with their machines cheating nature, whose firmest instinct is rather that no resistance can be overcome by a force that is not more powerful than i t . . . By the deception of so many princes and to their own shame, engineers of little comprehension go dreaming, applying themselves to im- possible undertakings. 1 Little books written mostly by amateurs, like Thaumaturgus mathematicus (1628) by Gaspar Ens and Mathematicall magick (1648) by John Wilkins, spread the good news. The titles are significant: fantasy played a large part in their conceptions, and where there was a scientific basis it was often an idea that had been long since exhausted. The perpetual motions of Jan van der Straet (Stradanus, 1536-1604) were being published long after 1650, and one of the first and most famous of these works, Magia naturalis (1558) by G. B. della Porta, appeared in a fine English version in 1658, a century after its original publication. But if these dreams could only bring inevitable disappointment, pro- gress in the more routine spheres of technology was little better. For this the reason often lay outside science. Just as today, a rapid advance could only be obtained by the investment, without hope of quick returns, of sums that were not in fact forthcoming. The more ambitious schemes, although using methods already long established, were also held up by slow communications and in consequence tardy and inefficient admini- stration. Projects dragged on for decades, or were undertaken only many years after they had been first proposed. The Briare Canal, one of the first of the major French canals, connecting the Loing and Loire, took more than forty years to cover a hardly greater number of miles: begun some years before our period opens it was only completed a few years before its close. Plans for the draining of the fens, which occupied Cornelis 1 Galileo, Le mecaniche, in Opere, ed. naz. Vol. 2 (1891), pp. 155,15S. 165 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR Vermuyden (c.i 590-1677) much of the thirties and forties, had been laid down by Humphrey Bradley half a century before. The machine of state, like those of industry, creaked slowly and inefficiently into action, when correspondence might take weeks to pass from a capital to its remoter provinces. Often the demands of the state, as for guns in time of war, had to be satisfied in quantity and without delay, and therefore by the traditional methods, leaving little scope for experimentation with new techniques. The plague of 1630-1 and the recurrent economic and political crises sapped initiative. Yet in the new and rising centre of economic progress in the North Sea—England and the Netherlands, and to a lesser extent north Germany and Scandinavia— repeated failures and delays did not prevent a growing optimism and belief in the possibility of indefinite technical improvement, if only science could be applied to the 'useful arts'. Unfortunately the science that was in fact applied was often obsolete, a symptom of the gulf between academic and artisan that constituted a further barrier to technological advance. This of course did not apply to the virtuosi who were stimulated by the need to administer their estates and commercial interests. Edward Somerset (1601-67), second marquis of Worcester, employed a gun-founder to study inventions and make models of them, and in 1663 published A century of the names and scantlings of such inventions, as at present I can call to mind to have tried and perfected. Sir Nicholas Crisp (c. 1599-1666) rewarded inventors, actively encouraged the spread of their ideas, and himself devised a successful new method of making bricks. But the great majority of practical men had no contact with recent science. Galileo's masterly study of projectile motion in his Discourses on two new sciences showed that under idealized conditions a cannon-ball moved in a parabolic path, but for half a century afterwards the only books likely to fall into the hands of gunners continued to expound the doctrine taught by Tartaglia as long ago as 1537. Harriot's innumerable contributions to the desperate problem of accurate naviga- tion began under his first patron Raleigh and went on after Raleigh's fall in 1603. Edward Wright (c.1558-1615), translator of Stevirfs Haven-finding art and author of the famous Certaine errors in navigation (1599), until his death provided new tables and techniques in the use of charts and lectured annually on navigation on behalf of the East India Company. John Tapp (fl. 1596-1631) and Briggs and Gunter of Gresham College continued this work, but how limited was their impact is shown by the republication in 1644 of Pathway to perfect sayling by Richard Polter, sometime Master of the King's Ships and typically conservative in outlook, whose book was hopelessly outdated when it first appeared in 1605. This preference shown by practical man for the traditional and tried techniques meant that the direction of influence was rather from technology to science: the difficulty of pumping mines clear of water, the repeated 166 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SCIENTIFIC MOVEMENT AND ITS INFLUENCE failures of apparatus in spite of the successes of small-scale models, the gunner's uncertainty over the correct elevation of his piece, all suggested problems that were given an autonomous existence within pure science rather than made occasions for science to aid technology. Yet another obstacle to technological advance lay in the very nature of the new scientific ideas. The paradox whereby the complexity of the natural world must be idealized before it can be understood had been appreciated and accepted by the new philosophy both at the conceptual level and in controlled experiments. But it was altogether more difficult to take the next step and connect theory with the actual crudities of a primitive technology. Where the theory was classical the attempt to apply it was sometimes made. In innumerable contraptions gear was added to gear, lever to lever, in the fond expectation that, as with the idealized machines of mechanical theory, a small force would operate the whole. Where the theory was novel application was not even attempted. The range of a gun might be of great importance, but there was little use in applying Galileo's parabolas to a situation where not only was wind- resistance a major factor but powder, shot and bore all varied consider- ably; as Halley was to write, gunners 'loose all the Geometrical accuracy of their art from ye unfittness of ye boare to ye ball, & ye uncertain reverse of ye Gun, which is indeed verry hard to overcome'. 1 Not surprisingly, then, the technological successes of the period were comparatively few. Dyeing improved strikingly, Cornelis Drebbel, that most fertile and ingenious of inventors, being partly responsible for a new scarlet dye that appeared about 1620. Complex machinery became popular with the spread of the knitting machine invented by William Lee in 1589. But the most significant developments were the result of a better understanding of the limitations of a mere multiplication of gears: the attempts to find new prime movers. To begin with there were efforts to expand the use of wind power which had proved so invaluable in draining the Netherlands. The first attempt at a land vehicle driven by an inanimate power was the Dutch sailing cart which tradition ascribes to Stevin. But it proved more a toy, a new game for Prince Maurice, than a generally useful means of transport. More fertile for the future was the use of steam. Here too the first experiments were amusements more than anything, automata inspired by Hero of Alexandria. Hero's aeolipile, in which a small boiler emitted a jet of steam from a narrow pipe, had been used in the Renaissance for reinforcing fires. Ens mentions a great many applications for the aeolipile, most of them toys although he does include the driving of mills, and Giovanni Branca (1571-1640) in Le machine (1629) describes one to take the place of a jet of water in working a powder-mill. The idea has obvious 1 Edmond Halley, 19 March 1700/1, in Correspondence and papers, ed. E. F. MacPike (Oxford, 1932), p. 168. 167 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR drawbacks and, like projects' to drive up water by fire, not by drawing or sucking it upwards', 1 came to nothing. But it gave would-be improvers ideas, as did other failures of the period, and forced them to re-examine their theoretical foundations. The period concluded then, despite the slow rate of progress, on a note of optimism and a sense of opening frontiers. There was a growing demand that this progress should be organized, the various useful arts studied with a view to their improvement, and scientific methods applied to the calculation of sounder technological theories. Philosophy and the useful arts were now to join hands to bring in an age of indefinite improve- ment, and both were to be brought under the shelter of national organi- zations. During this period these ideas had been put forward by some- what eccentric individuals, at best by small groups. Their general adoption early in the second half of the century began a new era. 1 Marquis of Worcester, A century of inventions, No. 68. 168 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHAPTER V CHANGES IN RELIGIOUS THOUGHT T HE first decades of the seventeenth century played a special role in the evolution of religious thought. They were neither the seedtime of new ideas about the relationship of God to man nor a time of the discarding of old beliefs, but rather the age in which some of the great issues of religious history were fought out anew. The chief concern of religious thought was one which had never lost interest since the beginnings of Christianity, that of man's free will and of his freedom to arrive at his own religious experiences. This problem was reflected in the controversies over free will and predestination which rent both Calvinism and Catholi- cism in our period. On another level, it was reflected in the quest for religious individualism against a religious orthodoxy which had become dominant in both Protestantism and Catholicism. Under the impact of the theological quarrels which centred on these issues, the orthodox and their challengers, as well as those believing either in free will or predestination, took ever more radical positions. Thus some important ideas became re-emphasized. Rationalism penetrated to the very heart of religious thought, bringing the formulation of an explicit rational religion. This period also witnessed a growing trend towards deism and even unbelief. At the other end of the religious spectrum, religious individualism led to pietism and to a renewed mysticism. Beneath the issues raised by such religious thought coursed the piety of the ordinary people. We know almost nothing about this popular piety; yet it cannot be omitted from this account since modes of popular religious expression posed problems which theologians had to meet. It will be useful to start with a discussion of Protestant religious ortho- doxy. By the end of the sixteenth century both Lutheranism and Calvinism were revolutionary movements which had run their course. The Lutheran Reformation had begun with the 'pure' word of Scripture, but now Scripture was in danger of being replaced by officially enforced confes- sions of faith. The Book of Concordance of 1580 had become binding for two-thirds of German Protestantism. It included Luther's Catechism, the Confession of Augsburg, and the articles of the League of Schmalkalden. Contemporaries called the book a 'pope made out of paper', and it was indeed the Lutheran counterpart to the Canons of the Council of Trent. Everywhere there were attempts to define religious faith and to enforce the definitions. Luther himself became one sanctified, a 'last Elias'. Even the printers' mistakes in his works became a part of the new Holy Writ. The impetus for orthodoxy was provided by the quest for order in an Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR age when diversity of religious expression was regarded as' denial of religious truth. Every new form of religious worship, once it had estab- lished itself, sought to guard its own truth by excluding all others as heresy. At a time when toleration was thought to be the condoning of heresy or at best to be religious indifference, a surge towards orthodoxy was inevitable even in movements which themselves had once been regarded as heresies. Exceptions to this trend were found in those modes of religious expression—notably the Arminians and Socinians—which sought to widen the allowable within their own framework of thought. In the sixteenth and seventeenth centuries the impetus towards ortho- doxy was further strengthened by another traditional belief, that religious divergence was political treason. Religious disorder meant chaos, and chaos in turn meant dissolution of all established political and social order. This was not, however, merely the theory of conservatives who desired to preserve things as they were; a practical reason strengthened such belief. Throughout the history of Christianity in the West religious challenges to authority had been accompanied by political challenges. In Lutheranism there had been from the beginning an incipient conflict between religious individualism and the attempt to preserve order. It was order which won, even during Luther's lifetime, and the religious wars strengthened the feeling that political order and religious order were inexorably intertwined. Lutheranism's equation of natural law with the Decalogue provided a strong rationale for the princes to regulate the faith, since the interpreta- tion of natural law had always been a concern of rulers. Calvinists, like those of the Palatinate, were at one in this belief with the Lutherans. State control was spelled out in a series of 'church orders' issued throughout the sixteenth century. What started as the ordering of the outward manner of worship shaded over by the end of that century into the regulation of belief itself. This was a step which Luther had always opposed, yet con- fessions of faith triumphed throughout the Lutheran as well as the Cal- vinist world. The Anglican church followed this pattern. The Acts of Uniformity equated political loyalty with religious obedience. The Thirty- nine Articles went beyond outward conformity and attempted to order belief, although the lines were loosely drawn and some divergence of belief was allowed. Though the enforcement machinery of such conformity varied, it tended to become vested in the powerful classes of the community. In Branden- burg the landlords enforced religious conformity and in England the justices of the peace were at times used for the same purpose. In towns, the gilds played an important part in effecting the religious conformity of their members. Calvinist Hesse used the nobility as well as the magistrates to oversee religious discipline. There was a tendency in Germany for ecclesiastical control to gravitate to the lowest authorities, the local squire 170 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHANGES IN RELIGIOUS THOUGHT and village council. However they were enforced, it was the ruler who laid down the regulations and decided upon the confession of faith for his territories. In addition to defining belief, these regulations emphasized church attendance. Fines were often imposed on those who did not attend ser- vices or who were lax in taking communion. The regulations also signifi- cantly included a check on the morals of the community. Loose habits were taken to mean general political and social unreliability. Order had to be observed here as in all else. Once again there was a real base to the theory. As we shall see, the 'atheistic' movements of the century tended to be libertine. Moreover, in Germany the imperial police regulations of the fifteenth and sixteenth centuries gave an example to Protestant princes. They had condemned blasphemy, luxury, and drinking as evils which would bring upon the empire the wrath of God. Since drunkenness was the curse of Germany in our period, there was good practical reasoning behind such regulations. The pater patriae, the territorial ruler, had to guard his people. Because these vices led to hell, the citizens had to be protected from them as a part of religious conformity. How effective were these regulations? Sometimes they were accom- panied by cynicism. In Brandenburg the ministers were told to subscribe to the Book of Concordance but after that, could think and teach as they liked. 1 These sentiments remind one of that Elizabethan cynicism which emphasized subscription to Anglicanism chiefly as a matter of political loyalty. Even where there was less sophistication it seemed easier to make regulations than to enforce them. The Magdeburg visitation of 1656 tells us that there were no Bibles in the churches, that converts waited for years before having their children baptized, that preachers were not properly installed, and that weekday sermons had ceased in the country districts. Above all, popular piety went its own way, since it was difficult to harness its exuberance through regulations. In the border regions between the faiths, Protestants streamed to Catholic festivities to obtain holy water blessed against sickness, to take part in religious processions, or to make merry at the inauguration of new churches. The triumphal entrance of the great Spanish saints Ignatius Loyola and Francis Xavier into Germany also affected Lutheran regions. Many a Lutheran living on the North Sea believed in Xavier as the pro- tector against stormy seas, and as late as 1772 Protestants of Schwerin asked for Ignatius water to heal animal diseases. Similarly, the books of edification of the Spanish mystic Louis de Granada spread throughout Protestant lands. On this level, the baroque did not by-pass Protestant countries. Men everywhere delighted in a world which was not abstract 1 I. P. Meyer,' Der Konfessionszwang in den deutschen evangelischen landeskirchen des 16.-18. Jahrhunderts', Zeitschrift der Geschichte der Niedersachsischen Kirche, Vol. xxxiv (1929), p. 284. 171 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008 7-2DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR but which stressed spectacles, feasts, and the imagination. Religion was a release from the drabness of daily life and from the many evil spirits and dangers that were menacing on all sides. If more often than not popular religious expression managed to circumvent the regulations of morals and belief, it was still true that such regulations were successful at times in controlling religious and political thought. Of the many antimonarchical systems of the century, none arose on Lutheran soil. The acceptance of confessions of faith did not mean an end to theo- logical argument; instead they gave it a different turn. Theologians now disputed not the fundamentals of faith but the words of the confessions. Such disputations, carried on both by Calvinist and Lutheran orthodoxy, were bound to be scholastic in tone, and the kind of argument which Luther had condemned when he talked about 'foolish Aristotle'. Signifi- cantly, one leading Lutheran now called the logic of Aristotle' God's own logic'. Dialectics came into its own. Since no new dogmas could be formed, theologians became logicians. An important consequence of this Protestant scholasticism was the application of reason to religious debate. These theologians thought to prove the rightness of the confessions by the exercise of logic and reason. It seemed that in Lutheran orthodoxy the spirit of rationalism triumphed over the Bible. If we search beyond the endless hair-splitting that these arguments involved, another unlooked-for consequence emerges. The very narrow- ness of theological speculation and its rationalist tendencies gave a fuller freedom to the development of natural sciences on Lutheran soil than elsewhere. A Lutheran prince furthered the publication of Copernicus' work and a Lutheran printer published it. Underlying this openness of Lutheranism to the natural sciences was Luther's own idea that heaven as the seat of God was not a fixed place in a geographical sense. This gave to the cosmos a kind of infinity which was able to assimilate more rapidly the great astronomical discoveries of the age. When Copernicus' ideas were taught, it was in Lutheran universities like that at Tubingen. 1 These consequences of Lutheran orthodoxy were not apparent to con- temporaries. The new scholasticism seemed stifling to them. It quite con- sciously excluded all those from religious discussions who were not qualified theologians, that is to say, ordained ministers. This assertion of the ministers' powers led one of them to state bluntly that only theologians could go to heaven. Such high claims came at the very time when mini- sters were declining in social status. The Thirty Years War had much to do with this decline, though such a development had haunted Lutheranism from the beginning. The ministers' material position was wretched; many preachers had to have a second profession as trader or craftsman, while in the countryside they tended in effect to become peasants. A basic abuse was the impropriation of the worldly goods of the churches, which were 1 Werner Elert, Morphologie des Lutherthums (Munich, 1952), Vol. I, pp. 374 ff. 172 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHANGES IN RELIGIOUS THOUGHT sometimes pawned or sold outright. This was a general evil of the century and was not confined to Lutheran regions. Rising prices in the second half of the century made bad conditions still worse. In Germany after 1633 there were frequent unsuccessful attempts to free the rural clergy from a condition in which the minister was often simply a 'Latinizing peasant'. This was not the fault of orthodoxy, but it demonstrated that even as religious thought became the monopoly of theologians and the minister's role was increasingly stressed, his status in society was deteriorating. In the reactions against orthodoxy two different phenomena confront us. Initially there was a religious disorientation which led to a questioning of Christianity itself. 1 One German cobbler, for example, became in turn a Lutheran, a monk, a pietist, and a Catholic once more, only to end as a Jew, because for him the only certain fact was the existence of one God. Such a loss of religious moorings was manifest in all parts of Christianity. Less specifically, the second half of the century saw in the Lutheran regions a general decline in church attendance. In the end the trend towards deism and rationalism received an impetus through this religious disorientation. Immediately, however, the second aspect of the reaction towards ortho- doxy was more important. This reaction was linked to a deep-rooted trend of popular piety—that mysticism and chiliasm which Protestantism had combated from the beginning. Chiliasm, the expectation of the end of the world and the last judgement, fulfilled the deep need for hope among the lower classes but not among those classes only. It ran like a thread through much of the religious thought of the period. In Cromwell's England many radical sects lived in such expectation. In Germany as well as in Holland, chiliastic visions were frequent. These were spread by unlettered peasant preachers. One of their number proclaimed that 'misery and hate' were the lot of the peasant but the last judgement would obliterate them and redress human inequalities. Such preaching was also anti-clerical. In 1590 another successful peasant preacher told his audiences that hell was paved with ministers, and in it masters, intellec- tuals, and gamblers were chained together like the hounds of the devil. Enmity towards authority, the learned, and the preachers of the church were all one in this chiliastic thought. Such religious attitudes led to extremes. In Saxony in 1621 many peasants sold their lands in order to go to Zion in the expectation of Christ. This release from daily misery was not confined to German or Dutch peasants or to English Puritan radicals; the Jews also experienced the same phenomena. The appearance of the 'Pseudo Messiah Sabbatai Zevi (1626-76) led many to sell their all in order to follow him to the Holy Land. This ferment gave rise to one of the greatest figures in German religious thought, the Silesian cobbler Jakob Boehme (1575-1624). His chiliasm 1 Leo Baeck, Spinozas erste Einwirkung auf Deutschland (Berlin, 1895), p. 61. 173 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR was drawn from the social misery of his native Silesia which he believed God could only have permitted because the last judgement was at hand. The church too was unimportant to Boehme as a preacher of the word. The true church was the 'invisible' church of the reborn. This belief made for tolerance, for it was unimportant whether or not one were a professed Christian as long as one strove towards God. Boehme, however, was no deist; in his thought, Christ was the salvation from death and sin, and the picture of Christ in the heart of man made it possible for him to unite with the Deity, to be reborn. God would realize himself in that human being who could become immune to carnal lusts. Religion thus became uniquely a matter of inward faith, of the soul. Boehme was therefore symptomatic of another trend in seventeenth- century Christian thought which was coursing beneath the official ortho- doxies. On the Catholic side at the same time, Francis de Sales spoke of a need to go beyond Christian institutions to Christian inspiration. The evangelism of the early Jansenists had much the same emphasis. But Francis de Sales and the Jansenists believed that the church and its sacra- ments were essential in Christian inspiration, while for Boehme God re- vealed himself not in the church but in and through nature. Through nature one might learn to understand Scripture, and Boehme hoped that the quarrels of the theologians would thereby be ended. Nature was at once good in her trees, stones, and flowers, and bad in her continuous ruthless struggle for existence. Life could be understood only through this contrast. What then was the relationship of all this to the reborn man? Only he could see the godliness of Nature, of God revealing himself. Just as God was above the good and evil in nature, so man had to overcome the dialectic of anxiety and freedom. 'In overcoming is joy', and only through suffering could the human spirit be conscious of itself. Boehme's mysticism rejected predestination: it was man's own will, the working of Christ within him, which led to rebirth. Boehme's view of human nature was optimistic; man was essentially predisposed to good rather than evil. This voluntarism contrasted with the ideas of the Jan- senist Blaise Pascal, who emphasized man's sinfulness. The Silesian cobbler had a kind of happiness not to be found in the tortured soul of the Parisian intellectual. The reborn viewed nature happily once he had overcome the dualism of good and evil. This emphasis upon nature was important; it was a part of the new feeling in the seventeenth century. The God of the Bible left the Word, now imprisoned in confessions, and emerged in nature to be recognized and worshipped. We find identical ideas among the writings of the Rosicrucians (1614- 16), although they also placed emphasis on alchemy, the stone of wisdom, and secret rituals. With them too, God was the God of nature, even if he was connected with it not through the human soul reborn but in the mysteries of alchemy. In England such extreme Puritan sects as the 174 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHANGES IN RELIGIOUS THOUGHT Ranters had that same feeling for nature. They wished to live 'in unity with the creation'. They shared their ideas, in turn, with the learned and sophisticated Cambridge Platonists. This religious thought was con- nected with the neo-Platonic belief in a spiritual principle which illumined all the world. The emphasis on nature, bound up with mysticism here, could at the same time lead to an anti-Christian philosophy. Lucilio Vanini, a contemporary of Boehme, wrote of 'nature which is God'. His Secrets of Nature (1616) was called, not without reason, an introduction to the undevout life. Did he not cry out on the scaffold 'a miserable Jew [i.e. Christ] is the cause that I am here'? For Boehme, the Ranters and the Cambridge Platonists, God reflected himself in nature, but to Vanini and his group, nature herself was divine. Jakob Boehme's own mysticism, unlike orthodoxy, infused all of nature with Christianity and did not confine it to a narrow confessional base. Boehme's influence was wide- spread and in revolutionary England his writings were widely read. 1 Piety, however, was not confined to such modes of expression. There was also an emerging pietism which sought to revive faith within the framework of orthodoxy. Johann Valentin Andreae constructed his Christianopolis (1619) as a place of refuge based upon virtue inculcated through education in the love of God. Such a piety also informed Johannes Arndt's True Christianity (1605), but here personal belief was emphasized: 'piety of the heart'. Religious creativity also found other outlets within accepted orthodoxy. The hymn, free from the confine of the letter of faith, provided a partial release. Paulus Gerhardt (1607-76) proved to be, after Luther, Protestantism's greatest hymnologist. In con- trast with the dogmatic sermons of theologians, Gerhardt's hymns touched the mainstream of popular piety. They were songs of the cross and of consolation, written against the background of the Thirty Years War. Calvinism saw a similar attempt to revive piety within orthodoxy after the Synod of Dort through pietistic conventicles which were intended to serve as examples. These in turn were similar in purpose to the ora- tories founded as a part of the Catholic Reformation. The reaction against orthodoxy, then, meant both religious disorienta- tion and a deepening of personal faith. The contrast between this faith and orthodox thought can be seen in a typical orthodox funeral eulogy: the deceased, it said, never failed to attend church: he was always the first in church and the last to leave it; he was conscientious in taking the sacraments, in reading the Holy Scripture, and in leading a life of sobriety and moderation. There is nothing about inner piety, the linking of his soul to God; instead, church attendance had become the prime mark of the pious man. 2 Not only Lutheran orthodoxy preached such eulogies. 1 Cf. Wilhelm Struck, Dei- Einfluss Jakob Boehmes auf die Englische Literatur des 17 Jahrhunderts (Berlin, 1936), p. 195. 2 D. A. Tholuck, Vorgeschichte des Rationalismus (Berlin, 1862), Vol. n (pt. 2), p. 203. 175 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR In England also church attendance played a primary role in official reli- gion, and in most Calvinist countries it was no different. Orthodoxy was the officially sanctioned religion in an age of increasing conformity. It was religious control in the age of sovereignty and mercantilism. The problems of Lutheran orthodoxy were duplicated in Calvinism. Yet, despite such similarity, the relationship between these two chief branches of Protestantism was far from amicable. Characteristic was the Lutheran theologian who in 1621 attempted to prove that the Calvinists agreed in ninety-nine points with the Arians and Turks and that the Huguenot martyrs deserved their fate. Such feeling is easy to understand against the background of rivalry exacerbated by the Thirty Years War in which Lutheran princes preferred co-operation with the emperor to union with the Calvinists. The original Lutheran attack on the papacy was now partly deflected against the Calvinists and partly broadened to include them. The slogan 'keep us, Lord, close to your holy word, and put an end to the murdering Popes and Turks' was interpreted by one Lutheran preacher to include with the pope's name that of 'all our enemies', that is to say, the Anabaptists and the Calvinists. In spite of such polemics, the actual development of Calvinism and Lutheranism towards orthodoxy was very similar. Calvinist princes also ordered their church. Even where the church took form as a presbytery, rulers promulgated orders for it and told the elders what to do. The church orders of Hesse in 1657 were an example of such commands to the supposedly elected officials of the church. The democratic element in the Calvinist church structure was vanishing. Calvin's successor at Geneva, Theodore Beza (1519-1605), stressed the function of the ministers. Calvin's biblical ordering of the Christian community was in Beza's hands centred on the religious aristocracy of preachers. Here, as in Lutheranism, the ministry trained as theologians became the pivots of the church. The increasingly authoritarian church organization was accompanied also by a series of confessions of faith: the Confessio Gallicana of 1559, Scotia of 1560, and the Heidelberg Cate- chism of 1563. In England, too, when the Presbyterians had a chance at power, they tried to impose the Westminster Confession of Faith in 1647. These confessions differed as to the strictness of detail. The Helvetic Consensus of 1675 made the vowel points of Hebrew in Scripture a matter of regulation. The basic tenets of Calvinism and its view of Scrip- ture were here codified into an official interpretation. It is important to realize that this Calvinist orthodoxy entailed a denial of free will on the part of a predestined man. The element of predestination emerged more sharply in Calvinist orthodoxy than in Calvin's own work. The Re- former's image of the world as the 'theatre of God' was taken to mean that God rigidly controlled his actors. Mankind was divided into the elect and the damned, and it was widely held that the 'saints' could not 176 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHANGES IN RELIGIOUS THOUGHT fall from grace. The gulf between the will of God and the actions freely taken by men was vast and unbridgeable. This was true even when these ideas were expressed with moderation as, for example, by the leader of Calvinist orthodoxy in Holland, Franciscus Gomarus (1563-1641), who asserted that no man taught that God absolutely decreed to cast man away without sin. As he did decree the end, however, so he decreed the means—that as he predestined man to death, so he predestined man to sin, the only way to death. Gomarus' statement to the Synod of Dort was echoed by the synod's canon that God chose certain individuals from the mass of fallen man for salvation while the rest of sinful mankind was doomed. This orthodox thought had a great deal of appeal. It gave to Calvinism a faith in the cause of its elect which was echoed by that English Puritan who wrote: 'For who would not courageously fight that is beforehand assured of victory?' This piety had to reject any human tampering with the Divine. It was small wonder that the opponents of Calvinist ortho- doxy believed that such emphasis upon God's will swamped all personal or scriptural religious experience. In the Netherlands, opposition to orthodoxy came into its own. A predominantly urban and commercial community with its emphasis on private initiative in trade found it rather difficult to understand the powerlessness of man before God. This state- ment needs qualification, however, for election could be and was equated with external success as a successful waging of war against sin. More important for the challenge to orthodoxy, however, was the humanist tradition of the Netherlands, the country of Erasmus and of the Christian Renaissance. Arminianism has rightly been called a theological revival of humanism. 1 Jacobus Arminius (1560-1609), a professor at the University of Leiden, found himself unable to defend the orthodox Belgic Confession, though he had been brought up in orthodoxy and had been a student of Beza's. His chief opponent was Franciscus Gomarus, a Leiden colleague. What started as a dispute within the university soon became a debate dividing all Calvinism. Arminius sought to modify the doctrine of predestination, which had always been the Achilles heel of Calvinism. Together with his disciples he made the attack on predestination the basis for advocacy of a more general religious liberalism. The controversy began in 1603 when Arminius accused Gomarus of making God the author of sin through stress on God's direct rule over man, allowing man no freedom. This accusation was a commonplace one against the predestinarians; it had been made forcefully by Cardinal Bellarmine against the erirlier Calvinists. Gomarus in turn accused Arminius of reviving the Pelagian heresy by exalting the human element 1 1, p. Hans Emil Weber, Reformation, Orthodoxie und Rationalismus (Gutersloh, 1951), Vol. 100. 177 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR in redemption so as to obscure the doctrine of grace given freely of God's own volition. Since the controversy between the Jesuits and the Jansenists also concerned the accusation of Pelagianism, we touch once more upon a general current of the century. A basic problem of Christian thought was involved; how to reconcile the sovereignty of God with the free will of man. Arminius believed that the human will had to co-operate freely with God in salvation. Free will thus became necessary for the reception of grace, and in this manner personal religious striving became the centre of religious experience. Arminius was especially concerned with the imprisonment of Scripture within the bounds of theological determinism; he tried to revive the centrality of the Holy Word by reasserting the principle of private judgement. Truth in religion was not something cer- tain as orthodoxy professed, but something towards which man, guided by Scripture, had to strive by means of his free will. Several important consequences follow from this doctrine. Since the decree of election applied only to those who repented, believed, and per- severed in their individual striving, the elect were not a fixed religious elite. Election was thus fluid, and the saints could fall from grace while the reprobate could attain it. Moreover, the bitter quarrels of theologians were beside the point in a faith oriented to Scripture revitalized by private judgement. Doctrinal belief or theological creeds were not necessary to Christian communion. Arminians came to distinguish between funda- mental and non-fundamental creeds. The only fundamentals were the language of Scripture and the creeds of the Apostles. Here was a lati- tudinarianism opposed to the 'vanity of dogmatizing'. A rational spirit was also in evidence. The Holy Word being central, Arminianism could only make good its arguments by biblical enquiry, and here it used a rational method. To Luther, reason was a whore, but for the Arminians reason was a revelation from God within which man's free will moved. Arminius died in the early phase of this controversy. His successor as leader of the Arminians was Simon Episcopius (1583-1643), who led the movement through the critical phase of its development and formulated still more sharply the tenets of Arminianism. For him, the whole per- sonality was destroyed if man lost free will. Moreover, doctrine should be reduced to its essentials. 'It is better to err concerning a truth that is nonessential, than so to misuse or correct views of it as to make it an occasion for dissension and odium.' Christ had died for all and made everyone's salvation possible, not just that of the elect. Before the Synod of Dort he reiterated the essence of Arminian belief: Scripture and solid reason would lead to the truth. Man's conscience should rest not on the vote of the multitude (the synod) but upon the strength of reason. Epis- copius was a forceful leader, and upon hearing him the Englishman John Hales 'bade Calvin good-night'. Arminians also stressed personal piety and here Jan Uytenbogaert, with his practical bent, added impetus. 178 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHANGES IN RELIGIOUS THOUGHT Personal piety was the highest good and could not be captured within the confines of a religious organization. The controversy became a concern for the whole of the Netherlands when in 1610 the Arminians presented the States of Holland with a Remonstrance setting forth their views. From that time on, they were called the 'Remonstrants'. The Remon- strance rejected the idea of election and predestination; challenged the concept that Christ died for the elect alone and the belief in irresistible grace, i.e. the exclusion of man's free will from co-operation with God; and rejected the idea that the elect could not fall from grace. The oppo- nents of this Remonstrance, the Contra-Remonstrants, demanded the calling of a national synod. The controversy meanwhile became enmeshed in politics. The advocate of Holland, Oldenbarneveldt, was friendly to the Arminians. As long as he dominated affairs, Oldenbarneveldt prevented the calling of a national synod which might be unfriendly to their position. His control was challenged by Maurice of Nassau, the stadtholder. The religious question became involved in the struggle for power between the stadtholder and the advocate. Maurice's opposition to the Remonstrants was political rather than religious, a part of his attempt to concentrate the executive power into his own hands. Arminians were not hostile to a ruler's power, indeed more friendly to it than the orthodox. While the latter sought to safeguard the rights of the church by stressing the divine importance of its ecclesiastical organization, the former denied the existence of a separate ecclesiastical jurisdiction. As part of their emphasis on personal religious enquiry, the Arminians stressed the 'internal' nature of the church; in external ecclesiastical power the magistrate possessed his imperium directly from God, but spiritual life was inaccessible to this imperium. This last doctrine tempered the erastianism of the Arminians. The ruler's powers were seen to be incapable of persuading men of the truth in religion; thus, persecution was morally unjustifiable. Freedom of worship was a civil right. There was, however, in Arminian political thought no doctrine of resistance. Its greatest weakness lay in the assumption that the magistrate would be a Christian complying with the Arminian definition of his office. Once Maurice had won his struggle with Oldenbarnevelt, he fell far short of the Arminian view of a Christian ruler. Not only was the National Synod called (1618) despite the Remonstrants and the State of Holland, but it was from the outset weighted against the Arminians. In his opening prayer the president of the synod praised Maurice as 'verus et fortissimus heros\ The Remonstrants were received as prisoners awaiting judgement. On the surface the synod had been called to revise confessions of faith, like the Heidelberg Catechism, but in reality it was committed to the con- fessions before any discussion occurred. A decision for orthodoxy was a foregone conclusion. Typically enough, however, while confirming 179 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR predestination, election and irresistible grace, the synod failed to settle church-state relationships on a Calvinist basis. From the first it was forced to co-opt representatives of the state at its sessions. Maurice had not called the synod to lessen his own powers. His political purpose in calling Dort was reasserted when he threatened to treat all further meet- ings of Calvinist synods as disturbances of the peace. The Synod of Dort was an impressive gathering of Calvinists from the Netherlands and from other countries as well. One hundred and five theologians attended; twenty-six were from abroad. James I of England played a large role throughout, supporting orthodoxy against the Remon- strants. This seemed strange for a king subsequently accused by Puritans of that very Arminianism which he had done his best to expunge. For James, however, any divergence from official orthodoxy was treason, whether it concerned the Puritans at home or the Arminians abroad. The lasting results of the synod must not be overlooked. Orthodoxy was reaffirmed. The Remonstrants, when they did return from exile, became merely a tolerated sect which was without official status. People took greater pains to preserve an orthodox demeanour since the church in the Netherlands interfered in the most personal matters. War was declared on those elements of popular piety which still clung to Catholic customs. Here we perceive the same phenomenon previously observed in Lutheran orthodoxy, the attempt to bring popular religious expression under control. The synod did not succeed, however, in imposing the strict orthodoxy it had sought. The pretensions of the Calvinist ministers had led to an instinctive reaction against them on the part of the patriciates. The very decentralization of Dutch political life which Maurice could not overcome meant that anyone threatened with persecution could always find shelter somewhere under the authority and protection of the provinces sensitive about their special privileges. While in the southern Netherlands after 1618 theological considerations continued to play a major part in government, in the north, even after Dort, no one thought of consulting synods or theologians on political matters. Under such circumstances the Remon- strants' exile was brief. Amsterdam initiated a counter-revolution against orthodox ministers and after 1631 ignored the decree of the States General against the Arminians. Even before this date Arminians had started to return. Maurice died in 1625 and Prince Frederick Henry was more sympathetic to the Arminian cause. When a Remonstrant school and seminary was established at Amsterdam in 1632, Arminianism had once again found a home in the Netherlands. During this struggle for existence, the elaboration of Arminian thought continued. The most important theorist in this stage of Arminian develop- ment was Hugo Grotius (1583-1645), who had been exiled after the Synod of Dort. He, too, stated the fundamentals of the Arminian faith. 180 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHANGES IN RELIGIOUS THOUGHT Religion was something received by morally free men. The act of faith had nothing to do with being 'reborn', as mystics like Boehme had thought; rather, faith was a rational act of the will. God, he wrote in his De Veritate religionis Christianae (1627), had created man with liberty of action. Such liberty was not evil in itself but it might become the cause of something evil. To make God, through predestination, the author of evils of this kind was the highest wickedness. There was in Grotius, the Arminian of the second generation, an increasing emphasis on rational- ism. For him the end of life included both the spiritual and the civil good, because man's happiness contained both. His viewpoint reflected not so much the paganism with which Grotius was subsequently charged, but a unitary view of the world: 'The universality of the end is correspon- dent to the universality of matter.' Since God dominated all, the Christian life also entailed leading a good life in society. This in turn contributed to Grotius' view of the state. If the state was a part of the totality of things, the two-kingdom theory of orthodox Calvinism had to be rejected. God, the author of unity, disposed all things in due order and the state was disposed under the final authority of the magistrate. Like Episcopius, Grotius believed religion to be an inward matter. The true invisible church was not the concern of authority, but the visible organized church was a part of society. It had no methods of law enforcement of its own; as opposed to the Calvinist form of discipline it depended upon the voluntary co-operation of individuals. The sovereignty in which Grotius believed was concerned with external actions alone. Authoritarian though all this seems, in the end it facilitated the advent of toleration. While on its face Arminianism was well fitted for a state church, as James I and Archbishop Laud realized, Grotius believed that the essence of religion was authorized by God alone and subject to the will of no man. Though there were no real safeguards against the encroach- ment of the sovereign magistrate into the spiritual sphere in either Grotius or Episcopius, their emphasis on spiritual freedom, on ecclesiastical voluntarism, was important. They put forward ideas of toleration and of a free church within the state, without, however, menacing the actual power of the ruler. In an age when religious dissent was thought to be a threat to political order, we have here an important step towards making the doctrine of toleration politically respectable. Arminianism was carried into the French Huguenot church by Moses Amyraut (1596-1664). However, the French church followed Dort and ordered its ministers to subscribe to its canons (1621). This, in turn, led to debate and dissension. While Grotius was refused communion by the chief Huguenot church of Paris, the issue was kept alive by Episcopius and Uytenbogaert, who both spent their exile in that city. In England Arminian ideas filtered into the state church, as the Puritan opposition never ceased to declare. To most of the latter, Anglicanism had fallen into 181 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR ' an error that makes the grace of God lacky after the will of man'. Citing an equal emphasis on free will in Catholicism, Puritans regarded Armi- nians as 'spawns of the Papists'. Arminianism became a stick with which to beat the established church, but once that church had been defeated, Calvinist orthodoxy could not maintain itself either. Arminianism raised within the Protestant fold the question of man's free will, just as Jansenism raised the problem for the Catholic church. Beyond that, Arminianism laid the foundation for an increasingly rational approach and method of enquiry into religious thought and experience. Like the reaction to Lutheran orthodoxy, it stressed piety and the Word of Scripture considered on the basis of personal experience rather than creeds. There were obviously many common concerns in the Christian thought of the century. If we pass to Catholicism, its orthodoxy and its challenge, this will become increasingly clear. The Council of Trent formulated Catholic orthodoxy in the sixteenth century; the beginning of the seventeenth saw the further triumphant progress of the Catholic Reformation. The political victories of Emperor Ferdinand II, of Richelieu, and of John Sigismund in Poland, gave to Catholicism an elan which was augmented by the conversion of notables, like Queen Christina of Sweden. A Rome transformed by Bernini and Borromini reflected this feeling of triumph and power; Roma triumphans became a city designed for religious spectacles on a grand scale. Whatever the objections to this transformation of Rome were, whatever the actual setbacks of the Catholic Reformation at the Treaty of Westphalia, there was in this phase of that Reformation a delight in grandiose religious ceremonies and in liturgical colour and form. The dramatic element in popular piety to which we have already referred was in tune with this impetus. No doubt the rulers in Catholic countries encouraged the peasants in pilgrimages and religious spectacles in order to deter them from Protestantism and to assuage their sad life. Their intentions were in tune with ancient popular needs. The miracle came to be central in this popular piety. Pictorial representations of the lives and, above all, the miracles of saints became common, especially in Germany. Moreover, chronicles were now kept, reporting miraculous healings and tales of wonders wrought by the patron saint of the town or village. In addition to patron saints, the beginning of the century saw an added emphasis on Spanish saints, especially Ignatius Loyola and Francis Xavier. The Jesuits furthered the introduction of their saints but the great popularity of Francis Xavier was due in part to another reason: through him the imagination of the people could follow into strange and exotic lands. Power came to the foreground of the worship of saints. They were ruler types. Their power became power over the human spirit; earthly and heavenly power complemented themselves in their lives, reflecting Spanish 182 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHANGES IN RELIGIOUS THOUGHT realism and Spanish idealism. 1 The ever-present social hierarchy was reflected in the fact that the nobility was the chief beneficiary of the miracles performed by the saints. Side by side with popular piety and the feeling of Roma triumphans was a deeper revival of Catholic piety, especially in France. Cardinal Pierre de Berulle (1575-1629), Francis de Sales (1567-1622), and Vincent de Paul (1580-1660), all typified this new spirit. Berulle's thought, like much of this Catholic piety, was deeply influenced by neo-Platonism. The universe for him was suffused by the divine. But Berulle was also in the Augustinian tradition; his tragic view of life, his emphasis on redemption and the insufficiency of man links him to the later Jansenist movement. Personal sanctification was the centre of his thought. Such sanctification entailed a rigoristic moral attitude on the part of sinful man. Humanity had to be reminded of what it had forfeited with original sin. This went hand in hand with a moral protest against the growing luxury of the Grand Siecle. In 1611 Berulle founded the Oratory in Paris on the model of that already founded by Philip Neri in Rome in 1564. These oratories were associations of secular priests, without specific vows, but under the authority of a 'superior general'. Their purpose was individual sanctification and the deepening of individual piety in order to bring people to Christ. The oratories were a creation of the revitalized piety of the Catholic Reformation; the orthodoxy of Trent did not lead to a stifling of such piety. There was, nevertheless, danger to orthodoxy in such oratories. Berulle's oratory came under the suspicion of Jansenism, and in the next century many members actually joined the Jansenist movement. We have already quoted Francis de Sales as saying that Christian inspiration must go beyond Christian institutions. De Sales revived the mystical piety in Catholicism which was so often threatened by extinction through undue emphasis on hierarchy and discipline. Love was his central theme. The love of man should tend naturally towards God but it needed God's grace to give effect to this natural inclination. The love of God was superior to earthly acts, for man could not add to God's perfec- tion. As the eye could see a flower and immediately understand its beauty, so the soul by simple looking and sentiment could conceive God's truth in God's love. This was the vision which was called grace. Francis' thought, however, was not quietist; good works were the means of con- version and a part of the love towards man. Such love is an act of free determination in which man is sustained once he has united himself with God. For this the sacraments and the liturgy of the church are necessary. Piety, for the bishop of Geneva, was not something apart from this world but something to be practised within the context of daily life. Nor did it mean the ecstasies and castigations of an exaggerated popular piety; the contrary was the case. Man must avoid both despair and pharisaical 1 Georg Schreiber, Deutschland und Spanien (DUsseldorf, 1936), p. 139. 183 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR security merely through rules. To do this, Francis de Sales presented a solution which impressed contemporaries as his greatest innovation; men had to choose a spiritual director who understood them better than they knew themselves, who should be blindly obeyed because God spoke through his mouth. This emphasis upon the spiritual director became the fashion in much of French society. However, the unquestioning devotion of the nuns of Port Royal to Saint Cryan was to go much beyond the usual devotion to the spiritual director of a convent. It came close to idolatry. The religious thought of the bishop of Geneva was re-enforced by that of Vincent de Paul. What de Paul stressed was the abandonment of man to the love of God, an abandonment which to him consisted both in living at a high point of spiritual tension and in actualizing this through the practice of humble and solid virtues. For Vincent de Paul, charity became central, though it had also played an important role in the thought of Francis de Sales. These ideas were translated into practice when Vincent made it clear to the women of French society that their social status entailed, as a point of duty, leadership in charitable works. Thus de Paul founded the Daughters of Charity in 1629. Under the impact of such piety a whole segment of Paris society went mad over theology. In competition with the worldly salons at the court Madame Arcarie (1566- 1618) established a centre for spiritual action at her Paris home. Francis de Sales and de Paul became the spiritual directors of many of the nobility. Such piety could easily escape the moderation upon which the two saints always insisted. Madame Arcarie spole about' burning in God', about 'annihilating' herself before God. This kind of French society provided the setting for Jansenism. The emphasis on man's complete abandonment to the love of God could lead, and did lead with Jansenism, to a sharp revival of the doctrine of predestination. This was especially opposed to Jesuit theology, which was becoming the accepted mode of thought in the church. The Jesuits entered fully into the spirit of Roma triumphans; indeed, they provided many of the ingredients which went into its making. Strict though their own discipline was, they were open to the new tendencies and ideas of the age. Their Church of Gesii in Rome was typical; it combined the architectural techniques of the Renaissance and the love for space and colour of the Catholic Reformation with the needs of the order. As the shock troops of the papacy, Jesuits stood in the midst of the political life of their times. They approached human nature from a practical point of view, and in doing so raised once more the problem of man's free will. Their thought thus led Catholicism into the same kind of controversy that we witnessed in Calvinism and the Arminians. This controversy centred around the Jesuit interpretation of casuistry, the adjustment of the Christian framework of ethics to meet new situations 184 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHANGES IN RELIGIOUS THOUGHT and dangers. Such casuistry raised the question of how much free will man had to regulate his affairs and, subsequently, what the relationship of this free will was to man's salvation. In our period the ideas of the Spanish Jesuit Luis Molina (i535-1600) became the official doctrine of his order (1613). 'Do not', Molina wrote, 'insist so much upon the efficacy of grace that we grow in the midst of men the poisonous error which denies liberty.' To him there was a constant concurrence between man's will and God's in the quest for salvation, as if two men were pulling a barge ashore. God wanted to save all men, but the salvation of each man was in his own hands. God had foreknowledge of man's actions, to be sure, but he did not in any way ordain them. This theory gave ample room to the free will of man. It also emphasized the art of persuading the free man to use his liberty in the service of godliness, an art at which the Jesuits were adept. But how far could such persuasion go without becom- ing impious ? The Jesuits were accused of making religion easy to attain and easy to observe. The books of casuistry, which were meant for father confessors only, sought to deal with this problem. The most important were those of the Spaniard, Escobar y Mendoza (d. 1669), which went through countless editions and drew upon themselves the famed invective of Blaise Pascal. Escobar's theme was that the human in man would sometimes err and had to be excused. This contrasted with the Jansenist position that ignorance did not excuse sinning. Moreover, for Escobar, a right action could be judged, not by its object alone, but also by its purpose and the surrounding circumstances. If there were any uncertainty about an action, the father confessor had to be consulted. Indeed he became central in a situation where man's single acts did not tell the tale of eventual righteous- ness. Circumstances might well permit the use of mental reservations, and for this the Jesuits were constantly attacked by their enemies. Such reservations, however, were never outright lies but rather circumlocutions in extreme situations, and, for Escobar, circumlocutions which the hearer could easily notice. Despite all the attacks on Jesuit casuistry which accompanied Molinism in our period, their opponents also employed casuistry. The Puritan William Perkins' question as to how one could with good conscience use policy in the affairs of this life, confronted all religious thought. It was answered on all sides of the Reformation barrier in a way not too dissimilar to Escobar. Once more we touch upon a general current on the age. It was symbolized by Cardinal Richelieu, who ordered a textual comparison between Machiavelli and Scripture to be made, pointing out the similarities. But what of the papacy? The Council of Trent had defined a papal centralism in the church by leaving future reforms to papal discretion. Nuncios appeared everywhere supplied with papal briefs, and permanent papal nunciatures were established in many countries. Such papal 185 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR centralism led inevitably to reactions. The Gallican assertions of France put forward in the second half of the century were one reaction. In Ger- many the national-church element was represented by the territorial rulers seeking to diminish the rights of the church in their territories. The papacy itself fell increasingly under the influence of the secular powers. At the election of Pope Innocent X in 1644 the right of veto was exercised openly when Spain excluded one candidate from the election without bothering to give any reasons for this action. After this episode, other local cardinals exercised vetoes by their nations at later papal elections and these wishes were observed. The papal protest on the Peace of Westphalia was typical of the contrast between papal centralism and the actual extent of papal power. Innocent X in his breve Zelo domus dei, 26 November 1648, complained that the emperor had given away things that were not his to give: the goods of the church to the heretics in perpetuity, freedom of worship to heretics, and a voice in the election of the emperor. It was a peace against all canon law, all councils, all concordats. This was a declaration by a pope much more conciliatory than his predecessor Urban VIII, who had consistently re- fused to recognize the Protestant powers as partners in any negotiations. It had been Urban's intransigence which largly ended papal influence on the course of events at a time when after many years of war a longing for peace emerged from sheer weariness. The long reign of Urban VIII, Barberini (1623-44), brings out in sharp relief the problems of the papacy. Urban conceived the papacy in medieval terms. Since heretics and infidels were the enemy, he wanted to form a league of princes for war against the Turks. He saw himself as repeating the pontificate of the crusading Urban II. A part of this dream left its mark: the College of the Propaganda of the Faith stands as a monument to Urban's zeal. In a gesture meant to demonstrate the su- periority of popes over rulers Urban had the remains of Countess Mat- hilda, heroine of Canossa, brought to Rome and entombed in St Peter's. Bernini's frieze on the tomb shows the humiliation of one emperor, per- haps to warn another. Urban's actions, however, were more often dictated by the interests of the papal states than by grandiose visions of a militant church. He fought a dreary war against those princes who held out against his power and he continued the struggle against Venice. On the international scene he gave his support to France, seeing a menace in Austrian predominance, despite the emperor's piety and leadership of the Catholic cause in Germany. These contradictions were inherent in the political position of the papacy. But Urban, despite his ambitions for the church, was no doctrinal purist. He himself composed poetry and sonnets in Latin and Greek. Moreover, he received Galileo in six long audiences, and when Galileo came into doctrinal conflict with the Holy See, he treated him with the 186 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHANGES IN RELIGIOUS THOUGHT utmost consideration. Indeed, he could not bring himself to sign the document, ratified by the cardinals, which condemned Galileo's defiance of the church. Urban presented a mixture of medieval intransigence for the power of the church and an openness to new ideas in art, architecture, and scientific thought. He was the principal creator of the Roma trium- phans of the baroque. As patron of Bernini and Borromini, he trans- formed Rome, making his capital a fit setting for the confident might and aspirations of the papacy. His inauguration of St Peter's Cathedral in 1626 symbolized the feeling of triumph in Rome; yet this feeling was not shared by many of Rome's citizens. Urban had to raise taxes on staples and had to strip the classical monuments for materials to aid Bernini's building programme. Both actions were unpopular, and the stripping of ancient monuments led to the famous quip: Quod non fecerunt barbari fecerunt barberini (1625). There was little gratitude for the new and grandiose city that was under construction. To the Romans it was expensive modernization. Urban was the absolute ruler of Rome and of his states. Moreover, he still thought of the papacy as a dynastic institution, even if it was not hereditary. Nepotism remained an evil in the papacy, becoming especially grave under Urban's successor, Innocent X (1644-65). This pope found only one able member of his family to assist him and this was a woman. The presence of Donna Olympia at the papal court caused widespread scandal. It was, however, precisely in Innocent's reign that nepotism received a severe blow when the key office of secretary of state was put into the hands of a cardinal, where it has remained. Though more flexible in his political approaches than Urban, Pope Innocent was rigorous in dogma. There was good reason for this, since his pontificate faced the serious Jansenist threat to the unity of the church. The Catholic church thus presented a varied front to the religious prob- lems of the century. The new piety seemed to conflict with the Jesuit approach to religious thought and reform, while the papacy, concerned for the power and unity of the church, compromised with political realities and retained some of the abuses from an earlier age. In the end, papal centralism was to combine with the Jesuits against the Jansenist movement. The origins of Jansenism trace to a dispute at the University of Lou- vain between the Jesuits and those who opposed their doctrine of free will. In opposition to the Jesuits, Cornelius Jansen, bishop of Ypres (1585- 1638), emphasized a rigid determinism based upon the idea of pre- destination. For him the prime fact in the relationship between God and man was that man had fallen. Fallen man was powerless in the hands of God; without God's grace he could not perform any good works or deeds because through original sin man had fallen into the necessity of sinning. But God's free grace was given only to a very few, and for these 187 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR elect such grace was irresistible. Jansen, who saw such ideas exemplified by Augustine, called his work the Augustinus (1640). Like Augustine, he accused his opponents of being Pelagians, just as Gomarus had accused Arminius of that ancient heresy. Through Jansen's friendship with Saint Cyran, these concepts became central in Jansenist theology. From these ideas it became axiomatic for Jansenists that very few people went to heaven and then only by an exercise of God's mercy which could not be resisted when it came. Thus they viewed practically all of mankind as reprobates. The world had to be shunned if one were to live the religiously strenuous life which might merit election. As good works could only be accomplished by God's direct inspiration, every action had to be carefully scrutinized. With this they combined a stress on grace as an interior matter. However, the offices of the church were central to Jansenists, and about this there was no pseudo-Protestantism whatsoever. Because the mass was essential, temporary abstinence from communion— the great joy of being in God's presence—was thought to be a useful discipline for unworthy man. Such was Jansenist teaching, and as such, most of it was condensed into five propositions by the Sorbonne and condemned by Innocent X in the bull Cum occasione of 1650. Innocent rejected Jansenism's denial of human free will and its sombre, hopeless outlook on the role of man in the world. The founder of Jansenism was not Jansen himself, but Jean du Vergier de Haurranne, the abbe of Saint Cyran (1581-1643). He started his career in anti-Protestant polemics in the shadow of the court. But his great opportunity came when, through diverse machinations, he dis- placed the previous spiritual director of the Convent of Port Royal in 1635. Port Royal des Champs, the original Jansenist convent outside Paris, was no ordinary religious house when the impact of Saint Cyran's ideas fell upon the nuns. It had been restored to the primitive Cistercian life by a young reforming abbess, Angelique Arnauld (1591-1661). Mere Angelique was a spiritual daughter of Francis de Sales and like Saint Cyran was closely linked with Berulle's oratory. However, it was Saint Cyran who transformed the convent. Not only did he introduce an ever more Augustinian theology but he also gave Port Royal two auxiliary institutions which furthered its influence. The school, la petite ecole, was designed to match and rival Jesuit education. The second innovation comprised the societaires, men who without taking vows undertook a religious life under Saint Cyran's direction outside the convent walls. In this manner the movement was extended beyond the nuns and the leading controversialists became men like Antoine Arnauld and Blaise Pascal. At the height of the movement Port Royal contained only some 200 nuns, both in the original Port Royal des Champs and the Port Royal in Paris; yet despite its small size, the influence of the movement embraced wide circles of society. In a sense it was a family affair, and members 188 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHANGES IN RELIGIOUS THOUGHT of the important Arnauld family occupied leading positions in the movement. Saint Cyran's influence was further increased by his supposed martyr- dom when Richelieu had him imprisoned in 1638. The abbot had become involved in the dispute between the 'Catholic' (devot) party at court and the policies of the cardinal. The devots disapproved of Richelieu's alliance with the German Protestants, of his concept of' reason of state' which they contrasted to Christian idealism. The abbot opposed the 'selfish' policies of Richelieu, and his imprisonment was part of the continuing struggle between the devots and those who advocated the politics of reason of state and centralization. Louis XIV's opposition to Port Royal belongs in this setting: here was a coterie of important families whose religious attitudes opposed them to pragmatic royal policies. Saint Cyran died in prison, but meanwhile he had read Jansenius and, in collaboration with Antoine Arnauld, written his Jansenist books. If Saint Cyran introduced such religious ideas into Port Royal, Mere Angelique combined these with great self-consciousness and a tendency to dramatize all situations. She was confident that her life and that of her nuns was THE life which brought grace. Self-righteousness, hand in hand with a rigid predestinarianism came to the fore. This serious outlook upon life produced a certain pomposity as evidenced in the letter of one solitary to his father: 'God has used you to put me into this world.' 1 It also produced a puritan attitude towards the world, though Port Royal had no monopoly of puritanism defined as a moral rigorism which is an ingredient of most religious revivals. Like the English Puritans, Jansenists opposed the theatre, gambling, indeed all mundane amusements. The world was, after all, evil. A Jansenist countess wrote that when servants commit faults against God, one should be strict to the point of being terrible, for terror would bring true repentance and deepen their spirit. Jansenism was a genuine religious revival. Jansenists believed that ever since the time of the Fathers, the church had left the true path of theology. As time went on, however, Jansenists concentrated increasingly on con- troversy against the Jesuits or, indeed, against anyone who questioned their actions. Here the second generation shone: Antoine Arnauld (1612-94), Pierre Nicole (1625-95), and Blaise Pascal (1623-62). The great Arnauld was, above all, a controversialist. His De lafrequente communion of 1643 was a reply to a broadsheet of an obscure cleric. His statement of the necessity of abstaining from communion from time to time in order to purify one's love for God was made in a huge folio volume full of patristic learning. Jansenist controversial writing was not directed to the market-place but to fellow-theologians. Yet the first edition of De la frequente communion was sold out in one fortnight. 1 Cf. R. A. Knox, Enthusiasm (Oxford, 1950), p. 186; see also account of Jansenism, pp. 176 ff. 189 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR Nevertheless, the quarrels had much the same tone as the theological quarrels in Lutheranism. Legalism also entered here, and Arnauld's distinction of 'fact 'and 'right' was typical. A question was raised of how the nuns could subscribe to the five propositions without repudiating what they held to be the doctrine of Augustine. They could do so by distingui- shing the doctrine of Augustine, as interpreted by Jansen, from the propo- sitions by the claim that in 'fact' these doctrines were not contained in the propositions and therefore by 'right' as a legal thing they could subscribe. Blaise Pascal was also a controversialist. His Provincial Letters were a bitter attack upon the Jesuits. But Pascal was also more than this, as his Pensees (1670) show. That book reflected the spiritual climax of Jansenism precisely at a time when the movement was granted its last decade of relative peace from persecution. Pascal based himself upon the supernaturalism of Port Royal. Man for him was nothing before the infinite. He did not stop there, however; man was not a zero because he had the power of thought. This power man could employ to relate him- self to the whole of the universe. Could man do this through his reason, through that geometrical spirit which represented the link between thought and space? Pascal rejected this view of man's capabilities; the former geometrician was wholly converted. Man could not comprehend the whole of that universe of which he was a part through the power of his own individual self. This great supernatural unity had to be grasped by intuition. The universe, then, could not be understood by man through his own reason. Thus there was a continual tension in man's thought between his desire to comprehend the whole universe through reason, to possess certainty, and his inability to do so. It was a tension that could not be resolved. Indeed, for Pascal, any certainty and, in consequence, security in religion was rejected. Man's soul and mind were torn between the attempt to comprehend the incomprehensible and the necessary failure of that attempt. Man was not, however, entirely helpless; his thought did amount to something before the almighty universe of God. Man's thought could make him recognize his very powerlessness before God, his misery: "The greatness of man is that he can recognize his misery, a tree cannot recog- nize its misery.' In this way man's thought could surpass his nothingness, and 'Vhomme depasse infiniment Vhomme\ Pascal's view of man was dim but there was no smug self-satisfaction with election. Man was a tortured soul, torn between the capability of his thought and reason and the inability to comprehend the universe in that way. The end had to be an insight into man's own misery before God. The Pensees injected a note of pessimism into the Jansenist movement as Pascal renewed the stress on man's abandonment to God and his condition as a 'feeble reed'. While Pascal was renewing the spiritual impetus in Jansenism, the per- secution, though a bloodless one, of the movement had already begun. 190 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHANGES IN RELIGIOUS THOUGHT Saint Cyran remained the only 'martyr' for the cause. Papal condemna- tion and the five propositions did not end the movement; eventually the nuns did subscribe, keeping the distinction between 'right' and 'fact' in mind. Even when the nuns were forced to subscribe without reservations in 1661, Jansenism continued into the next century. The Jansenists remained a threat to Catholic orthodoxy. They posited an Augustinianism which ignored the tradition of the church since the Church Fathers. Their doctrines of grace, free will, and abstinence from communion could not be reconciled with the canons of Trent. This revival of piety differed from that in the Protestant countries. There ortho- doxy was rigid and protest was channelled along the lines of free individual religious experience. Here orthodoxy was wedded to free will and the reaction was rigid and determinist. But Jansenism was not Protestant. Arnauld and Pascal regarded all Protestants as morally lax. While Protestantism had reduced the sacraments, Jansenists believed in the necessity of both external and internal religious action, with the latter providing the foundations for the former. Arnauld stressed that appro- bation of actions by God was co-existent with the approbations of actions by the church. But these orthodox sentiments did not mean that Jan- senists were unwilling to defy the papacy. Their theology forced them to conceive of themselves as right and all their opponents as wrong. Since the Jansenists had the support of many French bishops, they tended to regard the pope as primus inter pares among the episcopate, subordinate to general councils. It is not to be wondered at that Jansenism had a certain sympathy with Gallicanism. In their constant struggle with Rome they found a refuge in Gallican principles. But the Gallicanism of the Jansenists was not regalism but episcopalianism. Though they remained loyal to the crown during the Fronde, the increasing hostility of the monarchy against them left them no choice but to oppose royal encroachment upon religious matters. Despite all this, the Jansenists were social conservatives. Pascal believed that social hierarchy was a necessity, that all men wanted to dominate, but only some could. Starting from their view of sinful men, the Jansenists took a position in favour of political absolutism. For Arnauld, oppression was the only possible basis for political government among men. Pascal, who condemned any moral laxity whatsoever, had a cynical view of politics. Stratagem was justified to maintain the necessary power and order. Though casuistry was denied to ordinary mortals, it was not so condemned for the ruler. Despite their attacks upon Jesuit casuistry, even Pascal was forced to realize that Christian ethics had to bend when unregenerate man was confronted with political problems. Jansenists, sure that theirs was the doctrine of Augustine in its purity, constituted a revival of Augustinian piety. Augustinianism, a strong force in the Reformation itself, now played a role in reasserting religious deter- 191 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR minism as a challenge to doctrines of free will and man's power. Augustine had been the main opponent of Pelagius, and seventeenth-century men steeped in church history saw the ancient struggle repeated in their own time. The Jansenists were not alone in reviving Augustinianism. The Puri- tans in England were akin to them in this struggle against established orthodoxy. Like Catholicism, the Anglican church was in the midst of a religious revival, here centred upon liturgy. A typical figure, Lancelot Andrewes (i 555-1626), stressed the ceremonial ritual of the church, which for Puritans was close to the Catholic; he combined with ritual an appeal beyond Scripture to church history. Moreover, under increasing Puritan attacks, Anglican preaching stressed the divinely established authority of church and state. Archbishop Laud (1573-1645) clearly formulated and enforced the ideas behind this Anglican revival. On the one hand, he built new churches and talked about the 'beauty of holiness', while on the other, he held that the church had the right to decree ceremonies and to decide religious controversies. He was imbued with the image of an idealized medieval church which he also viewed as a social institution regu- lating the anti-social appetites of men. This also he attempted to re-create. The broad Arminian base which had influenced the church never vanished. Laud protected men like Chillingworth, and Andrewes demonstrated wise tolerance. Anglicanism continued to stress man's free will and to reject the pseudo-Augustinian definition of predestination. This Anglican revival was curtailed by the victory of the Puritan opposition. Laud's intransigence was matched by Puritan hostility to a church, which not only had its Inquisition in the Court of High Com- mission but which was also a firm supporter of the unpopular monarchy. It was typical that Puritanism tended at first to take a negative position opposing the liturgy, the High Commission, and above all, the monarchy which Anglicans saw as of divine origin. Their attitude on social regula- tion was ambiguous. Some Puritans did not oppose governmental paternalism provided it was not exercised by the Stuart government, which they regarded as oppressive. Others followed that Puritan who opposed such regulations by citing the biblical story of Job: 'it was an old trick of the devil when he meant to take away Job's religion he begins at his goods'. 1 Such differing positions on the social question enabled Puri- tanism after 1640 to find a variety of allies, each with different grievances against the existing regime. Nevertheless, a basic core of belief common to most of Puritanism developed. This belief centred in a hidden God who did not reveal himself wholly in his creation. The Bible was his declared will; behind this lay his secret will. God was a mysterious, threatening God, who hid that part of his will 1 The Proceedings and Debates of the House of Commons etc. collected by Sir Thomas Crewe (London, 1707), p. 17. 192 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHANGES IN RELIGIOUS THOUGHT from man which was not declared in Scripture. Predestinarianism accom- panied such thought. The elect were surrounded by a depraved and evil world. Those regenerated were made so by God's free, irresistible grace. The emphasis was once more upon the fall of man in paradise, upon predestination, and upon election by irresistible grace. In this, Puritanism was close to the piety of the Jansenists. However, the Puritans relegated church sacraments to a lesser place. They emphasized instead two things: man's conscience and literal bibli- cism. The latter emphasis was combined (in contrast to Jansenism) with disinterestedness in church history. All had to be supported by Scripture, the only revealed will of God. Such biblicism, however, meant the intro- duction of a certain rationalism into Puritan thought, for how was one to get at the 'matter' of Scripture? By and large, they adopted the logic of Petrus Ramus (1515-72) which had become linked to Calvinist ortho- doxy on the continent and which was a formal method of reasoning. Part of the Puritan success was due to the fact that their sermons were scriptural and simply organized according to a Ramist pattern which the unlettered could follow. Their emphasis on conscience went back specifically to Calvin, who saw in it the mechanism through which God spoke to man. For Calvin a clear conscience had been the only sign of election; it was equally central in a Puritan thought which rejected any external aids to grace. As one Puritan defined it: 'The conscience of man . . . is man's judgment of himself according to the judgment of God of him.' This common core of Puritan thought, however, was not static. From the end of the sixteenth century Puritans in England and Pres- byterians in Scotland began to cast their theology into the form of covenants between God and man which they deduced from Scripture. Christ had introduced a 'covenant of grace', a covenant with man which made salvation possible for the regenerate. Hand in hand with the 'cove- nant of grace' went the 'covenant of works' which affected all mankind since the fall. It implied that all had pledged themselves to be obedient to God and to follow the leadership of those elect who had already attained to the covenant of grace. This covenant provided the reason for eccle- siastical discipline and the regulation of morals. The importance of covenant theology was twofold. It softened the orthodox view of God to one who out of his mercy covenanted with fallen man; secondly, this religious thought went beyond confessions of faith, like that of Dort, to deduce the covenants directly from Scripture. This development was not confined to Puritanism. In Leiden Johannes Cocceius (1603-69) systema- tized covenant theology in order to combat Protestant scholasticism in the name of a more biblical approach. Not all Puritans accepted covenant theology; it was the more con- servative who did so. Nor could such orthodoxy be introduced into England; the Westminster Assembly of Divines tried but failed. Many of 193 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR those who had fought the Civil War desired freedom from enforced dog- mas. This desire affected church organization. The 'independents' did not want organizational centralism to stifle their religious expression; instead, they insisted on the self-sufficiency of each congregation. In theology the ideal of predestination was accepted even by some radicals. Such men thought that they were elect and on that basis they revived the idea of prophecy, believing that as saints they had the right to prophesy on all matters. Religious individualism could feed on this piety if church discipline was removed and the Ramian logic regulating scriptural interpretation was disregarded. Self-consciousness of election combined with the gift of prophecy became a human and present sainthood. John Saltmarsh thought that as a saint he had rights beyond any ordinary man damned by reprobation. Ludovic Muggleton conceived of himself as a prophet chosen by God to elect and to damn his fellow-men. The distance was slight from being chosen by God to salvation to becoming God's instrument in choosing others. Predestination penetrated deep into Puritan thought. Even a man like Robert Greville, Lord Brooke, imbued with platonism and Christian stoicism, held fast to doctrines of election and reprobation. The self-deification of radical Puritan groups also had those chiliastic overtones which we saw exemplified in German popular piety. They thought the judgement day was at hand. The political revolution was the prelude to the second coming of Christ which would issue in the golden age of the righteous. The notion became widespread that the English nation would soon see the fulfilment of the prophecies of the Book of Daniel about a coming fifth kingdom. The Fifth Monarchy men were the specific sect which expressed these ideas but they affected a wide variety of religious experience. Thus the 'particular Baptists' split from the Baptist movement in upholding such chiliastic ideas and in the belief that only the elect were to be saved. Some of the religious radicals did modify exclusive ideas of election and rejected the determinism of predestination. This was true of the Baptists, a continuation of the more moderate strain of the Anabaptist movement of the previous century. Menno Simons (1492-1559) had given them their form of religious thought, one opposed to the chiliastic and excited anabaptism connected with David Joris. The moderates believed in adult baptism and held infant baptism to be worthless. Above all, they clung to the idea of the church as a purely voluntary gathering of believers. Their community was open to every man who could attain to 'active sainthood'. All men could do so, if they repented and believed in the gospel, none was irrevocably damned. The Baptists advocated complete toleration on the basis of their beliefs. One early English Baptist proclaimed that as 'the wind blows where it listeth, so is everyman that is born of the spirit'. Emphasis on the 'Holy Spirit' was central to such Puritan radicalism, 194 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHANGES IN RELIGIOUS THOUGHT and at times, even to orthodox Puritan thought. For God was not only all-powerful, he was everywhere close at hand, working through man's conscience and through the 'Holy Spirit' in his heart. This 'Holy Spirit' or 'Inner Light' gave emotional certitude of salvation to those who recognized themselves to be of the holy community. It was this 'inner light' which George Fox (1624-91) stressed as the central realization of the Society of Friends, who were called 'Quakers' because they quaked in ecstasy before the Lord; however their radicalism was tempered by an emphasis upon the Scriptures in contrast to many radicals who tended to dissociate Scripture and the 'Holy Spirit'. The Quakers also stressed the sinfulness of man and the need to combat this by means of a simple and frugal life. The Society of Friends managed in this way to strip itself of the undisciplined excesses of religious individualism while maintaining the 'inner light' as the centre of their religious experience. Similarly the Baptists, with their tolerant and disciplined holy community, were able to avoid the chaotic individualism of the radical sects. It is significant that out of all the religious ferment of revolutionary England, the only sects to survive were those which managed to discipline turbulent and chaotic religious expression. Such radical religious manifestations were expres- sions of popular piety; lower-class membership predominated in the sects. They expressed, as did all popular piety, the undisciplined longing for a better world. Free will and determinism were the two poles around which much of the religious thought of the century moved. To the partisans of free will must be attributed that development which is known as the rise of rational theology. Here the Socinians stood in the forefront, though their rationalism was limited by a revelation which was beyond human reason. If Puritanism and Jansenism have certain affinities, that of the Socinians was with the Arminian movement. The organization of the Socinian or Anti-Trinitarian church was an accomplished fact by the time our period opens. From humble origins, the much-persecuted sect had founded nourishing churches in both Poland and Transylvania. Although Soci- nianism was the least numerous group among the Protestants in Poland, none had more distinguished adherents. Their centre was the city of Rakow, which became a kind of New Jerusalem for the Socinians. Its presses issued their books; its church was their largest. The early leader of the Anti-Trinitarians in Poland was an Italian, just as the movement had been fed by Italian leadership from its beginning. Faustus Socinus (1539-1604) established the dogma of the sect which bore his name. Scripture, Socinus believed, could not contain anything con- trary to reason and good sense. Man's will was free and rational. Adam had transgressed because his senses dominated his reason but this trans- gression did not result in original sin. Christ saved mankind in the sense that he made man more perfect to choose the good freely. These ideas 195 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR were incorporated into the Catechism of the Socinians, known, because of its place of origin, as the Rakovian Catechism (1605). Translated into every European language it spread their cause abroad. Free will was asserted because God's equity could not strip man of the will and power to act rightly. Sin was a voluntary act, for one sin like Adam's could not have deprived all humanity. Predestination was utterly false for it would make God unjust; this was the same argument as that of the Arminians. But what of Christ? Anti-Trinitarians or Unitarians, as they were also called, denied the Trinity and with it the 'Godhead' of Christ. None the less, the only way for mortal man to gain salvation was by knowledge of God and Christ. Since God was only one person, belief in the Trinity would, the Catechism held, destroy the unity of God. It was also a belief against reason and not warranted by Scripture. Christ was by his nature a true man, though not a mere man because he was miraculously born and he performed miracles, but he was the son of God and not a God himself. An important Socinian theologian thought that the Trinity might involve Christians in polytheism. Socinians sought to reduce theology to a minimum since Holy Scripture was clear and explicit. Indeed, the Rakovian Catechism sought to deny that it was a confession of faith akin to those spreading throughout the Christian world. These catechisms were termed 'trumpets of discord'. Instead, the framers of the Rakovian Catechism, not wanting to bind the conscience, stated at once: 'Let every person enjoy the freedom of his own judgment in religion.' The school at Rakow contained within it different faiths; students were left a religious liberty unique in Europe. When for the first and only time a Unitarian king, John Sigismund, attained power in Transylvania, perfect equality was established between Catholic, Lutheran, Calvinist, and Unitarian faiths (1571) at a time when elsewhere such procedure would have been all but impossible. Scripture and reason led the Socinians to this position of toleration because, as in Arminian thought, innate human reason governed the judgement of Scripture. Within this movement the rational stream of the Reformation had found a home from the beginning. It is not strange that the leaders of the movement numbered Episcopius and Grotius among their friends and correspondents. Socinianism did not have popular appeal. It demanded too critical an attitude, a too individual and rational approach to life. Its adherents were drawn from the noble and professional classes. The movement was one of an intellectual elite, dependent in Poland upon the support of about 1,000 of the nobility. When that support failed them, the Socinians were doomed. It did fail eventually, not only because of the Catholic reconquest of Poland but also because of Protestant disunity in the nation itself. Despite repeated Unitarian efforts the Calvinists would not align with Lutherans and neither would join with the Socinians against the increased menace of Catholicism. When Lutherans and Cal- 196 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHANGES IN RELIGIOUS THOUGHT vinists finally held a conference at Thorn in 1645, the Unitarians were pointedly excluded. Thus all fell together. The Swedish invasion of Poland led to the final Catholic conversion. John Casimir swore an oath to the Virgin to submit to her protection if Poland were to be saved, and in 1657 Poland was. John Casimir, however, could not have reconverted Poland if the nobility had not already deserted the Protestant cause. Here, in preparing the way, the Jesuits scored their greatest triumph of the century. In Transylvania also the end came. The Jesuits had again prepared the way and the process was completed when Transylvania came under Austrian rule in 1690. Only in a part of Hungary, protected by the Turks suspicious of Catholic Habsburg designs, did Unitarianism continue in the region of its erstwhile glory. Exile was bitter. The other Protestants could expect welcome from governments loyal to their respective faiths. No such welcome awaited the Socinians from Poland or Transylvania. Their physical wanderings in the political desert were extensive but their ideas wandered with greater force. In Holland they influenced Arminian development. In England they came together once more with Arminianism to influence rational theology, though, like Anglicans and Catholics, they were excluded from the general toleration of Puritan England and their books were burned. While Socinianism and Arminianism provided one of the factors which went into the making of rational theology, there was also another impetus of great importance. The penetration of rationalism into the heart of seventeenth-century religious thought was closely linked to the influence of classical thought. Stemming from the Renaissance, this had seen something of a revival in the early century. Platonism and stoicism in particular became influential. The Cambridge Platonists, like some of their Renaissance forerunners, believed that Plato derived his wisdom from Moses. In the great con- troversy between free will and determinism, Plato supported free will in opposition to Augustine as that century understood him. The idea of the good was for Plato the end and aim of knowledge, of all striving; in com- prehending all beings it drew the world into unity. Eros, the spirit inter- mediate between the divine and human, worked against the doctrine of original evil and triumphed over it. No Augustinian eradication of the will was predicated; original nobility was not lost through contact with the senses. Man was his own master, united to the universe and God through the principle of love. Platonism thus forged a weapon against predestination. Reason and will were one in this platonic thought; reason signified not a mere logic or critical faculty but a capacity for man to attain the divine truth in a universe suffused by God. These ideas were taken up in particular by a group of men in England known as the Cam- bridge Platonists, whose religious approach was based on reason. As Benjamin Whichcote (1609-83) put it: nothing truly religious was irrational 197 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR and nothing truly rational was irreligious. As this was so, religious ques- tions could only be settled by free discussion. There was no need for infallible guides. William Chillingworth (1602- 44), for example, believed that men achieved different degrees of truth according to their endowments; it was the effort to find the truth that was important. Chillingworth was an Anglican who wanted to broaden the church rather than abandon it. Here the Arminianism of Anglicanism provided, together with platonic influences, the background for a tolerant latitudinarianism. Divine grace, however, was a necessity for all these men. It came to man through his reason: 'Reason discovers what is natural, and reason receives what is supernatural.' The essence of piety was the use of reason, but something else entered as well; an ethical principle held together the universe and thus men were compelled to lead a good life. John Smith (1616-52) defined divinity as divine life rather than divine science. A pure, good, and beautiful life could only exist in the Divine which was a reality. All religions desired this good life, but in this case it was divorced from any dogma. There was no need for confessions, books of casuistry, or ecclesiastical discipline. The essence of rational theology can be simply stated: it divorced religion from enforced dogma or theology and made man his own master on the basis of his reason and ethical nature, but within the divine context. The Cambridge Platonists and their allies fought with equal vigour against the sects and against what they considered to be the barren materialism of Thomas Hobbes. Stoic ideas also made themselves felt. The significance of stoicism lay in the bridge it formed between rational religion and deism, as well as unbelief. William du Vair (1556-1621) had tried to Christianize this stoicism, asserting that reason had to be used to overcome man's passion and aid him to live according to his true nature. God's universe here too, was suffused by the divine, but it was a universe whose laws were immu- tably fixed by God and which would never be changed. Neo-stoicism seemed to combine man's free will, in the need to overcome his passions, with a kind of general predestination. Such Christian stoicism thinly disguised two pagan ideas. The first was the stoic idea of resignation, of apathy, and to one writer Christ on the cross signified such a concept. The second, and more important, was the stoic idea of an inevitable destiny, here transformed into God's immutable providence. God was the captive of His own providence; He had created but did not create. These ideas led directly into deism. A typical work was the Quatraine du Diiste (1622), a poem which was widely read. In it God's whole involvement with the world was denied. How could a sovereign God have anything to do with a world which was so evil? How could a good God take notice of human sin? God, adored as a first cause only, removed from human concerns, allowed man freely to enjoy His creation. 198 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHANGES IN RELIGIOUS THOUGHT The atheistic possibilities of such deism were demonstrated by Pierre Charron in his Of Wisdom, of 1601. With God so far removed, it was man's place to live according to his nature and his reason. Charron inveighed against men being good or bad because they were Christian; goodness and badness were things which man's own nature can clearly distinguish. The emphasis was brought from heaven to nature, because, for Charron, 'nature is God'. Religions that have miracles, saints, articles of faith and oracles were false to human nature. This 'nature which is God' could be elucidated through human reason. The removal of God from the world and apathy in the face of destiny meant an emphasis upon man's nature, his own ethical self-sufficiency. Atheism, implicit here, came into focus with the ideas of the French poet and courtier Theophile de Viau (1590-1626). If nature was God, it followed that it was not the divine, but passions which moved the soul. By omitting the tempering factor of human reason and by believing man's passion to be his natural expression, the way was opened for libertinism. The word libertine had been used in the previous century to denote those who thought themselves as free from the church and subject only to the Holy Spirit; but now the word was increasingly used for men like Theophile, who ridiculed Chris- tianity on behalf of a naturalistic philosophy which allowed free reign to human passions. Their philosophy could easily become outright material- ism; indeed, Theophile asserted that it was the elements, not God, which had created man. In France such ideas became fashionable, contrasting with the revival of piety. With great exaggeration Father Mersenne in 1623 counted 50,000 such 'atheists' in Paris alone. However, not only France was involved, for Venice was the real fountainhead of such ideas. At its university of Padua, Cesare Cremonini (1550-1631) taught a naturalistic philosophy. A teacher of great fame, he held in Aristotle's sense that the soul was mortal and that God was not an efficient cause. His philosophy was taken up by the Venetian ruling classes, who were embattled with the papacy. The Academia degli Incogniti formed by the young aristocrats of the city reflected these ideas. 1 Anti-Christian in tone, it at times struck a note of nihilism and negation. Two Italians gave to this unbelief a still wider currency. Thomas Cam- panella's Atheismus triumphatus of 1631 was in form a tract against atheism, but in reality its arguments were a support of that position. What governed this world were the blind forces of nature; man had to live according to his natural reason. The divine mysteries and Christ were rejected. Under platonic influences, however, Campanella kept a vague sort of religion as a force for the general good. This appeared as such in his famous Utopia, the City of the Sun (1623). Typically enough, however, the priests of this imaginary state occupied themselves with natural 1 Cf. G. Spini, Ricerca dei Libertini (Rome, 1950), pp. 139 ff. 199 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR science and astrology, trying to make their prophecies more accurate. Christ was merely primus inter pares among important commanders, lawgivers, and scientists. Campanella, like other 'atheists', was influenced by Averroism, especially in the concept of religion as a mere law, per- ceiving the founders of religions not as divine but as lawgivers only. Moreover, the Averroist stress upon astrology had continued into this age as a kind of astrological determinism which had led one Florentine to write that Christ's death was not connected with the salvation of humanity, but with an unfavourable conjunction of the stars. While Campanella was at times hesitant in his unbelief, there was no such hesitation in the thought of Lucilio Vanini (1585-1619). For him, man was a biological phenomenon whose character was formed not by the divine within him but by the material circumstances of his life. Nature and, through it, natural circumstances, represented the immutable decree of God. Christ and Moses were mere impostors; a pretence of divinity kept poor people in servitude. Religion was the opium of the people for most of these men long before Marx used that term. Vanini had a remark- able liberty of movement until he opened a successful school to teach his doctrine in Toulouse. Only then, in 1619, was he burnt as a heretic. The frequent attacks on such atheism and deism during the first half of the century demonstrated the relative force of these ideas. Writers never tired of reiterating the existence of a body of men who did not believe in Christ, in the immortality of the soul, or in the Bible. To these men nature was the only and highest power. It became obvious, however, that this seventeenth-century unbelief destroyed Christianity only to erect a new authoritarianism: man chained to.nature unable to escape a destiny in which an absent God refused to intervene. The element of free will meant living according to this nature, giving to man an ethical self-sufficiency which excluded the divine. Most of these men did believe in a God, however remote or powerless. There were some, however, who under the influence of Epicurean thought rejected even this belief. Thus, starting from a classical impetus, our period saw the rise of an important move- ment, anti-Christian in character, which went beyond rational religion to various forms of deism and unbelief. Did the growing strength of such religious attitudes lead to toleration ? The theory of toleration was embodied in rational religion and in the thought of those who stressed the 'Holy Spirit' working within man, but nowhere did such men have political power. Confessions of faith were enforced in Protestant lands and Catholicism had its Inquisition. Yet there were examples of practical toleration: Poland and Transylvania before re-Catholicization, the Netherlands, and revolutionary England. However, in the Netherlands such toleration was largely confined to the province of Holland; under the English Protectorate Socinians were excluded, while Anglicans and Catholics were only allowed to worship in 200 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHANGES IN RELIGIOUS THOUGHT private. There were also some other small islands of tolerance: Altona near Hamburg; Friedrichstadt in Schleswig-Holstein, Glueckstadt in Denmark. As in Amsterdam, all religions, including Jews, were encouraged to live side by side in these towns. The reason for these astounding pheno- mena was not theological, but economic. In every case toleration was desired to encourage trade and to found a flourishing and profitable com- mercial centre. For all these examples, the important development may well have been a less tangible one. Persecution for heresy did grow less, burnings there still were, but fewer in number than before. Perhaps the growing penetra- tion of religious rationalism was, in part, responsible for this latitudin- arianism which we saw reflected in many of these movements. Perhaps also a growing religious indifference was responsible, which placed less value on religious conformity if political allegiance was preserved. Several unifying threads have run through our analysis. The challenges to orthodoxy in this age are obvious. Many challengers managed to establish themselves and to gain a following. Religious diversity could not be stopped with the Protestant Reformation, though Protestant as well as Catholic orthodoxy tried to restrain it. The issue of free will against predestination occupied much of the religious thought of the age, in- volving as it did the great question of man's power over his own destiny. In this struggle rationalism played a principal part though it led, as we have seen, under the impetus of classical thought not only to rational religion but also to modes of deism and unbelief. Modern materialism and modern anti-Christian thought have their clearly defined beginnings here as movements in our age. The greater emphasis on nature was striking also, exemplified in Boehme's mysticism on the one side, and in Vanini's ideas on the other extreme. Yet the age was also that of the revival of piety. It gave to Catholicism two of its greatest saints, and Augustinianism was certainly one expression of this piety within Jansenism and in Puritanism. Beneath it all, on the level of popular piety, there was a same- ness of expression, a traditionalism, re-emphasized by the hard times of a period of almost continuous war and rising prices. Chiliasm, mysticism, and an exuberance in religious expression typified the longing for a better world. The first part of the century settled none of these issues, just as it did not begin them. The change in our period was not so much the creation of something new, but the crystallization and definition of these trends of religious thought. 201 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHAPTER VI MILITARY FORCES AND WARFARE 1610-48 OR the military historian, the main feature of what is usually called the modern period is that it is dominated by the professional soldier, hired at home or abroad. In the early part of the period, troops were recruited abroad to serve for a limited period only: these were the mer- cenaries or 'hired troops' in the strict sense, of whom the purest example were the Lansquenets, troops completely unattached to any one state or government, who sold their services to the highest bidder on terms mu- tually agreed and laid down in a deed of engagement. Mercenaries, however, came to be replaced by troops of home origin, engaged by the state for an indefinite period of time and organized into regiments or companies which were permanent sections of the military forces; that is, by a standing or national professional army. In practice, such standing armies also comprised a varying number of foreigners, either grouped into separate regiments or spread among the various sections of the army. Naturally, the process of transition from the one method of raising an army to the other differed from country to country, but in general it can be said to have taken place in the first half of the seventeenth century. This was closely bound up with the development of the modern state and with the evolution of absolute monarchy, the most powerful weapon of which the standing army proved to be. The use of hired troops can be traced far back into the Middle Ages and predominated from before the beginning of the sixteenth century. But, obviously, governments forced to take hired troops into their service could not close their eyes to the danger of entrusting their own and their subjects' interests to foreign adventurers, nor to the thieving, plundering, extortion and other outrages which made these bands the terror of friend and foe alike—not only in the field, but also after they had been dis- banded. Then, too, not every ruler could afford the heavy cost of main- taining a hired army. Attempts were therefore made to find some other way of providing defence forces, and the obvious answer was a national militia, raised from among the home population. This was in line with the long-established practice of general conscription in the event of enemy invasion. Similar instances were found in the 'franc-archers' of Charles VII of France, in the civil guard on the Roman model which Machiavelli had built up in Florence in the early years of the sixteenth century, and in the 'legions' of Francis I. In Germany particularly, where, after the failure of Charles V's policy real power had passed into the hands of the local princes, several wrestled F 202 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008MILITARY FORCES AND WARFARE I 6 I O - 4 8 with the problem of defence—and with good reason, for the animosity between Protestantism and the Counter-Reformation sharpened visibly about the end of the sixteenth century, and it became obvious that an armed clash would not be long in coming. And so in this period there were attempts throughout Germany to build up people's armies, referred to as the Landesdefension or Landrettung. Here, Bavaria (where Duke Maximilian, the energetic head of the Catholic League, founded in 1609, did much to help the cause) was the most prominent state, along with Brandenburg, Saxony, the Rhine Palatinate and Nassau. The Landrettung of Nassau is important because of the close ties between Count John the Elder—brother of William of Orange—and his son, John de Middelste [the Middle One], and the Dutch generals, Maurice and William Louis. Since the Peace of Augsburg (1555) there had, after all, been no oppor- tunity in Germany of acquiring any practical knowledge or gaining any experience of modern warfare. We can therefore understand why the Nassau leaders turned to the Netherlands, then the military college of Europe. John of Nassau {de Middelste) was the chief intermediary for this purpose. He went on some of the most important campaigns undertaken by Prince Maurice and recorded the valuable experience he gained there in a number of military manuals [krijgsboeken], which form one of our chief sources of information about the reforms in the Nassau army. The manuscripts now lie in the state archives at Wiesbaden. Great pains were taken with the Landesdefension, but they were doomed to failure. The causes were many. One of the first requirements for an army based on national service is a strong national feeling. This was entirely lacking in the countless patriarchally ruled states into which the German Empire was divided. Passive resistance rather than co-operation was to be expected from the 'subjects', good-natured peasants whose interests did not range far beyond local matters. The extensive paperwork which national service inevitably involves was also under-estimated. The state administration at that time was unable to cope with the work, as it did not have enough well-trained and reliable officials. As far as the organization of the army was concerned, one of the weaknesses always encountered in a people's army of this kind, was the shortage of officers, that is to say, of an efficient corps of instruc- tors. Moreover, the training period was too short, attendance poor and irregular, while months or even years might elapse without any exercises being held. The nobility looked upon the arming of the peasants with distrust: they were afraid there would be marauding and had not forgotten the Peasants' War. The townspeople, who had to provide the funds, showed little enthusiasm for a venture in which no one had any confi- dence. Admittedly the main purpose of the system was to provide protec- tion against bands of plunderers, but the Thirty Years War demonstrated clearly enough that it could not achieve even this modest aim. The 203 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008 8-2DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR beginning of the Thirty Years War meant the end of the Landrettung. When, in 1620, Spinola and his experienced troops invaded the Palatinate, rapid collapse ensued, practically without a struggle. One may ask whether the Landrettung left any positive gains. Of chief importance are the military writings it left, designed to advance the knowledge of warfare in line with modern ideas. The manuscripts of John of Nassau (de Middelste) have already been mentioned. In addition, he became very famous as the compiler of the first European drill-book, consisting of plates by Jacob de Gheyn, reproductions of which can still be found in countless books all over the world. He found a partner in George Frederick, the margrave of Baden-Durlach. Another was Johann Jacobi van Wallhausen, who published a series of books on the art of warfare and who may be regarded as the leading author on military matters at the time of the Thirty Years War. He was also the first head of the military college for sons of the nobility which John de Middelste had founded at Siegen in 1616. The aim of this establishment was to meet, by theoretical study, the need for practical experience of war, there being little opportunity of acquiring it, as there had been peace in the Nether- lands since 1609. This military college, the first of its kind in Germany, was, however, to enjoy only a brief existence: the outbreak of the Thirty Years War was the probable reason why it had to close as early as 1619. The failure of practically every experiment with a militia based on compulsory military service may be taken as proof that, given the political and social situation in Europe in the sixteenth and succeeding centuries, the professional army was the type of military force required. There was hardly a country at war which did not have to engage large or small num- bers of foreign troops to supplement the home or 'national' army. Thus the United Netherlands continuously had regiments of English, Scottish, French, German and Walloon troops in their service. Spain fought her wars mainly with Italians, Burgundians, Walloons, Germans and Swiss. German mercenary cavalry [reitres] and infantry [lansquenets] were important in the French religious wars. During the Thirty Years War Walloon regiments served with commanders like Tilly and Bucquoi under Bavarian and imperial banners. Even Gustavus Adolphus had German and Scottish troops in the army with which he landed in Germany in 1630. Provided they were paid regularly, hired troops can be generally said to have possessed one good quality, courage. In battles, sieges, and espe- cially when storming cities and redoubts, they repeatedly showed a defiance of death, which is all the more remarkable as they were seldom, if ever, inspired by patriotic feelings. The hired soldier has often been regarded as a ready mutineer, but he mutinied almost always because of arrears in his pay. Moreover, he would never mutiny for higher pay, but because he received no pay at all. Discipline and regular pay went hand 204 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008MILITARY FORCES AND WARFARE 1 6 I O - 4 8 in hand. Under leaders with such forceful personalities as Maurice and Frederick Henry had, there was, for those days, excellent discipline in the Netherlands army. The most striking evidence for this is that the towns liked having a garrison, which in former times had been looked upon as a scourge. After all, a garrison brought a town money and trade, the city treasury benefited by higher excise revenues, while many citizens found it very profitable to let rooms and to receive a compensation for billeting. This was only true, however, if order and discipline were maintained; the terms of the deed of engagement laid down severe punishments for fighting and for mishandling people providing quarters; anyone even drawing a sword in the garrison did so on pain of death. One of the main advantages of the professional army compared with the militia system was that it was a result of what people wanted. After the religious wars had come to an end, people did regard warfare as a matter for rulers and governments; a recruiting system which interfered as little as possible with social and economic life was consistent with this attitude. The professional army undoubtedly met this requirement and this was its main justification. As early as the third decade of the sixteenth century the states of Holland rejected the idea of recruiting a militia, considering 'that it was impolitic to set citizens or countryfolk against hirelings who had nothing to lose'. This was to be the prevailing opinion right up to the time of the French Revolution. The argument heard in favour of the hired army—that it did not withdraw any labour from the home market— sprang from the same line of thought. It was also considered no small advantage of such an army that it relieved society of its unemployed, of its vagrants and of elements likely to cause unrest and endanger the state, thereby undoubtedly performing a useful service to society. It is obvious as well that once war was over, or the threat of war had passed, block dis- charges became necessary, and a new problem arose for the solution of which society in those days had only primitive means at its disposal. Finally, there was this to be said for the hired army, that in poverty- stricken or poorly developed areas it could absorb the surplus population and be a welcome refuge in difficult times. It is not surprising, then, that severe winters, bad harvests and famine had a favourable effect on recruiting. The fact that the hired army was a necessity in its day does not mean that the system had no disadvantages: there were, in fact, great disadvan- tages. First and foremost, the indispensable bond between army and people was lacking. The two existed side by side, with little mutual con- tact, respect or understanding, as two entirely separate entities within the state. The soldier served for pay, and once this pay had been found, the citizen had no further obligation towards the army. The mercenary, in his turn, had little or no interest in the cause for which he fought. This is why there were always deserters and turncoats; why, for instance, prisoners 205 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR would sometimes go over to the enemy en masse; why mutiny and trea- chery were of great importance in the wars of the time. One should be careful, however, not to generalize too much about this. In those coun- tries, like Gustavus Adolphus' Sweden and Cromwell's England, which had a mainly national army, and which, moreover, were fighting for some religious or political ideal, morale was definitely higher than when pay and booty were the sole motives. The same was true of those religious wars which really were struggles of faith, but not all religious wars were of this kind. For purely practical reasons, leaders had to be very tolerant. The notorious duke of Alva frequently used German Lutheran regiments with the Spanish troops operating in the Netherlands, whereas, elsewhere, supporters of the faith preached by the Lutheran chaplains were put to the sword. In Wallenstein's army Protestant officers were to be found right up to the highest ranks, and as far as the rank and file were concerned, we know for certain that their faith was never recorded when they were enlisted. All one can say is that, very broadly speaking, both Protestant and Catholic countries recruited their forces in districts where their own faith was predominant. It was to be expected that the terms of the deed of engagement reflected the attitude of the state or official church, and as some of these deeds made attendance at religious service compulsory (the Swedish ones of 1621 and 1632; the Danish one of 1635; and the English one of 1585, among others), this meant that soldiers would be forced to practise a religion or take part in services different from their own. It is likely that the terms of the deed were not applied too strictly in this instance. In the Dutch deed of 1590, there were, it is true, threats of severe punishments for swearing and for disrespectful treatment of servants of the church [kerken dienaers], but attendance at church services was not made compulsory. Contemporary historians were generally agreed that officers and men did not lead very religious lives. Swearing and blaspheming in particular, which carried such severe punishments (in the Netherlands, for example, piercing of the tongue with a red-hot dagger), seem to have been prevalent, along with drunkenness and whoring, not to mention other offences. Military life apparently fostered licence rather than piety, and this was certainly one of the reasons for the army's bad reputation in most countries. The chief victims of the 'other offences' were the people living in the country. From the very first days of its existence, the mercenary army was a two-edged sword. The homeland often had to suffer as severely as, if not more than, the enemy territory. And in later periods too, the chroni- cles of war are accompanied by a sombre tale of murder and arson, plundering, extortion and robbery. The countless edicts published to curb all these enormities had little effect. To some extent, the lack of funds with which almost all the warring rulers had to contend was the source of these evils too. It was, in fact, a very common practice simply to 206 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008MILITARY FORCES AND WARFARE 1 6 I O - 4 8 'quarter' troops whose pay could not be found in country areas and let them fend for themselves, the countryfolk having to shoulder the burden. During the Dutch war of liberation, the Spanish side resorted to this method with troops whose pay was in arrears by two years or more and whose demands for food and drink knew no bounds. The Spanish soldiers acted in similar fashion, but then on their own authority, during the many mutinies—again the result of irregular payment—which hampered and sometimes completely paralysed military operations. They sent their officers packing and chose an eletto which, supported and supervised by a sort of soldiers' council, laid down the duties, observing very strict discipline, maintained by barbarous punishments. The duties consisted in collecting food and forage by means of a levy on the surround- ing villages; for this purpose threatening letters were circulated, the purport of which was sometimes made quite clear by scorch-marks on the corners. Here again, it was the home territory that had to foot the bill. If the escadron submitted once more to government authority, which never happened unless it was paid off and granted an amnesty, the eletto would receive a sum of money to enable it to seek its fortune abroad. Columns on the march were also a plague, not only because the soldiers and the women, boys and horses following in their train had to be pro- vided with food and shelter, with hay, straw and carts and anything else they might require, but also because troops on the march were usually accompanied by bands of marauders who looted and pillaged on their own account. In this, the role of the partisans was very important. Partisans were small bands of soldiers which would set out, with or without a commander, on short expeditions or on reconnaissance. Their good knowledge of the region frequently enabled them to penetrate deep into enemy territory, showing great adroitness and daring. Nevertheless, it was difficult to draw a line between such 'expeditions' and looting raids. In the northern Netherlands it was therefore stipulated that, to claim the right to be treated as prisoners of war, members of a 'party' must be at least twenty-five in number, and under the command of an officer. A country which suffered particularly was Germany during the Thirty Years War; most of all from the swarms of wives, whores, boys, children, drivers and servants which followed the army together with hundreds of waggons and herds of cattle, and which, at the end of every march, spread across the countryside like a plague of locusts. While on the march the armies must have resembled a mass migration, increasingly so as the war proceeded. As early as 1617, however, in his Krijghskonst te Voet [The Art of Infantry Warfare], Van Wallhausen estimates that there were at least 4,000' whores, boys and bawdy-waggons' to 3,000 German soldiers. It was the task of the Rumormeister and the Hurenweibel to maintain law and order among this rabble. The longer the army remained in one place, 207 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR the wider the area stripped clean. The worst feature of all was the atro- cious tortures inflicted to discover where food and valuables had been hidden. The armies which Wallenstein recruited with his own means in 1625 and succeeding years had a particularly lamentable record. It goes without saying that the actual aim of the war did not make the slightest difference to the situation. Officers as well as ordinary soldiers assembled from all corners of Europe at the sound of the recruiting drum. The men who slew Wallenstein at Eger in 1634 were partly Scottish Protestants, partly Irish Catholics. It was inevitable that the army-camps developed their own type of language—a crude professional slang— which gave rise to a host of the most outlandish corruptions, such as 'leutenampt' for 'lieutenant'; it has left its traces in many modern lan- guages. The international composition of these armies certainly helps to explain why we find similar military terms used all over the world today, such as the names for army units and ranks. The way in which the state obtained its mercenaries is typical of the—as yet—primitive structure of its government. In those days, the state or- ganized as little as possible itself, leaving as much as possible to private initiative. The head of state could acquire soldiers in two ways: by recruiting at home or abroad, or by employing one or more of the corps of foreign troops already existing. In the latter case, a contract or 'capitulation' was signed with the government concerned, containing details of the mutual financial and other commitments, as well as of the conditions on which the troops might be used. An advantage of this procedure was that trained soldiers were obtained and recruitment expenses avoided. In the former case, recruitment was put in the hands of a general who was popular among the soldiers and who had sufficient funds to pay the cost of recruiting and arming the troops, and, sometimes, to advance their first month's pay as well. Conditions were laid down in a special 'commission' [commissie or Bestallung]. The general, in turn, commissioned colonels or captains to take charge of recruiting. The large towns were favourite recruiting centres. The men who came forward were ordered to attend at the place-of-muster or drill-ground on a given day; at the same time they were paid a sum as muster money. At the assembly- point they were enrolled by muster-commissioners, provided, where necessary, with weapons, the cost of these being deducted from their pay, and divided into sections. The subordinate commanders were appointed, the colours handed out with a show of ceremony, the articles of war read out; the oath of allegiance was sworn to the king or whoever was hiring the soldiers, who promised to protect the colours and obey the articles of war. With this, the regiment existed officially, and, having received the first month's pay, it was ready to march off to its destination. The advocates of the national militia did not fail to point out the great disadvantages of this system. First, there were the high costs incurred 208 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008MILITARY FORCES AND WARFARE 1 6 I O - 4 8 before the troops had even caught sight of the enemy; the muster-money had to be paid, and weapons bought and transported; the recruiting staff's travelling and subsistence expenses had to be met, and above all there was the cost of providing for the recruits at the place-of-muster. Every day spent there cost a considerable sum of money and this was particularly felt if there were delays in mustering. If payment was not forthcoming, the soldiers were forced to provide for themselves by plundering until they finally made off for good—a frequent occurrence— so that all the expense had been in vain, which sometimes even benefited the enemy. The same happened when the enemy attacked the place-of- muster, often on neutral ground, dispersing the troops that had been recruited and seizing their weapons. It is not surprising that a number of the recruits disappeared without trace after receiving the 'king's shilling'. Finally, the discharging of mercenary troops often involved difficulties. Arrears of pay had then to be paid, besides money for the journey back home, if the mercenaries were to be dissuaded from remaining in the country as vagabonds or joining the enemy. With the treasuries of the warring princes usually all but empty, troops could often neither be paid nor discharged. This was the situation in the Netherlands, when, on the occasion of the famous siege of Bois-le-Duc, the republic had altogether no less than 120,000 men under arms, a great many of whom had to be discharged after the campaign. This was carried out quite successfully, although with great difficulty, leaving in the end some 6,000 men, for whom no better solution could be found than to let them spend the winter in the neutral territories of Cleves, Mark and Berg, at the expense of the local inhabitants. Newly recruited regiments, entirely lacking in discipline, cohesion and training, were naturally no match for old experienced soldiers. The very reason for the defeats which the Netherlands suffered in the field at the beginning of the Eighty Years War was that they had to go to war with scratch regiments of newly recruited German auxiliaries. This explains the clause in the Dutch deed of engagement, which reads:' Anyone demanding money when our forces are marching on the enemy or setting off to make any kind of attack will forfeit his life, without appeal to mercy.' It is general knowledge that the armies were made up of the scum of the nations. Dislike of regular work, the prospect of booty, a craving for adventure, debts, the desire to keep out of the hands of the law, these were the principal reasons for answering the call of the recruiting drum. George Gascoigne, an English captain who was a poet of the English Renaissance, divided those who earned their living by soldiering into three categories, to which he gave the allegorical names of 'Haughty Harte', 'Greedy Minde' and 'Miser'; that is to say, those eager for fame and honour, those out for money and booty, and those driven by poverty and need, extravagance or crime. If it seems surprising that so many young 209 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR men preferred a soldier's life to the workshop or the plough, it must be remembered that living conditions were unfavourable, hours of work long and wages low in town and countryside, and this is probably where the explanation lies. Countrymen were said to make the better soldiers. Of course, the situation was not the same in every army. In the Spanish infantry, for instance, many sons of the lower nobility—hidalgos—served as ordinary soldiers, though with a batman and a horse for marches, which they left behind with the baggage during battle. In France, a large part of the cavalry consisted of volunteer noblemen; these must be distin- guished from members of the arriere-ban, service in which was, in theory, still compulsory for all vassals, but which had already largely fallen into decay by the sixteenth century. In the southern Netherlands the nobility was strongly represented in the Benden van Ordonnantie. There was a curious development in Germany. Here the lance had already gone out of use by the early sixteenth century even, and had been replaced by two pistols. Unlike the lance, the pistols could also be used by batmen and servants, who were accordingly incorporated into the large, unwieldy squadrons of the day, the nobleman being paid according to the number of mounted retainers he had. The German cavalry [reitres] played an important part, particularly in the French religious wars. Owing to their custom of not polishing their armour, but painting it black instead—a practical measure—they became known as the 'Black Cavalry'. There was no proper course of training for officers. As we saw, the military academy at Siegen enjoyed only a brief existence. Those destined for careers as officers joined a company as 'noblemen', 'cadets' or 'captain's bodyguards', and had to climb the ladder. Others began their careers as volunteers in a general's or colonel's retinue; then there were those who obtained commissions as lieutenants or ensigns by favour or purchase, often at the expense of others who had a better claim to the rank. Most officers ended their careers with the rank of captain; or sometimes as captains-of-the-guard or adjutants in a fortress or redoubt. Colonels and lieutenant-colonels who had worked their way up from the ranks were not unknown, but this was usually referred to as exceptional. There was no more question of a fixed rule for pensions than there was for promotion. They were granted to ordinary soldiers, non-commissioned officers and officers' widows, by way of exception only, and on request. Educationally, the officers of the sixteenth and seventeenth centuries could naturally not compete with the officers of today. Only a few had been to a university, either at home or abroad, or undertook any serious study. Furthermore, the situation varied from country to country. It is especially worth noting that several English officers who fought in the Netherlands against Spain became known as scientists or artists or recorded their experience of the war in books. Most celebrated of them all was Sir Philip Sidney, who was fatally wounded at Zutphen: as well 210 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008MILITARY FORCES AND WARFARE I 6 I O - 4 8 as being a distinguished poet, he was a man of great erudition and refine- ment. But there were others too, among them George Gascoigne (who was mentioned above), Ben Jonson, Thomas Churchyard, John Wey- mouth, Roger Williams, Francis Markham and his brother, Gervase. In the south of Europe, especially in Spain and France, there seem to have been more officers with an academic education than in the north. The military literature of the south, to which the Renaissance had come so much earlier than to the north, is proof of this; it was unrivalled by anything published on the subject in Germany or the Netherlands. Works such as those by Mendoza, Coloma, Ufano and Melzo—to name but a few—are outstanding for their clarity, objective presentation and erudi- tion. Many revealed a more than superficial knowledge of the classics. Military writings in the north were very often left in manuscript form, so that no enemy power could benefit by them. The works of John de Middelste, for example, were not printed. Nevertheless, important works appeared in the Netherlands and Germany on fortress engineering and on artillery, the technical subjects proper, the experts on which were not regarded as soldiers. For a long time the prejudice against reading remained fairly common among officers, this giving all military reformers much to contend with. It was said that warfare could not be learned from books. It must be admitted that many authors encouraged this conservatism by embellish- ing their works with battle formations of the strangest kind, entirely devoid of practical value, in order to give them a 'learned' appearance. A characteristic difference between the officer corps of former times and that of today is that the higher-ranking officers, up to the very highest ranks, each had a company, either in their own or in another regiment. These companies were under the command of a 'lieutenant-captain'. In addition, the higher-ranking officers held numerous other posts, which carried high salaries, one of which was that of fortress-governor. But a company in itself was considered well worth having, since all manner of other emoluments, official and unofficial, went with the salary. The main thing, however, was to ensure that there were many more soldiers on the muster-roll than were actually present. All sorts of ruses were therefore invented to mislead the muster-commissioner—the captain's sworn enemy—on the day of the muster, with the company-clerk in particular lending his powerful support. The idea was to have all those who had died, deserted or been discharged since the last muster reported as present and fit for duty at the new muster. This was done by substituting soldiers from another company, townspeople, peasants, or any others willing to offer their services, in return for a small consideration, in the place of the absent troops. Such persons were known as passevolanten. They are often confused with the mortepaien or 'dummy names' of the system whereby the captain received pay for a few more men than the number shown on 211 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR the muster-roll; in effect, this was like awarding him an extra allowance for some reason or other. The records tell us that captains had other advantages too. If a soldier died or deserted, his weapons became the captain's property; if he was discharged he had to forfeit, in the captain's favour, most of what the latter still owed him; a fifth or sixth of all booty went to the captain; and finally, he made something on the soldier's clothing. On occasions, troops were paid in cloth, more being deducted from their ordinary pay for this than was right and proper. In the Netherlands, the number of troops actu- ally serving was sometimes estimated to be three-quarters of the nominal strength, even lower for some companies. Attempts to remedy these abuses by direct payment to the men were always frustrated by those who had something to lose. Since this state of affairs was common know- ledge outside the army too, it obviously deterred citizens from making financial sacrifices for the military forces, while the popularity and prestige of the army greatly declined as a result of all this corruption. Something which had a far-reaching effect on the armies of the time was the absence of barracks. When not in the field, the soldier was in billets. The provider of these quarters received a certain sum in payment, known as 'service money'. The soldier paid for his own meals, and, if he was married, for those of his wife and children as well. It is a mystery how a soldier ever managed to keep a family on the pay he received. The wife probably earned something too, by washing, cleaning, spinning or by doing some similar type of work. Apart from drill and target practice, both of which were infrequent at first, the only duty in the garrison was keeping the watch. In the summer, many soldiers worked for farmers or practised some craft or other, much to the annoyance of the urban gilds. They found others who were willing to do their sentry-duty for them, and paid them for it; in this way, these people too, who were known as 'paid sentries', were able to earn a little extra. The town authorities were not very well disposed to the wives and children of soldiers. If, at the end of a campaign, a soldier went to live in a garrison other than the one where his wife and children were staying, a strict ban was imposed on letting rooms or sleeping accommodation to these unfortunate people, and sometimes they were expelled from the town without more ado. Basically at least, the armies of the sixteenth and seventeenth centuries were all organized in much the same way. For example, in an English infantry company of 150 men (the normal complement), there were, besides the captain, a lieutenant, an ensign, two sergeants, two drummers, a surgeon, a chaplain, a gunner and a clerk. There were also six corporals, each in charge of a section of the company and responsible for training recruits. A number of noblemen were assigned to each company. The strength of the companies varied considerably: in the Netherlands it was usually 113 or 150 in the seventeenth century, and in Germany 300. In 212 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008MILITARY FORCES AND WARFARE 1 6 I O - 4 8 other countries, in addition to those already mentioned for England, there were a number of other ranks: that of landspassaat, corresponding approximately with that of corporal; that of capitaine d'armes, for the company armourer; and in the United Netherlands, France, and Germany respectively, those of adelborst, cadet and Gefreyter, all referring to what may be called prospective officers. In Germany and Sweden, there was also a Fiihrer, who carried the colours when the company was on the march, but not when it was in the field, and finally, in the Netherlands and Germany, the captain's bodyguard. Ranks below those of lieutenant and ensign were appointed by the captain; but for a long time all mem- bers of the company staff, including for example, the drummers and the surgeon, were called 'officers'. In England and the Dutch Republic all officers down to and including the ensign held the commission or warrant of the king or whoever else was paying them. This explains why corporals, sergeants and certain others below the rank of second-lieutenant in the British army are still called non-commissioned officers. The only permanent unit above a company was a regiment. The num- ber of companies in a regiment varied considerably. In 1635, there were 582 companies of infantry spread over 33 regiments in the Dutch Republi- can army, the number of companies per regiment varying between 9 and 30. They included four English regiments, two of 17, one of 18 and one of 23 companies (9,550 men in all), and 3 Scottish regiments, each of 10 companies (3,870 men). The colonel's company was always larger than the others. In addition to the colonel, the regimental staff consisted of the lieutenant-colonel, the sergeant-major, the quartermaster and the provost. In some countries it was quite a long time before permanent regiments with a permanent staff were formed. The Spanish Tercios were very old regiments, while in France the regiments known as les Vieux, which went back to Francis I's legions (Picardie, Piemont, Navarre and Champagne), had existed since the middle of the sixteenth century. Henri IV added a few more, known as les Petits Vieux. It was not until 1623 that the first permanent regiment was formed in the Netherlands. Until that year the practice had been to amalgamate a number of companies under a colonel for one campaign as a temporary measure, since there was no permanent staff. Foreign troops in the service of the states, on the other hand, were organized into permanent regiments. The first English regiment was Humphrey Gilbert's, which fought in Zeeland in 1572; its men were probably the original 'Buffs'. For many years the States' cavalry also had no regiments except when in the field. It was not until 1635 that it was organized into four standards, companies or 'cornets'. In the field, the regiments were led by a major, since the colonel almost always held other posts which kept him else- where. Sometimes, too, as a favour, a very young person or even a child would be appointed colonel. That officers could hold a command in the 213 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR cavalry and the infantry at one and the same time was another evil that could never be rooted out entirely. As early as the end of the sixteenth century, an important reform had taken place in the cavalry: the lance had been abolished. There was much discussion about the advantages and disadvantages of the lance compared with the cuirassier's pistol. The ultimate reason for the disappearance of the lance (it was to return two centuries later) was that it made heavy demands on both rider and horse, demands which it became increasingly difficult to meet in the new age. And so the knightly weapon par excel- lence disappeared from the armouries of France in 1594 and from those of the Dutch Republic in 1596. Apparently, it remained in use longer in other countries. As late as the Battle of Marston Moor (1644) a unit of lancers 400 strong was successfully deployed by the parliamentarian army. Meanwhile, various countries had found it necessary to introduce troops of a type midway between the infantry and the cavalry. These were the dragoons. Before this, there had been no better ways of moving foot soldiers rapidly from one place to another than to carry them in waggons or mount them behind cavalrymen. Horses had even been taken from arquebusiers to transport troops. Mounted infantrymen were used in France as early as the religious wars; the origin of their name ''dragons'' remains obscure. They were armed and fought as infantrymen, the horse being for them not a weapon, but simply a means of conveyance. In the Netherlands it was not until 1606 that the first companies of dragoons were formed. Of cavalry proper, there were only two kinds: cuirassiers, the heavy cavalry, and arquebusiers, the light cavalry. The former were armed with a sword and two pistols, the latter with a carbine, a pistol and a sword. In the seventeenth century there was a general tendency towards uniformity in weapons. Thus the double-handled broadsword went out of use, as did the shield (buckler) of the captain's bodyguard. The halberd was retained only as an emblem of rank for sergeants, the partisan (long- handled spear) for captains and lieutenants. Weapons no longer service- able in the field, including ones like the morgenstern [mace] and the storm- ing flail, found their way to the fort lumber-rooms. Armour remained unaltered for the time being. Cuirassiers wore a complete suit of plate armour, except that below the knee the leg was protected by a boot only; they wore a helmet with either a visor or bars. The left hand only was protected by a steel glove. The breastplate, back- plate and helmet had to be proof against pistol-fire. The arquebusiers, known also as carabineers or 'bandoleer-horsemen', wore a helmet open at the front, their only other protection being breastplates and back- plates. In the course of the Thirty Years War, an entirely new and highly practical type of helmet was introduced from the East; it came to be widely used, and was worn, for example, by the cavalry in England during 214 Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008MILITARY FORCES AND WARFARE I 6 I O - 4 8 the Civil War. The helmet consisted of a metal skull, to which were attached a horizontal rain-flap with an opening for an adjustable nose- guard, a strong, reliable neck-guard and cheek-flaps with apertures for the ears. The pikemen, also known as 'double-pay men' on account of the high pay they received, who were the backbone of the battle-formation, were protected by a morion, breastplate and backplate, gorget and by guards of steel covering part of their arms and legs [besagues and tosses]. In addition they carried a 13-ft pike and a dagger. The musketeers and unmounted arquebusiers wore either a hat or a morion. Using -fe lb. bullets, the musket had a range of between 220 and 270 yards. The powder was carried in leather-lined tin canisters attached to a bandoleer; the arquebusiers, however, used powder-flasks. In the first half of the seventeenth century there were still no uniforms proper. It was always a simple matter, therefore, for partisans or soldiers taking towns by surprise to pretend they belonged to the other side. The absence of uniforms made all kinds of stratagems possible, but also encouraged numerous abuses, desertion, of course, being the main one. Sashes, sword-knots and cockades of a given colour were used to distin- guish one side from the other. Other means employed were battle-tokens of foliage, cloth or bunches of straw attached to the headgear, and a pre- arranged battle-cry. Companies with all their men dressed in uniforms of the same colour existed quite early, but this would be because the captain or colonel had bought cloth of one colour, not because a general order had been given. The first general order regulating the colour of uniforms came with the introduction of the New Model Army in England in 1645, when red was the colour prescribed for all troops. This was to remain the colour worn by British troops right up to the First World War. By tradition the infantry, especially the pikemen, who represented the real strength of any force, were drawn up in the battle-field in three or four rectangular masses, referred to as battalions, squadrons, hopen (Dutch) or Gewalthaufen (German). They were usually twice as deep as they were broad. The artillery and musketeers either stood, in deep forma- tion like the infantry, on the four corners or on the wings of the squadron, or in a few ranks all the way round the outside. In the cavalry, the lancers originally fought en haie in the medieval manner, but after the pistol had become their main weapon, they too adopted the rectangular formation, with squadrons of 500 to 1,000 men. During an engagement, the artillery and musketeers fought in small groups as skirmishers, seeking cover among or behind the pikemen in the event of a cavalry charge. The cavalry's usual method of fighting was the caracole; this meant that they fired rank by rank, the rank which had just fired closing up behind the squadron and reloading. The disadvantage of deep, unwieldy formations was that they were difficult to move and, more especially, that only the outer ranks (in the 215
